      "identifier" : [
         "80809",
         "FC 02 0203 no. 80809"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "Poems of peace and war",
         "CIHM/ICMH microfiche series ; no. 80809"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "subject" : [
         "Guerre, 1914-1918 (Mondiale, 1re) -- Poésie.",
         "Poésie de guerre canadienne-anglaise.",
         "World War, 1914-1918 -- Poetry.",
         "Poésie canadienne-anglaise, ICMH.",
         "War poetry, Canadian (English)",
         "Canadian poetry (English), CIHM."
      ]
   }
}
{
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "text" : [
         "DECEMBER 1918 MONTREAL 9UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE PUSRz»: Fzu\u0026Ru , APEIL, OcrM«1, DECMMER DECEMBER 1918 Page rthe Day 465 lemnities Pay 483 diviualandthe tat-Arhur . Drby488 4Mdul su tii Stao-Arhut . »S4y 4 M of the Sea-Patrick Vaut 'om the, Fronit: 0 ystery Man _3 ±t at the. Damp-J. A. Rolland 0 CIevelaid's For.sdght-johlf T. WhelwrSW51 tud lve51 -M. L. C. PickthaUl51 ality of Komer-Joha Kacnauqliton 1 of Jonah-Henry Carter53 Angels--Roboet Stanley Weir idian Anti-Slavey Grou--Ftd 1B 54 mssU -W. A. LBngton _ 5 er Moral View of Wr-L. J. rhlm56 :-Warwick Chipman 561 , . Clark Xwrray-W. EL 567 rt Geman-CmbtUt 575 \u003enàlnrnin Msic-la C. 49r 88 Pulp nd ppu-1 C. o«8b kauuoathe. 90J E uw Maurice Hutt _1",
         "MONTREAL. SMR ANREW MAGPHAILI Editor. KtToUi-lAL CoumI.\"1t-E mm W. pWTISON, LL6.D.. LCM.Q. a. W. LIE x.A., Bi=L tU.EAN ZDOAI. Ph»1. AKCHIBAWD M»flUCAN, PL». UnIeversity Magazine, 216 Peel Sireet, Montreal. r- enuter my nam am a subscrlbeP to the tluiverttY MffOate. 'I Prkce, $2.O0 per yar, payable in advance. ed fowwfh find Mma\u003e dfams. y subscrlptlon te the 'University Magazine lsan en f- te the Miagazine. This, because there are no stock- -no dividends, ne salaries te pay, andi anything ever goe 7011 kindly mubscribers ? suggest four names of persons wbo might Addren Addnm Nanw",
         "I'S UrNIVRSITY MAGAZINE is issued ini Februarye April, \u003eer, and Decemnber,by acommittee for McGill University; ersity of Toronto; and Dalhousie Collere. .ts purpose is to express an educated, opinion upon ions immediately concerning Canada; and to treat ,ini a literary way ail matters which have to do with cs, industry, philosophy, science, and art. \u003eJTORIAL COMMITTEE: SiR W. PETERsoN, LL.D., K.C.M.G~ pal of McGÎUl University; R. W. LYER, M.A., B.C.L., Dean of eUltY Of L-aW, MCGitl University; PLiA EiDGAR, Ph.D., Pro- of English, University of Toront~o; ARcuiBALD MAcMitcuÂN, Professor of English, Dalhousie College, Hlalifax. ditor: SIR ANDREW MACPHAIL, 216 P\u003eeel Street, Montresi. )uring the Editor's absence at the front the work of ig the Magazine is being undertaken by a local corn- e consisting of Sir William Peterson, Professors C. W. ,, P. T. Lafleur, Dean R. W. Lee. n the book review section, under the management of S. B. Slack, notices will appear of such new books ýy seem to deserve attention, especially those dealing Canada and with Canadian and Imperial politics. 'he Editorial and business management is gratuitoUs. 'he subscription price is two dollars a year for four ers, containing about 700 pages. Copies are on sale at stores for fifty cents each. Bac numnbers may b. hait plication. JI communications shoulit be addroesed to the Acin r, THE UNIVERSITY MAÂGAZINE, a16 Peel Stet Mon-",
         "FAMOIJS «aUi THE UTMOST IN QUALITY ANDY APPEAR ple,sur.",
         "TOPIGS 0F THE DAY ANY'S The moSt awful tragedy in huzuan historY 1s IFALL drawing now to itsinevitable end. Muchisooner than would have seemed possible a few short is ago, the ruthless and conscienceless champions of Uiailed Fist\" have been made Wo bite the dust. When lers of Germany inscribed 'on their banners the dread ative of 'IWorld-power or D)ownfall, \" they knew the stake ich they meant to play. The war gaine lias gone againat and the German Empire is shattered to fragmenta. final stages, the drama marched to a swift and uimoet itate conclusion:- Neyer since the world was conscious If, as a world, have so many earth4bhaking eveuts been ed into the space of a few short weeks. Compared ffia. collapse, the. downlail of Napôleon one lundred mgo was almost a local circumstal9e. By the defectioei gfiria andl the. capitulation of lier other allies, Germaay dft friendless and alone. 8h. did ndt thuiil it worth -thougli the Kaiser gave vent Wo some erazy rhetoric, pauses of his prayer-to repeat once more the. lie Austria (possibly with more show of reason) still uttered wua sinking, viz., that she had been waping a war o e. Turkey's withdrawal was l'end y thespe. i i victories in Palestine. But it was on the. Westen ;hât the issue was decided, as moet of us forenaw would Lbly be the. case. For this we have Wo thaùk Man\"a andI the. armies of ail nationalIities uuder hiesurm and. They could not have doue bettor thaii the 44. profess Wo regret that the. Germa foc wore no rely beaten in the. field. But it auiounta to the -m Marshal Focli had the enemy on thrn, facng dhmute. altogether from what wua happening t ieGray",
         "46 THE UMJNIESITY hands, and inaking what amounted 1 surrender. The refusa of an armistice, N such àirumntances, would have involvec shed. it would also have been crixelty t pirited foc. The ternis iinposed on the ini advance the just and durable peace have been fighting. They know now whý titution, Reparation, and Security. W( that war does flot pay, and that it cal modem world as an instrument of natior inidst of our rejoicings over victory, let us to use the triumph we have won with a w bility for the good of those who are to ci grave problerns ini front of us-natik international-this is nowhere more like. than in Britain and lier oversea Donr George lias recognized the defeat of the ment,\" and most of us have a strong enc justice to repeat, witli reverence and ce used by tlie historian Gibbon when lie this world the natural order of events will strong appearance of moral retribution.\" IRRECONCIL.. Even while they are busil) A.BLE IDEALS their new liouse in Qrder, th time to sit down and do Additional evidence will no doubt accum of tlie horrible atrocities of which tliey ' tlie course of their military and otlierop, they may well ask, had they so large a against them at the very start ? hI was revealed to ajl who liad eyes to see as t] world's Peace. And the motive of the 466",
         "TOPICS 0F THlE DAY47 Speople consciously and deliberately deterrnined so to .t supremacy, is a question which will be casier for thema le now that they have thrown off the shacides by whicli ere fettered Vil just the other day. Certainly no voice Bed in protest at the tùne inGermany. Even now no a~ voice lim been raised against the crimnes and outrages have marked the Gerinan conduct of the war. And t is doue we only deoeive ourselves if we imagine that mige of political constitution carrnes with it of necessity iange of heart. The Prussians are still what they were, .. Balfour was well within the mark when lie spoke of 8 \"brutes.\" The fact is--thougli the right interpre- :)f the fact is very different from~ that given by the er-that two irreconcilable ideals bave been oppoeed i other throughout the war. The first had for its ords \"Might and the Mailed Fist, \" \" Shining Armour, \" and Iron,\" \"Frightfulness,\" \"The End Justifies the '-that end being of course Vo put Germany \" on top ything \"; while the second had regard to fair play rights of others, especially those who were weak and ,d. Its exponents desired nothing better than to live and security with their neighbours, gradually élimin- y reasonable ground of future quarrel. It is well that nd ideal lias triumphed. Life on this planet would en intolerable, alike for individuals and for nations, erman war-machine, which lias wrouglit sucli havo(c i\u003ee wrar, had flot been absolutely crualied. Mucli praise is being given Vo the Preaident of ,SON the UJnited States for his mesae to German\u003e, They were vigorous sud uncompoian inI d expressed in terms of the most perfect Iuoidity. )erial Chancellor gave Mr. Wilson his opporunity, oôk the fullest possible advantage of it. If he hýl I difficulty athe outset of the war in makig up his at it was ail about, the President certainly came in Lsh at the end. There was a littie doubt at firit 467",
         "46 THIE TJNIV whether lie was not entering on a dang such raiesto parley with Germa what was developing as a \"peace uxight, with his unconscious ass converted into au \" offensive peace.' remembered that lie had always that the UJnited States had no qui people, a.nd had frequently insiste sigifiane of that may be) that hi \",co.belligeent,\" uot an ally. It wai approach which the Chancellor made be evidence of a desire ta insert a we the Allies and the United States. ] Wilson met the approacli with perf i Germans who read bis missives in muust have been aghaat with wonde should have invited such caustie coin an enemy country. The record beg' curt reply to Austria, ini SeptembE rmreessly to penetrate and exj German conetitutional reform: Mr. ta beJlieve that because the Germa: a letter pronising sucli ref atm, 2 468",
         "TOPICS 0F THE DAY 4I Id at large, including the Germans theniselves, what ýniins were. And now that ie, is set on going to h. may render many others if (au must surely b. the imeans to descend into the arena of debate anid con- jithe spiritof1one who is willing to take as well1a advice. These are days when thrones are tottering to IIP their fail, and when Kaisers, Kings, anldkiJ*glets show a inarked tendency to disappear into ip-heap. We need not concern ourselves about the .They were among the lust survivais of European m, and their voluntary abdication of, or forcible fromn, the thrones they lately occupied will make Jle difference one wa.y or another, except so, far as it ist the process of democratizing the Central Empires. tLty principalities of Germany no longer count for SBut it is, perliape, our proxiinity to the United ,hat je responsible for some loose talk ini cert.-ain about the absolute incompatibility of Kighip mnocracy. What bas the King of the Belgians, for don. to deserve that lie should at once b. trans- by force of Amnerican k\u003egic, into a President ? flot made good bis dlaim, throughout the war, to be I as the true and faithful \" shepherd» \"o bis flce It issurely apity tom -d irazup with a rcial ,lble despot like the ex-Emperor ofGrM ay h Aud b. said of the Ring Mf Italy. The. AUMligs in lowest dowýn of all men on the face of the. earh anid Bflt is greatly needed to replace him. But tii... two ill reigu in the. hearts of their people, who find not\u003eing r irritating ini the. fact that they are tlieir \"mubWot.,\" - a t the sanie time \" citizens\" of the. country ovr whfrii igp hold sway. And after ail, thii btt ofth f free republics are \"subject\" to thei laws and 1ion: that limits their freom nder a\u0026osi monarchy, a King is but thi. living cuiepro h 'flag. He. iB the. incarnation of ail the etiet 469",
         "47 THE UNIVERSITY and aspirations that commiand, or ougi loyal devotion of those who share the prii In these days of quiek change, it mlgh enphasize in our schools (and for the be immigrants) the points that differentiate from those which we have now succeede dust. Our Empire is a Commonwealth neyer implied despotism, or militarism, c one race to another. It stands for an ail its parts. And the Crown la the go those parts together. No President ca could fulfil that function of the British j: King who represents and symbolizes for at home and abroad, the results of the which through the process of the centi Britishi citizens everywhere the liberties that are in no way inferlor to those offi democratie of republies. And ail the worl have as mueh reason as Belians to be grounds, of the King who stands to-da: constitution-the coping-stone, as it we peril fabrie. TfIE Thougli it does not figure i GERMAN of the armistice, the ques COLONIES colonies 15 reserved for t' under one of President Wiison's famn There have been indications that the n not as fully appreciated in Canada as it i oversea Dominions. Britain dlaims tg 470",
         "TOPICS 0F THE DAY they want them. For this attitude there seems to cxxi ground, unless we believe that in destroying the inted military efficiency of Germany, and discussing Ltly the Possibility of a League of Nations, we have suceeeded i restoring the Golden Age. So long as ung i the balance, or rather while the military y of Germany was strongly in evidence, our eneniies ,ll us that the question of the colonies would be fought western front. Well, it has been so fought out. What me of the stakes ? Are we to hand them back to Our Speaking in Berlin only a couple of months ago a Captain (von Wiese) is reported to have said: \" We and the extension of our colonies if a victory i the Ir of raw materials is to follow our niilitary victory. colonies i the Pacific for inilitary and strategic we need naval bases. \" Other authorities on the ms Of Geriany have made quite recently even more ýmnands. Will it be wise to rely on a \" change of the peace conference, before our enemies have )rth fruits meet for repentance ? There can be no doubt that the judgement of qrepresentative public men in the Dominions ~chiefly concerned is emphatically against any n of her colonies to Germany; and Britain can no more gnore or suppress their views than she cail afford \"d anything that may reach ber fromn her allie or ints. For undoubtedly the Dominions have helped to ir. The state-smen of New Zealaud and Australia that they are looking forward to the development rnthful commonwealths in peace and teurity, on barist basis. For thoem the quetion is of a piece other issue, the so-called \"freedom of the am,\" our continued existence as an Empire 10 largely In these days of wireless, and aeroplanes, and 1,it would be an increasingly easy matter for an aud faithless power, sucli as Germany hma shown e in the pust, to endanger the safety of our overmea",
         "47 TIlE UNIVEIRSITY communications. The representatives , on the' perils to which the Union was reý incentives to rebellion that were suppli\u003c their southwest border; they also picturel1 disadvantages froxn which w-e shail Buffer vision for continuous communication 1 the Cape along the whole of the ma equally weighty is their appeal to the r\u003c niai administration, which published Qi have been one of scandalous misgovern have neyer even approximated to the i colony is a trust to be adxninistered ju its inhabitants. They have shown nc ever of moral responsibility for the ý and higher civilization of the nativeE They have looked oiily to xnaterial gaii It w-as on these and other grounds that beginning of October, went so far as ev( xirfition of Africa, 80 as to consoIidatE eement iv 472",
         "TOPIC8 0F THE DAY ies they could win quickly, through the use of a Iues wbich -would put Vo the blush the practices .roquois, the Junkers were riding for a fail. And now 'v corne a cropper 80 complete that there would sern Dr them and their cause no hope of recovery. Lord ýy's \"Last Phase\"l las mnade widely known the mn of St. Helena, with bis vain regrets, and bis enumer- the junctures at which, had he acted differently, ail hiave been well. What may be the correspouding n-9 of the fallen KLaiser we ne 'ed noV pause Vo con- butit May beworth while to recall the fact that the General Staff risked everything upon the success of muPt to take Europe by surprise. The capig f ,s a elassie, and once more the end must t\u003ee achieved ing strictly Vo a timne-table. The fact that the unex- resistance of Belgiuxn upset that tixne-table did flot o. awaken or startie the German Greneral Staff out of ~cupations. Suppose that, instead of attempting to Joffre by a single coup, the unhappy Moltke, with already in bis hands, had made sure of occupying the 1from Rouen Vo Hoiland, as easily lie could have -ippose that lie had consolidated lis position fromi o Verdun, seeking only Vo contain the Russins until, 'ire gra-sp of ail Nortliern France, lie had studied on (rather than at the Staff Coilege) how to delivwr the grâce which would reduce a millennial rival toth ce of a third-class power! To suggest this buh imPlY that the war would nesarl have ensd in triumph. But how niuch more arduous woId have task of bringing the bulIy~ to bis knces f damentally, it waa a belated ambitioni, the hybMi rerted idealism and a very frank and sordid mteral- )w could anyone expect in a pacifie, idsra g- narked alike by a vital spirit of suorayad an atie sense of nationslity-how could anyoneepc ,ri age to achieve what theRoashdcomlhe",
         "TE UNIVERSITY Pan-German Welimacht seemed a cont: Yet when we stop to think what incal have beën wrought in the world by Ger. ail Northern France in an iron grasp, wii an awdiliary agent, and the imherent w autocraey as their safeguard on the east contemplate the present spectacle of Hohe with the feeling that Europe and civili2 to much greater dangers from the side those which the world escaped a century 1 by Napoleon. A STANDARD At the moment when thes( OF that uxihappy individual w' CONTRAST the press \"tihe one-tine Ge' found at least a temporary haven at the c the country-seat of Count von Bentine' province of Utrecht. The fact that Lou night there, in 1672, however interestin thought to belong i the same categor with the occupation of this chateau by th( now seeks it as a refuge. It is equaily cheap and easy to more:. of Fortune's wheel that lower the prou( May omit conventional remarks. In oi the perspective, we must glance back su going on twenty years ago, for it was in",
         "TOIPICS 0F THE DAY47 r to 1Oth November, 1898 (covering the period which with the Kaiser's arrivai at Constantinople, snd ends s departure from Damascus), will find therein a record in ita way, it would be liard to duplicate among al Lals of mainkind. LC year 1898 was indeed a most remarkable twelve- It witnessed the death of Bismarck, the Spanish- in war, the culmination of the Dreyfus case, and the. f Fashoda (which, was just occurring at the time of iser's PilgÎiiage to, the East). Wîth the KYuger n, the occupation of Kiao-Chau, the dispatcii of Rie),- to Constantinople, the organization of the Alideutacher 1, and the founding of the Fk\u003ettenverein, 1\u003ean-Gernianimn ing strong. Thus William Il at Constantinople, m, and Damnascus (coquetting with the. Ms'e, and Shinseif to be intoxicated by the prospect of Hamburg- Was already launched upon that course whioh brouWxt iis doom. With France and England ou the. verge of a war, William Il at Jerusalem i the. autun, of 1898 ýery mucli like the Overlord of Europe. And yet thewe ganie connection between this spectacularexuso evant and the events which have brought to ruiii the ix. Hohenzollerns. Ever sino. Octôber, 1916, there have bS tE printed conspiouously upon tueoge 0ve f 'L \"éThe New Europe\" three word. which not onl mar the motive of that important pbiain u le Purpose for which the. allied ntoshave ~be \"La Victoire Intégrale\" isa phrm whichiple eal, and upon its complet. £cetnea adfnto e and objective the wiiole issue hws higd Pan ambitions and ?an-German mtospeiiae Ilame of \" absolute wa \"e i of viri Wo 475",
         "47 THE UNIVERSITY nothing is illegitimate that can. break the , civil population by terrorism and bestialil ail who were brave and humane iu what the German Empire and its vassal statE the struggle should not end until the beast 1 In due time, someone will write a his ists, and carefully analyse them according 1 method, and cast of mind. In every ian Defeatists-sonie of them wrongheaded, 2 malicious. Buit more and more, as the m lias become clear that there could be no pa On the lips -of Patrick Henry, \" Give me death !\" was more than a rant, and the G fouglit out to its logical, legitixnate end in And quite apart from, the resolve nations to make an end of Pan-Gernianî ever more clearly with each nionth of hoi free Europe from, the double incubus of A 'A . 6",
         "TOPICS 0F THE DAY47 which is now enjoyed by Wilson, and of Miliukoff only pause to say that fate, operating through the of the Boisheviki, prevented\"hlm from rouuding ,cecutive labouxs a streriuous and notable career. To the future opens up a prospect of great distinction ulness. Lke RKramarzh and ail the o1ther leading Dliticians of the lust generation, lie derives from but earlier than Kramarzh hie came tô, realize how wa8 the Austrian question on the basis of autonomny Iism' uiider the Hapsburg flag. some timae past hie lias been the formai officiai head eech national movement, and it is only natural to, bat the Czecho-Slovaks wiIl choose hlm to be the. ident of their repubiie. For sucli a post M4asaryk higli personal qualifications, Hie la not a prophet, ini, nor an orator like Kossuth. The source of bis nay be found in that seneo rht ad failmwhiuh Lo the. philosophical stateenian. Sagacious yet Inpathetie yet vertebrate, Masaryk is weil fitted to the delicate and fateful duties whieh will deirolvs in the. reorganization of Central Europe. No one ailfamiliar with history and gorpycan fal to low mucli the Bohernian question means i the. nw iinps, and ail who admire the (Jzeehs on the eore of 1fastness will rejoice that i Maaryk bhy ave a 0 toa strong sense of political rightomwad id courage. Now that theRmnffipbup n card, we may look upon BSacsDtkir igements of 1873 as a bit of rhlUwiema ed with the dynastie recorda of EytadM oo ivine Uight, which bas S ediGraBitn 477",
         "478 THE UNI *ecto which will bave force enoug tomb this obsolete conception of go) What now concerna the world mean betweeu the kind of freedom. and that state of rampant wildness \"the freedom of the wild ass.\" meaiis the freedom of the wild a-s possibly exist in densely peopled ce shevism running into new and fan For example, if the Ass.oeiated Pres Bolshevik regime ini Russia has beei things which, so far as it cau be clef may be Iabelled \"Gompulsory Free Of course, no reader of this mi \u003cilass war. B3ut if the J3olsheviks, li] hoeving a~ showdown, the issue must armxs of the flesh. How far the moi 478",
         "TOIPICS OF THE DAY 7 Socialism. which are so largely metâphYsiegl Or at oretical, as to be divorced from actual real4y hinga are quite apparent. Lt is an industrial âge, ithe physieal side, finds its vertebrSe ini factories iculture, the oldest of thue arts, depends nowadays ily developed niachinery, and the artisans, througli )ours the products of factories are largely created, ffû imnportant means of asserting themselves-the ote and the power to strike. By using this leverage id indiscriniinately it is possible for themn to cause sery ini the world. ,rux Of the situation lies iu the danger that unedu- . untrainied' millions Miay quite light-heartedly take ,d certain things whîch are a palpable untruth. 3ocialists may pyramid indefinitely theories which a whollY false assumption-the assumuption, namèely, MlY true unit ofvalue is tabefoud in acertain labour hours. Over against this assumption stand mutable facts, written large upon the huuman rae, \u003eare born weaic while others are boru strong, and born stupid while a few pse genuina capacity. Ldjust the handicaps of 111e is a legitimnate, adbe il objective; but to handicap those who, by theit tiative, and industry are fitted to lead and efi to load the masses with perpetual fetters. atever country people are preaohing Blhvsi t~e for those who are not Boishevist in eprt Lhat status would the farnily as a unit jo red fiag, and what provision would tha mbe ie rewards which are due the saYingrman.T Eýd, it may appear that even to hodpaley witê à sas futileMasto debate the pltclqafiain :.This view, we subit, iserneu.Auarc n knocked on the head, it eantodjsth vouring ta understand the. steghad weke 479",
         "480 TIIE tJNIVERSITY M of radical propaganda. Unless thii seriously and exhaustively it may bE iutentioned ignorant from false propi the social organism been so delicate. to one social 8tratum been so likely other strata. The tense emotions of ft REAUTIONS be followed by a men bewildermeut, as when lias passed the goal, throws himself «:",
         "TOIPICS 0-F TRE DAY41 \u003ehy, and religion in the light of current events. But who are at ail given to reflection wiIl hesitate to accept rized systems. Some Germans (ail Germans, if you are bad men. Therefore German philosophy is bad \u0026ly, German* scholarship bad scholarship, and the language, an Oxford prof essor declares, unpleas- Littural; whereupon some of our hot-heads demand ie banished from schools and universities. Historians, ready to please. At their bidding: the siWister spectre amn 1I re-eznbodies iii the buckram of his ancestor III, who, we are Ïiow told, was a German king, and 1 the %ffectio\u003ens of the American colonies by his horrid ýxn. IPoor old George, who \"gloried in the name of and was as typical an Englishman (of a sort) as ýd! Seriously, it is hard to see why we should allow ýainfullY acquired values to be destroyed by the war. ai, philosophy and learning are reaily so worthless, ilot our sages say 50 ten years ago, and if they znisled is there any guarantee that they are saler guides Nor has the war differed from previous wars except risity and horror. In the sphere of private conduct lise anY fresh problems of duty or destiny; or afford 1i solution ? We may profit by its lessons without t the occasion for tempestuous judgements ini scholar- I literature, or' for spectacular improvisations in1 lie and religious speculation. TL Perhaps no document of the war lias expressed [Ethe spirit of France so completely and finely as the dying words of Maurice Christophe Dréterian, mnant of the 29th Alpine infantry, shot through the lie Champagne region on the Oth of October, 1915. n the arms of a Canadian officer, who reeeived thes. ,m his lips: vis le plus beau moment de mia vie. Je ne regrette Ssuis heureux comme un roi. Je suis heureux de sasser la tête x)our mie le navs soit délivré. 481",
         "482 THE UNIVERSITY MA \"Dites aux amis que je m'en vais aux lèvres, plus joyeux que tous les si de tous les temps. \"Nous sommes un moment de la France doit vivre. La France doit v \"Préparez vos plus belles toilette pour fêter les vainqueurs de la gri tardera pas. Nous n'y serons peut-être là pour nous. Vous ne nous pleurerez: pas notre deuil. Car nous serons mort et une joie surhumaine au coeur. \"Vive la France! Vive la Franc nous. Ayez confiance. Ne bronchez 1 gais. Ayez confiance.\" It is well that these words should 1",
         "DO INDEMNITIIES PAY Peace Conference approaches, and the tinie of oning with the Central Powers for the moral and amage inflicted by theni during the war draws aethi.ng wiIl doubtless be heard about indeinnities. to mnake those pay the piper who, have called the àicl hall the world has been driven to dance at ini blood and treasure is natural enough. Not Belgiuxn, France, Serbia, Montenegro, Armenia, e Baltie Provinces and other states, bills against Austria-Hungary, Turkey and Bulgaria for what rmed the extraordinary damages sustained in the 1 the victorjous beligerents are entitled by customn ,e, founided on an obvious principle of law and iexnand payment of their costs by the defeated ustice is not always served by war, and in niany ayment of indemnities lias been muade by the ually injured by aggression because they have Jly been defeated. The costs of an action at itly paid by the unsuccessful litigant (where the rects), because the winner of the case ought not to suifer for having acted within his riglits But iecessarily just in its decisions, whereas the judicial niuet be presumed to be so. cr, in the present case, the justice of the decision lie war is beyond question. The Central Powers ~gressors, their motives were predatory, and, on the niatter, they might fairly be mulcted ini the. struggle to the victors as well as to, thernselves. estion is flot the riglit and power of the. Entent. nand indemnities, but the wisdomn of doing $o. ng that the Central Powers poesess, or can produce sonable time, the wherewithal to pay the bills 'Of",
         "44 THE UNIVERSITY their conquerors, the question i be well advised to, press their cli tion. Lt is not enougli to dis znerely because its justice is impression has spread far and war indeninity is flot benefited ination will show much grounc the Franco-Prussian war, whe their personal possessions into t indemnity imposed by Prussiai in an unjustified war, the losers and suffered. less severely from merce than did the victors. suiffered quite noticeably the r industrial activities of the receip hirnself ascribiniz German trade s the process 484",
         "485 ) INDEMNITIES PAY s prices for home produets unduly reduced and them lessiened by the competition of the commo- ted in payment of its dlaim toi war-indemnification. ý, then, as it may appear, it is by no means always ect war indemnities. Ail the nations coucerned ini war have dissipated their stocks of actual wealth. anergy in production, induced by high prices and id for the commodities consuined during the war possibility of replacement, wiil quickly begin ie adverse balance if permitted Wo act unhindered. ctions between i ndividuals in war-bonds, the t of taxes of interest on, and of portions of the the national debts will returu Wo them. the surplus lhe people's industry in the form of capital seeking Anything which checks industrial activity will antageous employment of this capital, and will ancial stagnation and trade depression. The romi any source of the whole of the national debt i unqualified disaster Wo the nation apparefltly y the extinction of its liabilities. lIn inany 's the possession of a large funded debt enables 3tore up its surplus wealth by permitting invest- Mn interest out of current taxation-the earnings 1 labour diverted to national purposes; the capital ýs withdrawn froxn a money market sufficiently Liout it. The ability to inake ae investinente rates of interest in national securities provides ilizer for the supply of industrial capital. inities are deinanded froin the Central Powers, surplus produets of their labour will be diverted mntries without the compensatinz neceusitY for AlIied products for the commodities received. with the existing supplies on the Alied maiketz ip and prices will ' be depressed unduly. The ,r will therefore suifer damage becaufe the goode ý,ed in the natural course of trade by exchaffl es. But in the case in point, the effeotsi WI",
         "48 THE UN not stop there. In order for themi the demnands of the Central Pow be satisfied. The bigger the ini be the surplus to be produoed bý demnand on available raw materis be euhanoed proportionately to tI countries. The inachinery of produ, and factories devoted to war-wc proesesof peace. The stimulus of these and other means of proti the defeated countries by the ne( indemnities, while the receipt of th petition for niaterials wiIl act in the victorious countries. Thus the Central Powers i seveial directions from the imposi time, it la true, they would enjoy they were creating. But labour 486",
         "DO INDEMNITIES PAY 8 the trade which flows in increasing volume acrois tional boundaries throughout the world. ny and its partners in crime must niake reparation darnage illegally committed against the lives and civilian non-combatants and must make restitution ,ks of comjnodities and xnachinery of indnstry r Plain robbery froni the occupied countries. But nations must beware lest in giving way to the to make their enemies pay their costs in the war- .uite just in itself-they should unwittingly do a great disservice and confer on their former very great actual benefits. Better forego indem- »eap the fruits of thrift and industrial prosperit.y, h accompanied by apparently onerous taxation, stagnation of trade and lessen the reward of etion by enforcement of their just dlairm. .ggestion bas been mxade that Canada should m Germany payment of ail its costs in the war. s prepared to accept that payment iu the product Lactories run by Gernian capital and produced by lustry, and thereby to divert to Germany the iLry to support its workmeu and the raw materials fabricate the goods-both of which xnay be more eded, say, in France or Britain or Italy, but added impetus to send themn there--Canada ;t until this demand was met. Wrhere individual lave suffered illegitixuate damage froni the ruth- ie Germans, by ail means let them be compensatd ,nd by Geruany. But thinktwicebeforepreesing mu for indemnity for the sacrifices willingly uinder- Scause of democracy and for the future securitY ies of the democratic peoples. 487",
         "THE INDWTIDUAL NOTIING, perhaps, in coi more remarkable than t) the last four years of the na strong national feeling may bi of deinocracy or antagonistic places first in its consideratioi or the welfare of the State. between these two conflictin",
         "VIDUAL AND THE STATE 48 thie knowledge that eventually there nmust be a ýtween the principle of State-development and iocratie development, which, spreading throughout d the world, has created institutions evidently Sto those contemplated by the State-ideal. entification of both Ksaiserisin and inilitarismn with Jleal is bY no means necessary. That bas been o the growth founded on the principle; it is not an irtion of the Conception. The glorification of the ,eadilY lent itself to glorification of the dynasty ,ing the State, and to the glorification of ilfitarismn itary class as the means by which the State-ideal )me the heresies of democracy. But that it can Durish apart from reverence for the dynasty and tion of militarism is seen ini the growth of socialisn r and in the development of socialism, into the the socialistie capitalist-state, which Dr. Paul *es lin his recent book, \" Three Years of World 'The central idea of the Pan-Germians, and of ies of German socialists, bas been the overwhelm-ing of the State in human development. The good the progress of the State, are placed above every Leration, including considerations of merely indi- ire. The subordination of the happineos, thie d the independence of the individus' to the. bhe power, and the influence of the State is the. ienoe of the application of this principle to national Âtutions. The happiness and prosperity of the ave their place i this pbilosophy; but they are ily in so far as they serve the interests of the State. te destruction of the absolutism of thie dynasty, iilitary machine created to preserve thie dynaaty of high-sounding talk of safeguarding thie State, ýal will not necessarilv uerish als. Probably it 489",
         "49 THE UNIV century, and m ore, the Germnan li their thoughts the idea of the 1 suprerne publie consideration. TI and army will flot alter that concel that the State will become mc\u003er preoccupation in the Geirman publi place in popular esteern hitherto Emperor. State-socialism ini Gei powerful impetus froxu the ab, rnilitarism. The State-ideal shouI may corne into severe coul liet commerce, and the economie sphe scarceIy hikely to enter after the people in this war. lIn Russia the State-ideal advent to -Power of the BoIshevl 490",
         "491 INDIVIDIJAL AND THE STATE àjol the hostilîty of the Allies lias been perforce directed, ,s the principle of democracy. That prmnciple is now-a- but vaguely understood even in so-called democratic xies. It is, in essence, individualistie. It puts the st of the individual before that of the State. Hlaving ,d the rights of the individual, it confers on the State -n powers and functions concerned with the preservation 38e rghts. In the words of the Anierican Deelaration dependence, the Charter of a demnocracy, ail men are ýqual and have an unalien.able right to life, liberty, and the it of happiness. The right of the individual is unalien- even the S\"at cannot override it. On the contrary, it secure the individual lin its enjoyment. n this war the conception of individual freedomn las phed over the conception of State supremacy. But ere be no inistake; it has triuxnphed at the expense of ces that, unconsciously and insensibly, have under- 1 the basic idea of democracy. In defending itself, ,racy is lu danger of destroying its own foundation. ood of the many bas rightly been placed first and fore- in the consideration of each citizen during the period imon effort iii antagonism to the dangerous forces had arisen out of the exploitation of the creed of State nacy by the dynastie and inilitary classes in Gernany ustria. In every direction the right of the individual pursuit of happiness lias been abandoned, voluntarily Ler legal compulsion, in order that the institutions wluch rown up to safeguard democracy nxight be preserved he Prussian vandal; in order that \"the world maight be safe for democracy.\" Life and liberty have been dered freely, or under conditions imposed by law, for me beneficent purpose. Now it is time to begin t the cost, and to prevent the destruction of the basic )le of democracy by the very agencies wioh have been 1 for its preservation and protection.",
         "49 TUE UNI VERSITY democraey, or tothe expedients by whic] ditýions are created and preserved inside the or state. Men and woxnen have accepted of personal liberty and of freedom in the pu~ provided that the riglits of others were n pursutit, which obtained in the past. But 1 habit of tracing the application of the de in everyday institutions. They are apt tc of their elementary rights to politician But in the circumstances created by the i and statesmen and governxnent officiais have tasted the sweets of power--of abnoe The politician knoWs with what ease the ci State xnay be utilized to suppress oppos tation to ail such to preserve their powers conditions which give them easy weaponý own interests, or the interests of their clasl At this tirne, therefore, it becomes the as it is also, a publie duty, to examine an( deniocracy, and to secure that there is t] of its observance in every direction at, tlJ moment after the return of peace. Ailowa for a period of demobilization, as it wer Bnergies and of readjustment from. war peace basis which tishoped to make pi ~State, 492",
         "THE INDIVIDUAL AND THlE STATE 493 happiness, not as a stereotyped product of State n, but i that'form ini which, as an individual, he iit to be embodied, provided that its pursuit doe inge the equal rights of other individuals. The 1a word, miust be subordinated to the individual. rnanner alone, runs the creed of the true democrat, highesIt develoPment of individual men, as the real human Society, be attained. The glorification of through the develoPment of each mndividual mexnber man fainiY must rise superior, as an ideal, to that of icatiOn Of the race and of the State, the narrowing tng conceptioni of the State-scalM and the Pan- AiRTEuu E. DAzoeY",
         "WATCHMEN 0F TH] VU lEN the gale is thundering throu night, and the elements batter agi it is then one's thoughts go out not only Grand Fleet but also to those of the naval watchmen of the seas. IJnsupported by of sister ships, as are the vessels of the hea and their ships have to face atone every of the elements and of the astute and stupe: of the enemy. What do the patrols of the seas do ? effeet very rnûch toward keeping the sea which corne the tea and coffee and cocos countries drink, also rnuch of the food o anid the world exports, too, not to mer strearning across the waters from ail part achievemnent of victory. For the Allieý Powers alike, these watchrnen of the sea on sentry duty. The vessels of the patrols accomplisi they pass Wo and fro, each on her appoin acting as our ears and eyes. In the N~ 250,000 square milles, in the Atlantic 30,00",
         "495 WATCIIMEN 0F TUE SEA )Id cruisers and destroyers, armed passenger liers, eau cargo-steamners, pleasure boats, tugs, trawlers, rs and yawls, sxnacks, and motor boats, ail do their patrols, in waters near and afar. Day and night the sea close and fine. You find the marine patrols mu the chiily waters on the edge of the Arotie Cirele itudes where it is always sumrner, and the sun makes vork bubble. The ocean watchmen. of Britain, Lustralia, France, Italy, Portugal, and Japan, and ,ison the great seaS of the world against the enemy. a British ship thus engaged cornes into port only six months at sea, to refit, or for some ail-important ýr crew often siglit no land in ail that time. Fuel, stores, and mails, are brought by supply vessels, mshipped at sea as and when the weather ailows. and nights may pass before a sal heaves lu sight, faint smur of a steamer's smoke is seen rising far horizon. The same desolate waters, the samne ainie routine repeat theniselves day after day, night for weeks and months, until the monotony, unl- news froni home or elsewhere, acts like a jag on and men, and the whole crew's tendency la to be Snappy. For although there are many patrol t live in almost continuous sparring witi sub- ere are many others that do seldomn fire a guzi Save g shot to stop a neutral or other ship for examina- ai, during firing practice. Yet these, too, keep ,inst a sudden engagement. 4ious 111e becomes with the crews exiled froml land 'intercourse is strikingly illustrated lu a letter froni ,les' A.B \" Up iu the far, very far north liere ery slow time of it, I cau tell you, \" he writes \"\u003c'lilY te moon do we siglit anytbing at ail. For goodnw iap, send me somle more parsnips in the next lot",
         "46 THE UNWERSITY MA pole for a day or two before the mail came, and small one, with very littie in 'Hlarry Freer messmates went round like bears with brokeý I sucked up to the Cookie (galley), and we cc a potato-and-parsnip pie for my mess, that is ail. Would you believe it-it acted as a rea* thing fromn home, like, and so our 'house,'2 back its good-humour.\" On board the motor boats, ex-tugs, Sine etc., utilized for coastal waters there is an absi and mucli naval routine that goes f ar to reconc men to the hardships of their lot. But with the 1 of them commanded by naval \" dugouts\"- left snug firesides and coinfortable pensions, t in rank now to those whom they remember a sub-lieutenants and senior midshipmen-th( samne as throughout the service, except for a f, to suit different stations. Ordinarily, however, at 4.45 a.m. the b( break the stillness of the ship with blasts whistles and shouts of \"Ail hands lash up, mocks.\u003e' At~ once every one on the mess deck a sluggard being promptly heaved out of his \" 5 to 5.30 a.m., hamxnocks are lashed up ar and hot cocoa is issued; then \"hands fail in', clean boats, etc. While ail this is going on, other watch, who have turned in at 4 a.m., sà mnocks below. But by 6.45 they also are hi mess decks. At 7.35 the bugle sounds \"Cle occupation lasts tiil 8, when the Colours ai person on deck then facing aft and saluting ' slowly travels up the halliards. lIniediatel is completed, the bugle sounds off \"Cooks,' 8.45 a.m. there is breakfast, and hands to clea UP deoks, \" and at 9. 10 the bugle sounds \" div. 496",
         "497 WATCHMEN 0F THE SEA .mi on the upper deck, and are inspected by their LI officers. After \"prayers,\" that follow, there is a iid-easy. Then the routine of the day goes on. And 'Y of the British naval seaman euch hour has its owfl le may have bis minutes of leisure; he certainly has 1 Of work-hard, quick work-no matter on board esel he la serving King and Country. re is no branch of the naval forces arrayed against the aid bis friends that lias so many different duties to as the British patrols. They range from keeping a )kout for the enemy, when he puts to sea, to searcbing ing mines and exploding them: from examiDilig )r contraband, to searching lonely sea wastes for the stores and hiding places, and a variety of other tasks. ly are the queer yarns these watehxnen of the sea cal' ,r mnany of these men, most of whom before the war ermen, yachtsmen, and merchant seamen, are heroca of ýst type, without realizing that they are heroes at ail; liey accomplish deeds that before the war could not ,n conceived even ini the most heightened imagina- ivid illustration of this matter-of-fact heroism of en las that concerning the blinding of a subinarine by ,e cre-w of a trawler returning on patrol. afternoon she was pu-shing along, when she was over- Y -a destroyer. \" Seen any submarines ? \" shouted the ýcer, as he slowed her down. \"There's, one reported etor.\" lie skipper of the patrol-boat, stepping to the side of py bridge, replied to the hail, bis eyes, after the man- [good mariners, roved along the waters close along- ddenly he juxnped back, and yeiled \"'Full steami o his mate by the engineroom telegraph. \" SubIflfr Ur Port beam,\" roared one of bis lookoute. With he * d over, the patrol tried to scrap away. The destroyer orward, to circle round to port. It was just theui that ýe firemen, who had corne on deck, a hamnier i bis",
         "48 THE UNIVERSITY right hand, sprang to port to get a look a waters marking the Gernian near at han( \" Ye blankety fool, what are ye stai skipper to him. \" Jump over, and second or two the fireman stared at the then holding stili bis hanvner vaulted with a splash by the nearer periscope top hamrner the lense of the sighting-tube we: The fireman struck out at the c missing it feil sideways on to the conning was now awash with the surface. As he sl the wild cheering of bis shipmates an( destroyer, on board whieh the officer con with exasperation, the upper conning-t and a blonde, blue-eyed face appeared ii ture. Only for an instant did the Ger amazement at the fireman, for the next struck at him with the hanimer, but, bul hatch, jammed it down on the BochE moment or two saw the U-boat plunging ( and the fireman struggling in the water. 498",
         "499 IIMEN 0F TIIE SEA me. An encounter as sharp and severe as niany that «n down with renown in British naval bistOY e engagement took place off the north-east Pa5sg i Scotland and the Faroes, as the \" Greif \" essayed to slip ,, vide waters of the North Atlantic. it 18 a frequent nce in these northern regions, for the patrols to board essels, and when the big steamer flying the Norwegiafl ith the Norwegian colours also painted on lier side, jan naine and home port, too, in two-yard letters, was ~ Alcantara\" hoisted the familiar signal, \" 1 ami going to OU.\" At that turne the vessels, fairly matched in guDe nage, Were separated by 800 yards. The \" Greif's \" clame, CiI am a peaceful merchantinan, flying the Nor- Fl1ag. \" Captain Wardle of the \" Alcantara, \" however, criuined to investigate, the patrols having been wariied Pected vessel. the British boarding cutter crossed the narrow water's ng the two ships the trick of the \" Moewe\" was repeated. d the German, her false sides were suddendy droppedj ing the guns, and a sheil burst near the boardiflg PartY- gun-crews were at \"action stations,\" with siglits set ,ch blocks snicked to, so that the electric needie firin is constantly ready for instant use. The engagement as opened the next second, the ships being so ClOSE ieemed aà if there would be a chance of boardiflg fot -hand fighting. ut was broad daylight, the. atinos ear, and the range se close that it apprOxinlhtd t4 9,nk firing. S\" Greif \" immediately tried te stand off, but the \"Alcali .itmanoeuvred lier. From stem to steril 81e raked th, and the German deeke were soofl a shanibles, andi o, In a few minutes the patrol had the prospect C",
         "50 THE UIVERSITY her out of control. Without a rudder, and propellers for direction, the \" Alcantara \" havi the British patrol drifted helpless, and becanm for a torpedo. One of these the \" Greif \" disl: a large hole in the auxiliary's side. By now the German was sinking fast, liglit cruiser that had been attracted by 1 opened long-range firing. lier flrst sheil, 1 \"Alcantara, \" dropped fair and square anuidshil with a terrifie effect, and the raider heeled o' The cruiser and destroyers were soon on t2 efforts were made to rescue the crews of both i of their nationality. Lt is interesting to, note that the crew of was chiefly made up of natval reservists and w mercantile sea.men, landsmen, fishermen, an who before the war peaceably carried on thei and pursuit 's. Great and ail-important is the part takei men of the sea.\" Some day when the great to corne, alack, ofthe Navy of Britain an breaks silence with his sonorous notes, and great and splendid achievements done in thk; of the Mother of Navies, he wiil hyrnn the fea of the Auxiliary Forces also. One would ther of \"Pioneers, 0, Pioneers !\" Wo sing of the Pa upon the world-seas. 500",
         "-PA-PERS FROM THE FRONT (1) THÉ MYSTERY MAN ý.-There is evidence to Show that for SoMe considerable timne conclusion of hostilities with Russia, RuWsan prisoflers of wa.r in virtu'al Slavery and put to work on Germai' defenees in the battie zones. Kept in complete ignorance of the course of events, loned by the Bolsheveist govermnent, these poor wretches have çed with the most frightful inhuxnanity. The incident narrated rred in 1916, when the Canadianis were defending the Ypies patrol crawled cautiously from one sheli hole te ther. Enemy flares were rivalling the briliance of \u003en. The gaunt stakes of the wire entanllgements Lip hike broken teeth. Occasionally a flash, followed 10cato crack, gave away the position of a nervous The impatient rat-tat-tat of a miachine gun came down the Ihie. h infinite patience the littie group of four Canadilins their way te a gap ini the enemy wire. Ears were to catch the sliglitest sound. The enemny inight also Uts out a-hunting. iW moan, barely more than a sigh, arrested them like 3hot- ]Bombs and weapons were gripped teIselY; r any emergency the patrol listened 'with every sena le moan again-to the riglit, on the other side of . A wounded ilun or perhaps a Britialler? The. riggled through the gap and saw that which inude SP in surprise. A bundie of rags froin which pro\u003c\u003e . shaggy, emaciated head, Iay on the lip of a SheU Moans, har\u003cfly breathed, came froýa betweeil thE lenched teeth, from which the lips wCTO \u003cfriawu away d, horrifying grin. The eyes roUied upwards unti] whites could be seen stared frightfully at the. bright rhe arms, outstretched in a sat effort, wer plunged rists in the loose earth. U-orrified inaction held tht",
         "52 THE uNIVERSITY soldiers spell-bound for a moment: then tf covered bundie of bones that seemed hardi; crater, and began the toilsome, dangerous Canadian limes. lI the company olficers' dugout the Iay on the low, wooden bed, covered wi battalion doctor was working over him, I spark of life alight within the terribly wori arxn, the bones ahnost protruding through skin, moved weakly on the bedclothes. names, \"Ivan and Olga,\" could be faitly the dirt, tattooed on the skinxiy wrist. 1 identity could be found. The \" Mystery M beyond doubt-but how did he get into \"J1 The doctor plied restoratives, and a ]Russian stood ready to catch the first woré The battalion officers stood around i sy awed by the bloodiess face, every lime on ýw endured.-starvation, cruelty, and overworl Weak, strangled cries of terror, and thc ing of the body on the bed, shocked the listi bent eagerly forward and the doctor signe( \" Mystery Mani\" was struggling back fr raving i a delirium of fear. \"I1 will work, ah God, a littie food!\" The words swelle agony. The soldier spoke soothingly and 502",
         "50O3 A NIGUT AT THE DUMP ,*here merciful death released ManY despairing wece a~ a fate that seems almost uneievable. Pu.med to the very brink of eternity by the fiendish \"lty of the ilun, van died with an agonizing cry fQr mercy his ftwuished lips. As the doctor composed the poor, ved and mamed body in the calmmleep of deahhe ,ed that the division should hear the story of the \" Mystery il. They would sSe to, it that just tetribution would b. ed out to thoee who have ma.de war a crime agaixist Hell. (2) A NIGHT AT THE \" DUMP)1 H1E location for the ,\"Duxnp\" was chosen because of its comparatively easy accessibility froni both the Brigade iches and the back areas. it is merély an open space close h. white-washed buildings of the \"Brasserie,\" divided off Sboarded sections, each one of ýwhich bears a battalion iber- Here at nights, with straw-muffled wheéls, fore- iers the batt*alion transport, laden with rations for the imin the line--a conglomneration of mule and hoese-driven -limbers that Seenis hopelessly muddled ini the darkneoe. And the language of the \" Dumnp,\" when the disgruntled Dn parties fromn the trenches arrive to make confusion se confounded, wili not bear repetition. Yet, in a sur- ingly short tixne, the mounds of bulging sandbaps filled 1 bread, bully beef, tea, sugar, coke and otiier esars h. firing Uine, soon disappear upon the shoulders of the iting infantrynien, who méit away like grousiJig ghioste the inaze of communication trenches, towards the. flar- ted fighting zone. But things do not always go à8 smnoothly, especialUy n a particularly inky night makes the use of lsigt gerously imperative. The Hunm on the. high grund in seetor can see the tiny will-o'-the-wlsps, anid red their ning correctly. During the. next haWfhour, -hn am y at the \" Dump. \" Who-o-o-ne-Bang I Their 5.9's arc tryiflg W put the iat on the. evening's ssintework that muât be donc.",
         "54 THE UNI VERSITY But, as usual, the bligliters are shooti heaven. \"Put out those blankety, blank ligli from every officer and N.C.O. present, ýv other, feels cailed upon to assume comn and doce, each in his own characteristie fâ Who-o-o-ne Bang! Flecks of fallini stone foilow the blinding flash. Uncoin one. The horses are quivering and fr, merely flick their long ears and gaze drea: The ration parties have prudently scatterE the Elun and ail hie works. Two more 5.9's in the same place, fo' that roars like a train racing through a tiu up the spine. Cr-r-r-wnp! The splas shows up for an instant the white faces of on to the heads of the dancing, snorti rushing air hits like a blow. The mules, death, shift wearily on their long legs. For an instant the burst intensifies th( the yards of earth and stone scooped up ai by the explosion descend in a dangerou huddled groups of men and animais. Maddened by the unexpected rain of stingingly upon their lean bodies, the mul( to violent life. and are rmarinoe. backiniz. 504",
         "A NIGHT AT THE DTJMP 505 ocession, have evidently retired to their dugouts. ;s and order are once more restored at the \" Duxnp?\" one the empty lixnbers swing out on to the road; and .eh parties, grousing at the Hun for lengtheing an Lnt job, shoulder their burdens and fade away. Slust linber has gone, followed by the mounted. trans- rer inwardlY thanking bis lucky stars that a smashed ýr two and a couple of lame horses are the evening's iualties. Far behind the flares waver into the sky, [y beautiful, marking the fighting âine where the tired IgrY infantryrnen are waiting for morning a.nd the ngs froin the \"Dump.yy J. A. HOIJLÂND",
         "PRESIDENT CLEVELAND' THE VENEZUELA ME W lIEN President Cleveland, on submitted to the Congresa Mr. regard to the British-Guiana Venezue] accompanied by a presidential messa startled by the unexpected crisis. Th that Great Britain had refused to subi question, which since 1841 had been between the two nations, unless her d( the disputed territory should be ackno) precedent to her consent to arbitratior Mr. Olney, in bis note to Lord Salishi territories acquired by reason of sue be as much wrested from her (Vene hand as'if occupied bv British troops",
         "507 r CLEVELAND'8 FORESIGUT of the questions deaIt with by Prscet MvoI] eat Britain was iinpoeing no0 \"'SYteM\" L a and was not concerning herseif in aIY W8aY ne of the political institutions under which ams iight pref er to live, and that the \" only Pa ,oinpetent to decîde upon a settlement\" by ariri wvo parties whose rival contentions are in issu1e. i third nation whieh is unaff ected by the contr\u003c\u003e' ;e this particular procedure on either of the ,nnot be reasonably justifted and bas no fouudà çv of nations.\" e B3ritish CGovernxnent,\"1 h went on1 to By, 1 with the view which Presideut Monroe apa ed, that any disturbance of the existi1g teri on in the western hexuisphere by any f resh wc the part of any European stat would b ut change. But they are not preparedto azhlUt nition of that expediency 18 clthe with the sail longs to a doctrine of international law. The bred toadmitthatthe intrsso teUie BUrily conceruied in auy froutier dispute whkch ween any two of the sta1tes who osef doriD rester U-lemisphere; and stili leas can they .9 ie that the United States are nite to claiir",
         "508 THE UNIVERIT'Y The President in lus esg Salisbury's positions touching the Me that \"the enforcement of the Monroi to our peace and safety as a nation, integrity of our free institutions and ti of our distinctive form of governr to apply to every stage of our nationail obsolete while our Republie endures to-day, it is necessary for the \" safeti Western Remisphere. It obviously was not a menace Great Britain should have the disp Venezuela; nor could Great Britain any sucli pseion, since it aiready North America, and had every oppc peace if it chose to do so. President Cleveland clearly did r~ from Great Britain. But lie saw that extreme 508",
         "RESII)ENT CLBVELAND'S FORESIGUT 509 [s or the exercise of governmental jurisdiction over tory which after investigatîon we have determined relongs to Venezuela. inaking these recommenclations I amn fully alive to )nibility incurred, and keenly realize ail the conse- that may follow.\"y eOmisusion was authorized by Congress and began on1 janIuary 1, 18M6. Instead of resentiiig by warlike the ringing words of this message, we find the uthorities at once offering to supply all information power to this commission; and in February, 1896 ,tion of submitting the Venezuelan boundary in ) mutual arbitration was again agitated betwee1 the Lates and Great Britain. commission kept on with its work, but on the 10th nber, 1896, Mr. Olney ugseasspnino Ç, saying, \" The IUited States and Great Bdta'iX tire accord as to the provisions of a prposedtrat Great Britairi and Venezuela. The treatY is8 0 i just and fair as respects both parties--so thoroughly the rights and dlaims of Vene ie a-that 1 cannol Df its not being approved by the Venzea Presideni press. It is thoroughly app!Qved by the counsel ol i here and by the VenezuGI\u0026U MiWBster at thL treaty was signed at Wasigo by the eree f the two cowitrie on the 2nd daY ofFerur o part of the territory in dispute wMi eevdfo rainwhikh it ceated. The arbitrtr e \u003e1118 in the city of lparis in January, 189,an md",
         "510 THE UNIVERSITY M was conceerned, in the year 1896. Foi At a time when the withdrawal of tl presenting for redemption of the five of currency against which' the gold million stood,--this endless chain of diately issuing them, to supply the n( threatened such a depletion in our gc as, i the language of IPresident Cle-, to face with the necessity of further a, This condition was intensified certain quarters of unusual apprehi business circles,\" and to quote Presi\u003c \" This unusual apprehension and tî the Venezuelan message, which seem end to a war with Great Britaiui.\" It became necessary on the 6th the gold reserve had fallen Vo about E to offer, kn order to buy gold, one h bonds to the people. As a resuit of the gold reserve, which on the last amounted to less than fifty million c that at the end of Febr-uary, in spit meantime, it stood $124,000,000. IJuring the period of the withdra the apprehension of the Governmeni Vo maintain the gold standard, S26'4 issiued in order to provide the gold notes which were presented at the t and not cancelled, when paid, but issi This great expense for imainta whieh was due to the hiszhlv artific",
         "511 PRESIDENT CLEVELA.ND'S FORESIGIIT .cKnlyand these Democrats, for years, were absent Nn the councils of that great party. Now, in combination with the economie loss and the stuction of a great party, both of which maY fairlY be meed to the Venezuelan message, it wa8 a questioni w1ether 'ras worth ail it cost, and this question was put to Mýr. -y by the writer at Washingto\u003en durinig the lust days of e. second Cleveland admiinistration. \"It was wortli aUl C0t\"was the reply of the Secretary of State. \" It was lit in1 order to establish firmly the Monroe Doctrine as \u0026ween Great Britain and the IUnited States, and therefore Rinst the ageson of other European nations, and to oid the neeessity of the United States aniigth ýat armaments which it woul be compelled to zuaintain re a certain power to acquire territory in South Aruerica.\" s~how the good resuits of thismesgan goitn, SSecretary produced froni bis drswer iu 1118 desk adouet ring, \"Rere is a treaty which has been completed betweeu United States and Great l3ritain, 80 far as the State ipartment can comrp1ete it~, referrnig RUl dispute betwea 1two nations t., impartial arbitration.\" Tis treatY a, unfortunately, not conirmed by the Senate. And tlius happily 'ras this dispute settled, and its ete ,nt ended not wily in the plscing of the two gra Northi ,lerican powers side by sieto protoot the Monroe Dotrn linst the world, but also iu the establishmnent of a new \u003endship betweeu Great Britain aud the United States. Great Britaiu, in 1898, stayed the other Europea powem mi intervention in aur wr with Spain, aud the pratial Àion of Admiral Chichester iu Manila Bay, *heai b. plaoced ships between the German equadron and Admlnal Dewey'8, ve the American nation knw-deof this new redhp ivu by her finding it uncc ýto keep largenval ees iu the North Atlantic, thus enablin ber to ocnrt *naval power iu home watm.s",
         "52 THE UNIVERSITY And when the grea't war broke o7u people had not forgotten this rec'ent had forgiven the old acts of aggressioi She had in 1877 made sucli atonement a tions of international law during the C for the most part were proud of heý the war against the military power wl for the strife for so many years, an( word. with Bélgium in order to gain took two years and a hall before th was impossible for us to avoid ei world strife, and the unanimity now could hardly exist had not the old sec Great Britain been wiped off the s1atb We know now that if the Unit( of the war and the Teutons had fini have had to face that power single-li When the question of war' or r us in the early days of 1917, the word,ý 512",
         "ADAM AND EVE ien the first darkç had failen around them, And the leaves were weary of praise, the clear silence Beauty found them, And shewed them ail her ways. the high noon of the heavenly garden, Where the angels sunued with the bii'ds, ..uty, before their hearts could harden, Had taught them heavenly words. len they Rled in the burning weather, And nothing dawned but a dream, auty fastened their hands together, And cooled them at lier stream. d when day wearied and niglit grew stYQIni And they slept as the beautiful mut,- eishe bided a littie longer, And blos8omed from their dust.",
         "SHEEX\u003e the slow thwnder of long s Where God has set no ses., es of flded sheep ini the qi Camxe on the wind to me. the low inurmur of full ti( Where tide shail neyer roll Ssent their mournful inarti",
         "HF, AUTUALITy 0F HOMIER' l are in the main, I think, three reasons whY it is Ii spite of such high authorities as Mr. HLerbert A Kasr Wilhem, togo back to Homer. First, he ns what Dante called blix, and ai goo jude after Dante have found hixn on the whole to l'e,- poeta. Hie is, by practically unnmu osn hio know and feel in such thiugs, supreife ini poet'y, 'being the ohief consolation is also the most edrn of mnankind, The second reasQfl is that theoetr le iiiaini l foepee The partsof its )be which seem farthest renioved fropi one ote ~Iieless, qute continuously conneoted; and it ol in some detail, if there were timie, that there is ie strand or thread 0f it which doos not ru bad\u003c ta you follow it quite thogh ence the study of way or another isarcl aY0i43Ible l'y ayn be really educated, that is to say alive and awake, intelligent and critical grap of the betterfor Grkmng in hÙnself and in the wvorld abou iID An Bason is thi\u0026. Real nùaywt U n ra n",
         "56 THE UNIVERSITY flnest pieces of literary criticisin in the our poetry flows from Greece: From Helicon's harmonious spi A thousand rils their mazy pr( IHelicon's spring is ilomer. We k hie was preceded by many hundred yeî successful artistie effort which left its N Up in our day from the palaces of Ciz Mlycenae and Tiryns, and which we:ý muci 110W quite 8llellt song-making c scope. But whatever may have gone 1 the m~iracle of beginning, the dawn of c' of all our rivers of life. It is still well our steps from our flats and marehes, ri of me andlowfever, o te hl, ad 1Ithii 516",
         "517 ACTUALITY 0F IJOMIER b one of thevery fletraieso lhu n fe- whieh, without more solid guarante than the wit e of man sow ayprospect ofbei be Ocoman form of throat-cutting ini whieh we find it in 11ome!, n muoli less graceful forms such as have latdly been familiar to us. ,e is quite a vast modern literature of daily inereas8n trine is prcaind wih all th evuro r. It is, of course, just as new and not one *bit ian the discovery that effort and pain, faznàle and e, wouds addeath e eis.I LP ii O s vr Dpportunities as colupared with ours, thoiWh coin- y speaking the battles of his dsy were more ota and~ pienies, Romner bad long 9,90 'nde that obswr H1e doea not like war s such at all. Wh\u0026t be doe the great and iudeed diin--igtl 80 nae b' man qualities wbkeh only war aud otiier Suèh xrn (in the Iliad the blody Stiife RgaInst other n, I86e' the fight againat Nature and tenP0fi\u0026db Dinz) are capable of fulY C21ling out.Ileis pad t IR1the",
         "518 THE UNIVERSITY]1 eloquent lambs whose bleatings whel wolves.\" Thiis irresitibly provoca peace! where there is no peace\" of course neyer heard from JI\u003emer. E theme of ail poetry under whateve Arms or Tools and Men. And yet t is fulof the scenes of peace. The earth or sea or Àky, not auy kind of rii day labour aznong the furrows or th sp, whkh he does not make a h iilustrating his warfare, and at the weary eyes away frozu it for a mon old rogue to his cock-fighting patror been that a poet cannot be expected o~r likeresses. But they miàght hav",
         "519 HIE ACTUA.LITY 0F IIOMER weofleet for h, nd barth 1 of merely saYing all that 's tO ige of hir speed and the noiset] them to.a mountain river coniing dc \u0026ys is this:-\" As whenon a d\u0026y ack beneath the heavy 8\u003c3owl of î trs out bis wildest ruslh of waer led bitterly against men that vi aients ini the seat of justice and the vengeance of heaveu-BMl t is rains, and many a ba.nk is eatefl Lmbling head forexuost from« the h. iud ani wasting the labours of th( labouring breath rau the Troi\u0026an ply this je not unllke FaIstaff'i )f bread \"to a vat de eof sa( -re lawyer's \"ce,\" and if thxe ru c. The poet is carried awty byh bis baûks no tees than. the fr ima n nislwl ot",
         "520 THE UNI' storm, to green mossy places in the that is axnong the lonely hills.\" How skilfully, too, doe Homer w-ays by means of a wealth of scenes I with fightiug. Let us look st some of ti bitter wouud of bis wrongs, aud his i lion that has had its mate torn fromai solitude snd mosning of the ses, dec is the short-lived passion of bis own everythiug cisc in that matchlcss firsi stiil greater as the vestibule of the nol and foreshadows. In the second, assembly with its immortal demago; father of ail mutinous plumbers, 1 iRussian Boisheviki; of thcm and th once, aud with hammers, for ever heu the afternoon; that peak-headed Ac] -Macdonald cloquent iu impudence getting-how satisfyingly !-his wag frnalest of small chanLTe left out. fr 520",
         "TIiE ACTUALITY 0F UIOMER al her morta son inhis hourof agish.~ Take alY One icenes, or a hundred others like themn. They scarcely 4thing except their f oil to the wax-spirit, the thnflls of matches, dog-fights, or gladiatorial shows--genuine as these are and perenmially hutnau so far as they go, ishly as they are elsewhere provided by this greate8t of xtists at their maximnum of force and fire. You mnay no Greek ever complained that there was too mucli in Homer. The Elizabethans would have had vastly ason to protest against the heaps of \u003ccorp8se with whieh i Shakespeare iuvariably leaves the sta~ge strewn in his ý8. e old Poet would have been surprised indeed if aflyoRe 3t Up to hlm the reproacli of blood-thirstines He tave said, like Warren Hastungs, that lie had a night to .ushed at his own moderation ini th3s respect. For theO )Oint about hlmn, the daring and epoch-Ikàkling origi- n lus theory and practice of the poe's art wa j I hie breathed a new soul, a really humai' soul to *hièII that wa-s humai' was alien, into the dry bones of thosE s of kites and crows \" whih had, no\u003e dot heen th( i trade of t/he minstrels before hxi. Mauy a bard, w( sure, had sung the tale of Troy and ceer tti~ arms of this chief and of that. What Horner did wai B out of that unpromising mnatenial an imra oi to say, an organie produet of that oretive aut Ition which is mnan's highiest mrclu it elci a complote picture as was civd a yl;ae and ther(",
         "~2 THE UJNIVERSITY MAGAZINE tained than theirs, of proportions as majestic to the full as theirs, and of materials even more universally significs.nt, beautiful and enduring. lluman passion and chara.cter, man's free wiil in that creative wrestle with the oppoe- rng necessities whieh has made man of him, the fruitful sweetness as weil as the fruitful strife of his commerce wvith Nature and bis fellow,-these things, the eternaI subsac of al high poesy, were the true interest and for the purpoee of art the dîseovery of Hoiner. Aristotie was riglit, as in hie oesthetie judgments he very seldom missed being, ini calling hlm the greatest of the Tragedians. And, as 1 hope we shal see, no mere poet has ever succeeded in renderîng with moe grandeur or simplicity or clearness the massive andi fixed foundation, the bed-rock on which ail beauty and sweetues and sublimity and liveliness must ever rest, the lawv of sacrifice which is the fundamental law of ail humnan and indeed even of ail considerable animal life. Hlomer does not reaily like war-he likes it mnuch less than Walter Scott, for instance,-and neither do bis heroes. They qulte share the point of view of Mr. Normnan Angell anrd so many of Nis converts, who much prefer the \" full dinnoe pail y and ail the other joys of peace. Odysseus had done sm fighting in his day, and yet lie gives, it as Nis profound cn viction that there is no consummation more devoutly te be wishied than when \" j ollity prevails among a whole pol n up and down the hall the banqueters sit in rows listening to4hi minstrel's voice with bread and meat upon the tables b h i side, while the cup-bearer draws the strong wine frornth mixing bowl and carrnes it around and pours it ini the cp. \"To bis fancy that seems,\" lie says, \"the fairest sihto earth. ~ But Odysseus is not so simple as not to nwta life, unfortunately, cannot be, as the English Tomissy \"ail beer and skittles.\" When Agamiemnon, in one of hs fits of the blues which alternate in him withmartial sii n overlordliness, proposes to eut Nis losses and get clearaayi the ships from lis Dardanelles Expedition, this sm dmu O1dyusey IX. sub i. ý22",
         "THE ACTUALITY 0F HOMER lowing bowls is the one whO upbraids, hlm bitterly as ,ursed slacker fit \u003eOnlY to be the captain of a crew of 1and not general of us to whom Zeus hath given from o old age our grim. clew of war to wind until 'wvery 801Û alperish.\" 11eknows q'dite weil, yousee, that War is But lie knows too that sômetimes there is no tolerable the Son of a Man to escape from descending into that id no way at ail except that dreadful descent of rising fter three days Vo the right baud of Power. The simple suggestion, that we migbt easily put a stop to ianging our sword-smniths,does not seem tohave oecurred Hie would probably have thouglit jt-since thougb [d have hanged Armistrong we, couldn't bang Krupp ilen or even Bertha-quite as clever an idea as it would *opose Vo abolisb lires by drowning the pump and reel Odys\u0026seus is aware that the trouble goes a littie ~han that. Hieseesminit, as hesays, the will of (3od; as ld say, the operation of the fixed laws of this world wnnot change, 1 f ear, Vill man's heurt is cbanged utterly; indeed, not until the wicked are \"st into eternal iared for the Devil and bis angels.\" pedon knows wbat Odysseus know s dda ble ifernes- bave said everytb3ng worth while ck to Homer. Ilere is a clear case, worth înarking. contrasts, ju8t when our Anglo-Saxon d)\u0026\u0026oraie .nnning to f ancy it could be 4iispensed witb, the English ian. ie wil be allowed to be largdly the produet of the ~Dcools, that Cliurob, as they may be called, buit upon Lof Ilomer againt which the. GaVes o! Hll have once is time entirely and deisvely failed Vo prevail. Taioe Sarpedou's wbiolx foll9ws and the word of Achilles:- that man as 1 hate dahs \u003cloors wbo speaks one thing tongue aud bides uiother ini bis beart.\" Put the two r and how much is left out of wbat bas made the 1 flf «cldhUiand 8flt eBis E pire ? you Win",
         "24 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE say it camne not from hlm but from our Hebrew Bible ? A188! the colour and tone of it, at least to my ear, seem rather to lie here. StI here, rather than in the Bethlehem Angels' soug! --Sarpedon is urging his friend Glaucus to, battie. This is his version of \"noblesse oblige,\" his and our nearest 'effective approximation thus far to the Son of Man who \"came not ix\u003e be ministered unto but to minister:\" \"1Wherefore, Glaucus are we singled out for precedeuce in seat and portion of meat and brimrning bowls in Lycia, where al men gaze on us as upon Gods! And why do we own broad acres along Xanthus' banks, a goodly demesne of orchard and wheat-bearing soil ? Now therefore we must stand among the. forernost Lycians and brcast the brunt «of battle, that so sorneone amnong the close-corsleted. Lycians May say thus of us: Nol inglorious are our princes that rule in Lycia and eat the fat sheep and drink the choice sweet wine. Nay it seems their valour tSo ùs prinely. They flght in the forefront of Ltjcia\u003e. ranks. \u0026weet friend, could we two be sure that if we escaped safe from this war we should live. on for ever free from old age and death, then would I neither fight among the foremost myse4f, i'oe wouldlIspeed thee on tothe flelof glory. But as itis, death in any case hangs ove? our heads in ten thousand shapes of fate wchich it may not be that mortal man can escape or y\u003eet avoid. Lft us8 on then! *We will win glory or give ilt another!' Note that \"or give it to, another.\" How that has rng through the ages lu cricket fields and Waterloos! Au echo rolling down with gathering volume some three thousaud years. Hector too knows the one thing ueedful. In bis augury there is but \"one bird,\" oue clear coniiandment lu bis Law, and Prophets, one signifying of Ileaven's wil for hlm that sums up ail the Commandinents and mnay reduce ail the rest whlen they seem to contradiot it into pestilent babble-aud that la \" (to shield his country's life \" with his own.' \"The day will corne when sacred Troy shail perlsh \" he is very well aware. 11Usid, XII., 3104328. 'Iliad, XII., 237-243. 524",
         "ACTIJALITY 0F I{OMER52 wrrow and eare and bitter hard work and daily grapple thi arc ini vain to roil baek that \"stone of Tantalus.\"p ,eh rather would he stay at home with Audroniache Astyanax whom he loves go dearlyl But there is e. lie mnust go out ail alone and meet the mnan- ring hands of Achilies. MLes himnself knows it. fis poor old Ionely father, ilovely 110W to bis goddess-wife who wilI not, lIve anY ,he saine house wlth hlmn, and holding in a very feeble Skingly sceptre at which the greedy ambition of the oung princes round hlm cast covetous eyes--old ýeds him sorely at home; a -happy 111e and a serene wait hlm there lu Plithia. This terrible youug \" tiger )rgt\"on the banks of Simnois plays the lyre sweetly. eet image ln ail the poetry of H-omer is put int~o bis \"Wliy, 1atroclus, art thou ail tear\u003c)\u003clden~ (\u0026cottice r\") like a baby-girl, that runs by lier mother's side lier pick lier up, plucking at ber skirts aud hinderiflg ý, and looks tlnough lier tears ather until she lifts ber .na.\" You eau see liow he loves bis frieud. 0f bis too, he is 80 geutie aud steadfast a lover that with dear nslveté, as of a geuerous boy who thiuks al \u003eple must be hile bujnseIf, lie canuot conceive of auy- than that \"all men love their wives.\" fie makesit reproach against the sons of Atreus--wlo are not iatterîis of domestic feliolty, either of them-li\u0026t in )Ieuce they forget that other people are not dillereflt m in this respect. flow rihly efdedfor ie is glorious creature of any poet's brai'! Methuselhl'8 days would leave the fire of youthlin hlm stili blazing. er lie hates deatli, or tbat the last word we hear f rom. * Odysseus meets hlm iu Sheol is still au execratioii \"I1 had rather swiink for day's wages for a lackland * ajs than rule as king among the dead and doue bis vital faekosfull surèly that if lie goes on :ie must die. flust and aslies on that long bright lock 1--;- 1 'rstve Seceos shall neyer have it, thougli 525",
         "56 THE UJNIVERSITY MAGAZINE it wus bis by vow. Hades shail have it in Patroclus' - The dank rnoulld mnust fetter the swift dread linha befo\u003c they have begun to fail. There shail soon be a flitting with squeaking voic~e like a bat's in place of that \"tail fel h'is hands,\" whose roar can rout an arly., And yet he g fighting al the sanie, and proves the old old story that not worth a beggar's rags or curse except to those whc fiund in it things that make it worth their while to die The fact is, ail those fighting Men are quite surpri like our own Tommies with their \" long long road to TIPI and the sweetest girl they know,\" or like Wordsw \"Happy Warrior,\" who Tbough lie be endowed as with a sense Anld faculty for storm and turbulence, Is yet a soul whose master-bias leaiis To homefelt pleasures and to quiet scenes. They do not fight either for pudding or for praise or b they like it. They figlit because they have to; becaus God's clear will. Death and wounds and inud and dus and files and army-plagues are horrors. There is pleasure in ripping up a feilow-man even though he Trojan or a Bo-fhe. He is after ail a brother. Ani contact, at the least little distance below the surface shows that. But, bad as these things are, there ame worse. Shazne and slavery are worse, shame for ever that wears a beard who will take intolerable wrongs, to b or any'others, lying down; a.nd slavery and outrages to death is a gentie kinduess for those weak little ones whc warrior loves, and whoxn a hen would face a lion and peck blazing eyes to protect. And so, though it le Most true, English-speaking people have thought this long tixne pàLý as even the Germans themselves have reason to thinli tia.t \"war doe not pay,\" circumstances are liable to and may very weil go on arising for several centuries which there is nothing for it but Hector's word:- \" Corne!I fight b1y the ships, all together. And if by spear or stroke of steel, one of you shail fail on death and 526",
         "THE ACTUALITY 0F HOMER, [et hlm be. 'Tis no foui grave he fills who dies defending' ,umtry. lie shall leave bis wif e and dear onles saf e behind à~is house and fields inviolate, if so be the foc toill go badc W mn home.\" {ow littie did we think six years ago that sucli words had pplication whatever to ourselves! Mr. Herbert Spencer billiard room at, peaceful Putney thought them infantine ~ifinitely remote. Alas, it is he not they, he and bis brand 'ynthetic Philosophy, but yesterday the last sbining birth le, that are now already f ar f ar away, quite dead and done Mr. Norman Angeil, too, as he sat like the King in lus ber countîig up the proceeds of bis beautiful demion- Dns that \" war did not pay \"-what was Hecuba to hiîm to Hecuba ? Even Mr. Gilbert Murray vastly preferred ides to Homer, and is now very tardily and reluctantly sed to discover the considerably superior \"actuality\" Solder and simpler and vastly greater bard. And iny bous friend, Professor Leacock, failing for ail bis lucidity esee our glorlous young flier Bishop and bis chance to, .ke an eagle, was indlined to think that the poetical Cana- ,ersion of Achilles and bis tossing helin was the shapely ,ck bat, and dazzhing onion-white in the stand-up coilar, Ir. Macuicoil of the C.P.R.\" as hie unarched to vahiant t upon bis Troy, the Montreal Stock Exchange. Where- point of fact, it is the Montreai Stock Exchang\"e, ln the ws, for instance amnong many other examples, of ail three :McCuaigs-and that with littie violence for McCualg Lply Gaelic for Aeacides*-~that has with conspicuous translated itself back again into termns of Homner, and Led not vainly on the Troy of our latter day violators. * ail the ashes of our most modern Economies the old rere burning with a glow we littie suspected-happily for t the world. How little did any of us poor blind mortals in those days that now sen far away behind the Flood- e Patronymie Aiak-ides iB ohviously what the Gaels would cati MeAeak, just MeCuaigl_ au Atrides is junt MacArthur, and MarPhail is just Pelidcq- ? ý,P.rPfPh a Montresler and vou find a Hiomerie Greekt I O groat is the",
         "28 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE ,we had ail corne like Frederick's objurgated soldiers to ti unconsciously for grantcd that we and ours had a right were \" to live for ever \"; the Everlasting Cross had faded our eyes, even when it had not grown to be an offence to i how very far we were fromn dreaming for a moment th.ý scarcelv the alteration of one word, Homer and the millennium before Christ would ever corne home so poign to our business and bosoms, or that wq were destined to bis consolations not least as our thoughts travel back te identical spot where his .Greeks and Troj ans fought theji fight, the spot soaked by so, much of our best blood, thi of Dardanus where Achilles wept, the racing Dardanelles. We -have found it stili true then after ail, as was hi from our wise and prudent but revealed to, babes like IH and Lord Roberts, that if we do not like war we musi sometirnes lump it. But the old poet has a littie more coi f or us than that. So rnysteriously rningled in our n fraine are the rnost glaring contradictions to the eye, it jh out of sucli intensest strain of effort and of suiffering thE keenest joy man knows cornes to, the light. Straightwa seul \" forgets, her sorrow for j oy that \" in this dread travi man îs born into, the world.\" What do you think la Ho characteristie word for battle, one of his fairly common Qi for it? Lt la xâpjun, that is to, say \"joy,\" from xcaLp rejoice.\"y In spite of his eloquent abuse of war, whicl whole literature of pacifism, from Eschylus and Euri down to Thornas Carlyle and Andrew Carnegie liai bettered, hie seerna to, sSe that man's specifie pleasure action not in absorption, in the football field and the stud lu the tuck-shop or in the wise Odysseus' and the ai Norrnan's, \"full dinner pail\"; that the highest and ke satisfaction can only be comeby at the very top of the tr( dint of clirnbing,-in the uttermost strain of war, the sur business of life. In short \"it is more blessed to give thi receive.\" And, surely, instead of bemoaning the fact there are individuals here and there se, conatituted that actually enjoy fighting, we should rather, like hlm, t 528",
         "THE ACTUALITY 0F HOMER 2 yven for this eXtreme case of the great blessed divXie law- worst that must be donc and should be donc can be donc, a'nd ioing of it may be an opening up of an undreamt fulness of As the German Kant says :-\" 1 ought, therefore, I can.\" Or shail we go as far as -people like St. Paul do, and Julian nfeil, that younger brother of Achilles, lyre and al? aifeil's view is, as it la iii substance Paul's, that there is no thing for anyone except the fighter who, holds bimself Lys ready to enter into bis own six feet of permanent ession in this fair earth of ours. No one has ever lived L1, lie thiks, who bas found nothing for whieh lie would be to die. But ail things are bis who 18 not afraid of the The liglit, the colour, and the musie, ail the \"joy in ýst comxnonalty spread\"' of ail the strong and keen and )y creatures that move in the sweet sunsbine. Ris heart i full of them that it goes down warmed through and Ligh even into the cold grave, and makes even that a mng altar-bearth for ever. -Weil, lie did the tbing he spoke Lnd earned bis riglit to sing for huxuseif and his great )any his swan-song, by a 11f e that was a fairer Poem even the song. H1e is one of those who died to save usail. The naked earth is wa.rm with spring, And with green grams and bursting tres Leans to the sun's gaze glorying, And quivers in the sunuy breeze. And life i8 colour and warmnth and liglit And a striving evermnore for these, And he is dead who will not fight, And who diea flghting w\u003ciaz increase. they flot indeed \"wton increase,\" our dead? Excet a of wheat fatothe grouandadi it abh lm bt f il t bringetk forth mtuh fruit. JOHN MACNÂUGTOMN 529",
         "THE BOOK 0F JONAH A LAY SERMON I N treating of the story we are to consider, it is not pr Ato say anythîng amusing. 11e who would try to in the matter of Jonah and the whale at this tiine would show bimself no better than a nuisance or, as N a bore, at the outset, and he who in seriousness succeî briging up anything in that regard that we have not already to exhaustion would in truth be a wonder. Yet it is here intended to look into the matter o aspects of it from a point of view not so commonly hqt emphasized in the pulpit; for the book of Jonah sh0u4 interest to ail conditions of mren, second only to that more powerful problem play of Job, an interest which long since have been more widely feit but for this sanie u incident or story of the whale ^which, with the unrefi throws a ludicrous or sinister shadow over the whole. Job'8 history contains nothing in itself impossJ even very unlikely, but here, ini that of Jonah, wi unfortunately at the outset a most tempting opportur the pseudo-scientist who, by the time he lias demolisl. whale to bis satisfaction, will have littie Lime or intel left for the treatment of the book ini its more didaci serlous aspect. Well, lt iL be granted that there are no whales Mediterranean sea, also that the gullet of a whale 1 admit the body of a man, and that a huinan being, evE had by some process been taken into a whale's sti could not have lived there for three days. Furthermo Joppa, where the story starte, was a centre of mi interest and head quarters for the worship of Dag, Philistine fish-god. Lt is also not to be denied t",
         "THE BOOK 0F JONAII a number of ancient fables of men or deinigods swailowed arine monsters and afterwards voniited up aive, so, that lea would not have seemed particuarly new or strange e Palestinian seeker after moral truth, aud 'would only wr as the pith sud keruel of the story or parable to such r own day as iniglit be inclined to, regard the shriveiled of Hindi myth as of greater import than the flaming of mnu. 'he book belongs to that class of literature of which we a number of aucient examples, wherein the author sets consider the age-long problem of the origin and existence il, usually attcinpting by more or less roundabout xls to \"justify the ways of God to men,\" like John n in later days. But Milton, it may be remarked, was ippier in his interpretation of the problem than his it predecessors, beiug obliged, like Dante aud others, or Christians, to create a nuinber of characters aud ions to piece out those lie found iu the sacred writings \u003ek from his own experience; nor have auy of the early 'e theiselves been more successful, as they usually wledge, in dealing with this'question of ail time-\" How il first come into being aud why is it suff ered to exist? \" uch investigations were uothing new iu Jonah's time, mnded to increase i seriousuess as the extinction of the ýw comimonwealth could plainly ho seen approacbing. ai the book of Habakkuk the writer perplexes himself to why Israel should be vanquished and destroyed politi- Dy a nation worse than itself, arriviug, as lie admits, at ýicaI explanation. 'lie subject is handled somewhat more critically in ijastes, the cynical writer beiug unhampered by the -iels of orthodoxy or the more poteut sud troublesome les of unbelief, but fiuding eveutually that one event to the good aud the wicked alike, a catastrophe- . . . .which is viewed Not quite as men are base or good, But as their nerves may be eudued, With naught perchance to grieve.",
         "~2 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE And in several of the psalms the same question is lool from widely varying view-points but with equally 1 factory conclusions. In what appear to, be the earlier is taken forgranted that the wicked always corne to misi Their crops or cattie are destroyed by the tempest a storm, their mulberry trees by frost, but yet even hei îs a lurking suspicion that such retribution is not of occurrence nor confined to those who deserve it. In t] documents the authors corne by degrees to grapple wii as they see and know them and not in accordance wi conceived theories. ,\"The rigliteous perish and no man it to, heart \"-whle the wicked \"are not in trouble a mnen, neither are they plagued like other men,\" and t latest of the prophets are driven to grope after a shado-V after wherein \"rnany of thern that sleep in the dust earth shail awake, some to if e and some to shame ail lasting contempt.\" The book of Job, so ably treated by Froude, that fi ing master of pure English, is the largest and most known of these argumentative documents; and here struck, as indeed throughout Hebrew literature in gent a straightforwardness and absence of convention wh writer both practises himself and makes it a point lx\u003e to, his nobler characters, a fearlessness viewed as impi our modem teachers for long enough but which, it w( well to, note, is not found, displeasing to Jehovah. Job is a good man. Hie says 80 himself and bis c this regard îs adxnitted from on high. lie falis before of calamities which he did'not deserve and will not w\u003c be explamned by conventional assumptions. In th~ though no clear explanation of the difficulty is reaci niaintains his assertion of integrity and bis inaker ac\u003c as just. The book of Jonah, at least as regards its inajo deals with the problem conversely. Here the quest are brouglit up against is not why good people shoulc unrighteously but why the wicked are allowed to go , 532",
         "THFE BOOK OF JONAH 3 di. The enquiry as we have seen, aibeit well-nigh desperate :)zIprehension, was nothing new in itself.-\" When I sought now this,\" exclaims the psalmist, \"it was too, painful for ' We have it here treated in parable. Nineveh is a city of three days' .iourney. That is to, say, author conceives of it, with oriental exuberance, as extend- a distance comxnensurate with that from Montreal to, Three -rs. Jonah betakes himself there without difficulty though it any miles from the sea coast, where he has been cast up in -ohedness and rags, and a stranger to the language and te of those he is going to preach to. But such considera- s of probability are rightly regarded as of no moment from literary point of view. What concerns the author and ýudience at this initial stage is that Nineveli is a city under- d to be given over to every sort of vice, and that no 111 Lt follows. It niight here be asked why Jonah should find it necessary \u003e80s far afield to, find an example of successful rascality on rge scale. Other writers of the period'are certainly not ler to the sins of Jerusalem and Samaria. Lt is probably c tendency in huinan nature to, criticize what lies a way off, and perhaps to, increase its proportions and e the farther one gets. Lt may be recalled that when Stead in our own day found himself charged with a siniilar ral message he had to take it from London across several wiad miles of sea to Chicago. Be this as it mxay, the r i brief is cast into, an easy and convenient form for the ission of a most perplexing, a well-nigh overpowering lem. It is altogether likely that there was a character i real ,orresponding to Jonali, just as there was likely Wo have a real Job. We corne upon Jonah in several of the itings,\" and i the book of Kings he is shown, with some lcularity, as prophesying in the days of Jeroboam Il. fli even have had adventures not unlike some of those bcd Wo him, for bis story certainly excitcd a great deal of est and stands out somcwhat prominently in both the 533",
         "54 THE UNI VERSITY MAGAZINE Old and New Testaments. It is also worthy of notie these references he is spoken of with unfailing respect, N ini the book bearing his naine it îs bis faults only t] brought into notice; frorn which last circuxnstance it is 1 to infer that the story in its original forin was written man himself, repentant and conscious at length of bis f and was expanded with miraculous embeilishinents by editor and moralist. At any rate this son of Amittai feels the inward go and preacli against the vices of Nineveh but, like Jei like Moses, like ail great prophets or denouncers of is at first unwiiling to respond and, fiercely struggling the impulse, takes slip for the distant Tarshish, as before hiin had made lis escape into the desert. H1e cornes before the reader as a person of mea pays the passage money -asked of hlm without dernur altogether possible-there is nothing in the record to diet it-that Jonah may have embarked here upoi commercial enterprise, no doubt an excellent receipt 1 now for stifling the voice of conscience. Next folli account of the tempest which overtook him, exce, graphie and well written. Here we observe that Jonah, fieeing before the voice of bis God, was in other resp coward. IJnlike Asaph and so rnany of the psalm wri, is not at ail what we would cail in these days a nervous: and throughout the hurly-burly of the tenpest, thE and confusion, lie is asleep. Being at length awaken identified as the cause of the disaster, le calmly advi mariners to throw him overboard, explaining at the san izn his prophetical character that if this be done the t will cease. And here first cornes upon our notice one principal characteristics, perliaps the keynote, Of the story or poern, its tone of rernarkable hÙunanity. Ev ini the book, froni Jehoval himself down to the poor searnen, is good-natured, everyone, that is, except one 1 but comadig figure; and the contrast is no doubt ( sized by the clever ivriter or editor of the tale, with int 534",
         "THE BOOK 0F JONAII53 The character of the Shipmaster and his followers is D well brought out. Simiple, well-meaning, and superstitious, y are xnuch like the sailors of our own or any other time. first they refuse point blank to throw the prophet into the even at bis own request, and when they have finally to, iseut, they offer prayers -and sacrifice at the same time It there miay be no punishment for the shedding of innocent od. Jonali then, being cast into the sea, is swallowed by fish and after three days thrown Up again alive. The writer here, for the working out of his problem, kes use of a legend or legendary basis not uncominon iii Lthern and eastern lands. Several Brahin and other ths, as before mentioned, tell of Krisha and other heroes swallowed by marine monsters and coming forth again still _ng; but there is a wide clifference between I{ebrew teaching, mn at its crudest, and theology like that of I{industan. The tale of Jonah has an ethical m eaning throughout, and objeet of this incident, it is impossible to doubt, is to strate the oninipresence of the Deity, an idea not promnin- ,ly brought forward iii the earlier books where, for instance, have Jacob astonished to find Jehovali, his father's tutelary -inity, whom hie left at home at Beersheba, located also at Lhel, twenty or thirty miles off. But Jonah, froni his erances, must have been well acquainted with the later iptures, for he reproduces their language in several places his own, though their more developed cast of thought he ýs not at first quite chme in with; and this detail in the ry might weil have been suggested by some of the more riprehensive of the psahns or by the very simular suggestions A.mos :-\" Though they dig into the abyss, thence shail my id take theni. Though they club up into heaven thence 1 1l bring theni down, and though they be hid from my kit in the depth of the sea thence wil I cominand the ser- it and hie shail bite them.\" Jonah, with ail bis faults, is a straightforward person. ere i8 nothing shifty about hlim and when his prayer for iverance has been granted he gives up ail further opposition 535",
         "~6 THE UJNIVERSITY MAGAZINE and prepares to, go and preach at Nineveh as at first instri- He does nothing by halves. Hie puts his whole energy the business. le goes into the city, a day's journey twenty odd miles, and there opens his mission with such si. that the men of Nineveh are converted and reformed, an Almighty, seeing this result, decides not to carry ou intended program. of destruction. \" But it displeased Jonah exceedingly and he was angry.\" Here we have a touch of real buman nature. own\u003e sin has been forgiven upon repentance, whieh seer hlm right enough and quite natural, but when, it coin forgiving other people and they strangers at a distance,' bis reputation as a prophet is at stake, he Îs bitterly opl to, any such moderation, nor does he stop to pick bis 'w \"Was not this my saying while I was yet i my cou]n Therefore I hasted to fiee unto Tarshish, for I knew that art a gracious God and full of compassion, slow to angei plenteous ini mercy and repentest thee of the evil;» an~ Maker makes rejoinder in briefeat phr ms-\" Doest thou to be angry? y We have now the incident of the gourd whose unUi fading away forces upon the unwilling prophet a meas reflection followed by doubt and mental disturbance, t length the sentiment of pity ia called into being though a only for a plant. Hitherto we have seen hilm fighting ag the impulse of humanity which may nevertheleoe have at the bottom of bis character unknown to hmef llngered in spite of his logic, and flnally have impelled hi write the book in which it la made to, well up so itic everyone but the chîef character. Axnong the final echoing clauses of the tale or ru cornes a note sounding to our ears almost modern. r~ hast lad pity upon the gourd-which came up i a ih perished inI a night, and should not I have pity on3 Nin that great city wherein are more than six score tiiu young chiidrcn and aUo much catie ?\" 536",
         "537 TIIE BOOK 0F JONAII ;oxne centuries later we find Saul of Tarsus (perhaps the \"Tarshish\" to which Jonah had sought to fiee), though ,her of Christianity, harking back to, the old mean view lould have lef t far behind and asking of his converts h God care for oxen ?\" Why no, of course not, being aplied answer. But a wider Christianity, an ethos more 3ping with the teaching of Saul's master or even of this Old Testament record, iniglit have shown hlm that, ;h it lies not wiîth us to fathom the divine actions or )se, yet would Jehovah be held Father and Lord, not of Israel but of mankind, not only of- huxnanity but of oor over-driven ox and of the perishiiig gourd, of the cw, the sunset, and the star. Uh book ends abruptly leaving this laut question unan- ci, and fitly enough go, if its object is to get people to and not to dogmatize. Yet we have hardly reached to, ntral core even in this our own day, let alone provided ition. 'Doest thou wel to be angry ?\" \"I do well to beangrY,\" lonah, 'ieven unto death.\"1 No hypocrisy here, no con- :)nal cant. What Jonah thinks he says, and his bluntness no0 offence because he is in earnest; but when the still voice repeats the question, when reflection, borne and Led by acutest physical suif ering upon an undisciplined but ss and not ungenerous mînd, has had tirne to work, only ,nswer is possible. 1118 reputatioli bas not now to be- 'ained at the'expense of justice. The fauits of Nineveh nger hold him to the exclusion of bis -own, and in such cr we may imagine him as thinking out the various ings of the story to their ultimate conclusionl. In bis r strain of exile the poet could only long for the courts a holy temple-at Jerusalem, but uow ho comes to wish bouse not made with hands, for a coutinuiflg city whose Pr and maker is God, and might be thought of as suiiUXUllg s conclusions, helped by bis familiarity with the Fealmel, ne sucb language as the following halting strafl:",
         "W38 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE What shaHl 1 answer, how reply Or lift zny voice to thee- Whose presence filleth earth and sky The waste, abyss and'sea? Should I the ocean caverns sound, The wings of morning bear, Creator, Spirit passing bound, Thy presence stili were there. The ocean mirrors wide thy face, Thy altar walls the sky, Each blade of grass thy dweUing place, Thy care each sentient cry. Thy breath goes forth-the forest thrills And ail the glens rejoice; And glad, upon a thousand his The wild ex knows thy voice. Then, if thou bid'st me seek thy face, Though faint my faîth and weak, No longer would I flout thy grace, But inly hear thee apeak. Thu8, though I wither far from. home, I bow beneath thy rod, And humbly answr--\"Lo, I corne To do thy will, 0 God! \"",
         "THE LOST ANGELS Into what light or'dark'have fied, And are they, quick or are they dead, Those three great angels earth once knew, Thougli of their deeds remembering few ? Little beside their names we tel 0f R-aphael, Michael, Gabriel: Archangels tali but friends of men, The strength of each the strength of ten. And where, too, is that star-led host That came to, earth when needed most, But neyer brought to us again Its midnight music for our pain ? Have they to utter silence gone Who fiiled that night with suddeuý dawn, While ail the kings were fast asleep, But shepherds watched the stars and sheep? Have we grown blind who could not see E'en yester-year the shining Three ? Have we grown deaf and cannot hear The carol plain to shepherd's ear ? Or have those three tail angels sped Elsewhere their benisons to shed? And has that heavenly host gone hence On other far beneficence ? Do other souls, once sad, now know Our visitants of long ago- Souks in those stars mysterious, seven, Known to St. John who saw new Heaven- Were they assuaged of a distreffs Like cur own bitter loneliness; Hearing with joy, as sung to, them, What shepherds heard near Bethlehem ? RoBDaiT STANLET WEiRi",
         "THE CANADIAN ANTI-SLAVERY GROUP B EFOE theopening of the Civil War, the majorit had abolished slavery throughout lier dominions in 1K, fact which inclined many Canadians to assume somethix a smug righteousness in the presence of the evil still exil ini their neighbour's country. It was a cominon, taunt thu at Yankees that they were'siaveholders or accomplie( slavery, and, curious thougli it may seem, this attitude more pronounced against Northerners than against i Southerners who occasionally sojourned in Canada. 1 was, however, a certain element of the Canadian people ineasured the slavery issue ariglit, saw their own relationi that of their country to the evil, and proceeded to do'ý they could to end its existence. And 'this group renc service to, the abolition cause quite out of proportion to mere numbers. Leaders of the movement ini the U: States have left on record their appreciation of the work was done in Canada at a time when too many in the Iý were apathetic if not hostile. The Canadian abolitionists miglit be conveniently di' into three main classes according to the character of contribution to the cause, thougli the actual services QI one of them, might, and often did, fail into, more than one class. There were, first of ail, .those daring adventi spirits, of whom Dr. Alexander M. Ross would be an exai who, regarding their lives as of smail account, went righl the heart of the slave territory and brouglit out or asE to freedom those negro slaves with whom they could @ toucli. More risky work on behaif of freedom was done in America. In the second class miglit be place, work of those men, white and black, who, like Rev. Wl",
         ",NADIAN ANTI-SLAVERY GROTJP K, Josiah Henson, Rev. lirMM Wilson, Rev. Isaac J. Rice Henry Bibb, devoted their lives to the uplif t and better- .t of th~e refugees from southern slavery in Canada, and showing what the black mani could do in freedom, Ak mightily at the shallow arguments regarding the ,fits to the black maxi of a state of servitude. The third class would include those who worked to create [ic sentiment against slavery and to, promote publie rest in the victirns of the system who camne to Canada, ,ignorant, and dependent, but finding in British freedom which compensated them for ail the dangers and diffi-ý -es of the flight north. li this clasm would corne the narnes ,ev. Dr. Willis, principal of IKnox Coilege, Toronto; Thos. ning, Toronto, for long the secretary of the Antî-slavery ety of Canada, as Dr. Willis wus likewise its president; . George Brown, editor of the Toronto Globe; Gordon vn, bis brother, and associated with hirn in- the editoria agernent of The Globe; 11ev. Wm. McClure anid John er, of London; Principal MeCullumin f the Hiamilton High ýo1, and others, including ail who were associated with work of the Canadian Axiti-slavery Society. A'bdubtion of slaves frorn the south was a deadly blow to -ry becatise it unsettled the whole'property syStein of that of the republic. That was the particular effect of the per\u003es Ferry raid M\u003c by John Brown. Hie who went into slave states for the purpose of bringing out slaves knew well that detection would probably mean lynhmhng. Yet the south these abductors went, nonie braver ini this ect than the escaped slaves who, bëtter than anyone knew the dangers. There are plexity of cases on record re escaped black men went south after wives and childreny -trnes having to make repeated trips. Redpath;' in lüs blie Life of Capt. John Brown,\" makes the staternent as rnany as 500 persons went from Cana \"da each year the south to bring out others. Josiah Henson, hiinself a ;ee, dlaims to have assisted no fewer than 118 people to tom, while a woman, the famoùs Elarriet Tubmn, je",
         "52 THE UJNIVERSITY MAGAZINE~ credited with bringing more than 300 -slaves to freedo niaking nineteen trips for that purpose into the south. 1 Alexander M. Ross, famous as a naturalist, likewise wi repeatedly into the south before the Civil War and sprE everywhere he went the news of the land of freedom to i north. lus memoirs speak definitely of thirty-one sia' whýom lie aided ini escapfing. Fifteen of these he met varjous 'negro settiements in Canada in the course of a tÀ made in 1860. The plan followed by Dr. Ross in his - w( was to go to a town, pose as a naturalist hunting birds, 2 then, as hie roamed over the plantations, *get in touch .'w discreet slaves who could carry his tidings to their fello' The risk lie ran in this can be imagined, and on more than occasion it was alinost a toss-up for lis life. luis last south journey, made early ini 1860, resulted. in bringing a man i wornan fromn Kentucky to, Canada. The indirect influeý of his work must have been very great. Thougli he was a~ to bring out but a few of those lie talked with, the newe Canada was carnied far and wide and probably started mi others on the long journey north. The second group of the Canadian abolitionists incluq men and women of noble character who gave up much serve their fellows. They performed, too, a most import service as \" receiving agents\" ini Canada for the '\u003cpassenge who came in by the Underground Railroad. Rev. lii Wilson and Rev. ]Isaac J. Rice, both graduates of Hamijl College, were associated for somne time in the conduct o mission for refugees at Amlerstburg, tlien the most import point of entry for the fugitives. Wilson was later associa with Josiali Hienson in the educational work for negroes c ducted at the Da'wn settiement -under the naine of The Brii and Ainerican Institute, and still later lie is found residin1 St. Catharines, Ont., giving bis whole time to receiN fugitives and looki.ng after them. In a pathetie lettV *Âd\u003crssd to\u003c Ww StiIl and quoted ini bis '\u003cUnderground Railroad\u003e\"y Pl 1872, page 42. 542",
         "CANADIAN ANTL-SLAVERY GROUP 4 a~ ini July, 1855, after speaking of the safe arrival of uigitives and of the efforts made on their behaif, he says: [y means of support are so scanty, that 1 arn obliged to write with- ing postage, or not write at ail. I hope you are not rnoneyless, as lu attending to the wants of nurnerous strangers, 1 amn ruch of the r$lexed froni lack of means; but send on as many as you eau and I [de with theni to, the Iast crurnb. i Levi Coffin's Reminiscences there is a reference to, Isaac Rlice which throws some, liglit on his character. during bis trip to Canada in 1844 to see the condition fugitives so many of whom lie had assisted at Cincinnati, .Amherstburg and stopped at the Rice mission school Dured children. Speakig of the mani who, was directing rk he says: ý had labored here among the colored people, mo stly fugitives, for \u003es. He was a devoted self-denying .worker, had received littie -y help and had suffered rnany privations. Heý was Weil sîtuated as pastor of a Presbyterian church, and had fine prospects before believed that the Lord called him to this field of rnissionary labor ,he fugitive slaves Who came here by hundreds and by thousands, stitute, ignorant, suffering frorn a11 the evil influences of slavery- rèd into deep sympathy with hirn in his labors, realizing the gre-at re was here for just such an institution as he had established. Hie ,ered at this missionary home many hundreds of fugitives tiil other )r thern could be found. This was the great landing placoe, the terminus of the Underground Railroad of the West. another type was the work of Rev. William King- -riage in Louisiana lie came into possession of a nlumber ýs, and desiring to free them he brought~ themi to Canada. that his duty towards them was not fully performed act of manumxassiQn, lie proceeded to provide oppor- for them to become independent and slf-sustainig. ), charter from the Caaia overimCft he est\u0026blished ras knowu as the Bluxton stilemejit, located in Kent not far from the shore of Lake Erie. This 'vas by far ist succ~essful attenmpt at founding a diatinctly negro iu Canada, and B3uxtonei ven to-day retains this er. Kingrmîe with his black people until 1880 543",
         "44 THE UJNIVERSITY MAGAZINE and died in 1895. The original settiement, sometimes kn \"ls as the Elgin settiement, was dîvided into plots of : acres which were sold to the refugees at a low price ani annual payxnents. The colony made progresa from the si and its sehools for the coloured youth became known in United States as well as in Canada. The moral conditions rounding the settiement were of the best, the absence of ci being most marked. Henry Bibb, who also made attempts at colonizal was a refugee who reached the Detroit River region ai early date. From 1842 to, 1844 he lectured throug] Michigan under the auspices of the Liberty Association w was promoting the election of anti-slavery candidates. 1850 he advocated the formation of a society which sh, purchase 30,000 acres of Canadian goverruent land locate negro refugees upon it. Such an association was for two years later and bought about 2,000 acres of land ini E county not far from Windsor. This was divided into, 25- plots and forty of these plots were taken up in the first ý Dilficulties arosè, however, regarding the terms under w the land was sold to the negroes and the Refugees' Hom, the settlement was called, gradually waned. In additio: bis other activities Bibb also, conducted a newspaper, Voice of the Fugitive, which chronicled the activities set forth the views of the coloured people. Bibb died in early fifties, and after his death his wife conducted a se for negro cbildren at Windsor for somte time. The third class'of the Canadian abolitionists imcl, those who were chiefly distinguished as propagandists, th( it must be remembered that these men were in most c equally interested in iniproving the condition of the refu then in Canada. They did much to arouse the intereE their fellow-citizens in this opportunity right at hand tc up the fallen and help the poor and distressed. They lie to create in Canada that sense of moral responsibility for slavery evil in the UJnited States which wua emphasizec the Fugitive Slave Bifi of 1850. The organization of the -A 544",
         "CANADMAN ANTI-SLAVERY GROUP 54 rery Society of Canada camne at Toronto in Feb., 1851. objeets were declared to be \"to, aid in the extinction of 7ery ail over the world -by means exclusively lawful and ,ceable, moral and religious.\" Rev. Dr. Willis was the t president; Rev. William McClure, corresponding secre- Yr; Capt. Charles Stuart, secretary; and Andrew Hlamilton, isurer. An active campaign was begun, branches being 3,blished in other cities and towns, a ladies' association anized to, relieve distress, and prominent abolitionists, )rge Thompson and Frederick Douglas among others, were ught to Canada. TÉhe society continued active right into, Civil War years and did not end its activities until ancipation had realized its aims. Typical of the extent of work is the report presented at the annual meeting held nil 9, 1857, when it was stated that in the past two years re had been expended £444 7s. 7d., between 400 and 500 igees having been assisted. Hon. George Brown, editor of The Toronto Globe, was of Ca.nada's strong aposties of abolition. Hie had spent eral years of lis early manhood in New York and had ri something of the domination exercised in United States Lirs by the pro-slavery element. Coming back to Canada was at once interested ini the fugitives, and besides many s of personal kindness made The Globe a medium for %ding their cause. At the 18-52 meeting of the Anti-slavery îiety Brown spoke very plainly on Canada's duty ini relation the slavery issue.* It was a question of humanity, of ristianity and of liberty, he said. Canada could not escape contamination of a system existing so near her borders. \" We, too, are Americans,\" lie said. \"On us, as well as on thern, a the responsibility of preserving the honor of the continent. On us, n themn, resta the noble trust of shielding free institutions.\" Though less in the publie eye than his brother, Gordon \u003ewn is credited with having exercised considerable influence determining The Globe' s attitude to slavery, and its later ' Toronto Globe, March 27. 1852. 545",
         "56 THlE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE attitude to the North during the Civil War. George Br had, of course, been an abolitionîst orator for years beforE war and miglit have been expected to stand whole-heart behind the North. But as Canadian sympathies, folli the example of the \"classes\" in Great Britain, tended du the war to, be alienated from the North, George Brown somewhat inclined to hedge. It was, at this stage that Goi Brown, more of an idealist, threatened to resign and leave Glob\u003ee unless hie were given a free hand regarding the sla- issue. The stand taken by Gordon Brown was so weil ku that after the close of the war American citizens residin Toronto joined ini presenting hlm with a gold watch, suit inseribed. \" Gordon Brown was the heart, soul, cour inspirer and real maker of The Globe in so far as it wa honourable and consistent anti-slavery paper throughIout war,\" is the statement of a former editorial colleague of 1 the Browns on The Globe. Rev. Dr. Willîs, the president of the Antî-slavery Soc ail through its eistence, was a fine type of Presbyte clergyman, scholarly, cultured, a strong platformi speaker influential in bis comnxunity. Dr. Willis neyer had smn( words Vo varnish the stains of slavery and more than one' was cailed upon Vo rebuke the attitude of those who, cal themsclves Christian, condo-ned the great sin of the~ tiù The Canadian churches, with the exception of the Pret terian church, were inclined to regard slavery as soniet] outside their domain. At the 1857 meeting of the A èlavery Society, Dr. Willis declared that it w\u0026s th~e du~t, the Canadian churches to remonstrate on the matter, thought that a day iniglit weil be set aside at ail synods conferences for prayer and humiliation over the f\u003eaot slavery existing so nearby. There were some churches str on missions but strangely silent on slavery. At this same meeting Rev. Dr. Dick said that churches were the \"bulwark \" of the slavery systeni. Chur( ini Canada were fraternizing with those in the Uihted St that patronized slavery. Another speaker, James1, 546",
         "ADIAN ANTI-SLAVEIiY GROUP 7 if the churches would do their duty, slavery would a single day. wsionally there was a spirit worse than apathy shown. reh, a denominational paper published at Toronto, Canadians were not un \u003eder amy obligation to denounce sory labour,\u003e it was quite enough to stand by and the slave when he came to Canada. The Globe, cullng the citation of seripture to back up this view, 1: \" It is truly mielancholy to find men in the l9th beaching doctrines which are fit only for the darkest *e were many others besides those mentioned who good service to the abolition cause, though there was ,d to any save the knowledge of deeds well done. ýe was not always popular and sometimes there was ticism, yet this band of men and womnen worked on r year, doing what they could and witnessing by their their belief in the brotherhood of mnan. Most of ve been long forgotten, not -even the names are red, the records of their deeds were neyer written, or i have perished; but in the making free of a great eir part was not small. They made real and living 1 boast of Englishmen everywhere that bondsmen reathe their air and remain slaves, and in doing so Ssoldiers in the great fight, still going on, that aims ~Ll the world free and men everywhere brothers. FRED LANDON 547",
         "RIGHTEOUSNESS T H E experience of the world during the last few y giving us reason to believe the saying of Solomco \"righteousness exalteth a nation;\" for we are being clearly that um'ighteousness does flot. There is, therefore, an inclination fust now-t, righteousness with respect, as being, at the lowest esi a good national policy. Lt is likely that if, in the mai the late Mikado's decree which made Japan a CI nation, we had to settie by referendum, our choice of rigi ness or the reverse, for our national Une of conduct, rigi neas would be adopted by a large majority. The trouble, however, is that no nation can 1 Christian unless the people are individu aily Christiai no nation can become righteous unleas the people ai vidually righteous. Lt would be well to examine what righteousness is, If ever there was a nation who thought they were d to'righteousness, it was the Jews, in the time of oui They possessed the distinction over ail other natioi they were selected by God to be a peculiar people. Th both public and private, was essentiaily a religious lil regulations, founded upon a Law which they believe\u003c given from God hiinself, were intended to carry the obsE of that Law into the, life of the people. Yet we hai told, on the bestauthority, that except ou.r righteousne exceed that of the Scribes and Pharisees-the particu] duct of the Jewish effort after righteousness-we enter the Kingdom of Heaven. Iiighteousness, then, îs not to, be accomplished most devout attention to religious observances for thi sake. Lt is the result produced in the man which is rig ness. Righteousness is, in fact, inseparable from chi",
         "RIGIITEOTJSNESS 9 It seems, therefore, clear enough, at first sight, that lwe L give our attention to what is called, \" character building\" cultivation of virtue must be the \u0026im, of our schools, and ,.s must be a principal subject of study. But what hope there be in going back to, heathenism ? The study and vation of virtue bas been tried as it can neyer.be tried 2. We have not the mental powers of the Greeks in this ýtion; and, knowing how they failed to, produce any per- ent result in themselves, we could have no hope in re- ng their effort. The effort to produce virtues is, in fact, futile. Virtues rise.no higlier than their source, the nature of man. For Individual, perfection of virtue is attainable only in those .es with which he was born. They are powers of mînd; imited, like other powers of mind, to the mould in which flan is cast. Anybody can, by hardlabour, learn to read C, to draw, to address an audience; but the height of nment in any of these arts is open only to those to, whom, ,ption of the kind of beauty the art aims at producing is tive. It is the same with the virtues. The naturally I may become courageous by hard practice; but sucli a of daring as enabled Private O'Leary to capture a ian position single-handed is possible only to, those who aorn brave, and are apt ta be seized by a passion of couir- r7his consideration opens up another prospect of failure .e development of virtue as an end. The perfectly at- d virtue is a poise upon the apex of a heiglit. To go is failure; but ta go further is fMiure too, for it is ta de- Iagain. The defect of the quality then makes its appear- The brave becomes foolbardy; the dignifled, proud; )rudent, over cautious; the humble-but does any one iims at virtue ever aim at huxnility ? [t is not a favour- .rtue with the character builder. If lie does aimr at this e, does he ever attain ta it ? Can any huinan being i by effort ta the true huxnility ? We have it on the irity of one philosopher that lie could see the pride of 549",
         "50 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE another philosopher through the holes in the garment wv -formed the outward demonstration of the humility he fessed. Yet humility is a great quality. The Bible, to Mw we must corne sooner or later if we want to, study rightE ness, lays no such stress on any other virtue. \"To this will I look,\" saith the Lord, \"even to him that is poor ai a contrite spirit, and trembleth at my word:\" or \" What the Lord require of thee, but to do justly, and to love mi and to walk humbly with thy God.\" There is no comme tion expressed anywhere in the Bible for the strong, ex those who are strong in faith. The greatest man in the Testament is comxnended to us for his meekuess: \" The Moses -was very meek.\" Ail this is the antithesis of attention to one's own dev( ment. The cultivation of virtue is the cultivation of ( self. It may involve ail sorts of seif-denial, but it has obvic nothing to do with that denial of self which is given to u Jesus Christ as the fundamental condition of a true life. flere then is a third type of life to examine ini the se for the source of righteousness. Righteousness in such lives is a resuit which appeai proceed from a negation, and is indeed fuil of negatives the qualities proclaimed as blessed in the Sermon on the M, are ail of a non-positive nature. To be poor in spirit, tomei to be meek, merciful, a peacemaker, is not to conform in pearance very weil to that \" aggressiveness \" of which religious discourse of the present day has so much to To hunger and thirst after righteousness is but to be eim iPersecution for righteousness' sake does not seemn to b. a, strong position. It is the saine with St. IPaul's accoui the cardinal grace of love; it is a succession of negatives. This does not comin end, it should be said, the \" negE Christian\" of whom our generation is, or used' to be, sc\u003e n afraid. The negative Christian is one who lives accordin rules of action which it is his aixn not to break. Like Pharisees, he sets up law in place of life, and values hin upon what h. is not, instead of upon what he is. 5w",
         "RIGHITEOIJSNESS negativeness of the Christian M1e lias tothing to do It is a negativeness that somehîow makes a positive, ncing life. It is, like everything else connected witli ;tian 111e, a paradox; that is to say it is beyond thie )f the natural man, wlio 1'receiveth not thie things of of \u003cJod, for they are foolishness u.nto him; neither now them, because they are spiritually discerned.\" lox here is that negativeness towards self is the road 'eness in a way that is beyond self. It is this tliat itinctive peculiarity of the 111e of faitli. It leads a mnd hirnself. Every one wlio sets out upon su-ch a SAbrahamU who, at the cail of God, \" went out, not whither lie went.\"1 Re is said to have given the ition of righteousness; to have given it ini tis very '?Ying the cail of God to leave his own people and go \u003e a new country promised hlm by God. We may )m his example that rigliteousness la simply obeying God. obvious then that a mani must deny himself, anid rwards but outwards. It is not a case of philosophy, thyseif.\"1 It la a case of turniug oue's back on tlie [Id facing an adveilture. Socrates was nearest to d no philosophy and was obedient to the voice of a vlio chiefly told him wliat not do to. That is ýteristic attitude of faith; to find ail the ways blocked Latural man would follow; blocked because they are of the natural mani. To foilow themn, when they )e so blocked, opens up a desolate prospect with i t but self; Do God and no hope ini the world. Tis ,,ativeness whicli makes so large an appearance in 9,1 prospect of rigliteousness. The negativefless has character and bears upon ail Christians. The ss is always a. particular case. It is for the individ- ie way in which lie mnust go; lying ready to lis hand, Il the tine,-ike the ramn caught ln the thioket ready am's'sacrifice, whidh Abrahaml ox'ly saw when lie d thiecommand not tosacrfice hion Thieway",
         "52 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE thus opened up, when the way of the natural man is an to faith, is thus only discoverable as a produet of ft is beyond the sphere of the natuxal man and ini follc he goes beyond hinself. This is righteousness. Lt L~ than virtue; it is in another plane. Lt is possible to th~ a.nt, the weak, and the unwise, because it cornes, to i without. In treating of it we must at last dtrop the li of science and adopt the language of faith-that n: used word. .The critics of what they Sai Christianity speak as the act of gulping down certain tenets which si priestly guardians of what is called religion uphold \u0026 dition of admission. The tenets, so spoken of, are ir but the efforts of generations to, put into words, and fo as a help to, right guidance li life, the facts which. ar, back of faith. Acceptance of- thein-that is to sa3 ment that they are rightly stated- is belief. Faiih is dt Faith is a part of lue. .It is, like consciousness and a condition of living. Here is to be found an explanation of the functio churches; the reason why church-going is so intima sociated with religion. To the really religious, churi is necessary as a source of strength. Undoubtedly ceedings in church are often lamne and disappointing, bottom fact is there-the worship of God. Lt is in w4 the act of reinembrance of God and of our relation ti that the life of faith gets its strength; and it is to be bered that the one direction the church has received Founder, as to what to, do when its members meet t is the symbolical partaking of bread and wine, as: \"in remembrance of Me.\" Lt 18 this remembrance the essence of the Lord's Supper, whether there t meaning read into it or little. If we were to regard i tutor as merely huinan, the injunetion upon his fofl, this simple act would be regarded as the greatest 8 genius ever conceived by man; and, whether its perf, be held to involve a great mnystery or not, whether i 552",
         "RIIGHTEOUSNESS 5 ý)y much ceremony or littie, the resuit is stiil the sanie, lis followers in remembrance of Him. To remember be consclous that Hie is, is the essential act of faith; hould expeet the faithful to frequent, the assemblies ey can realize, however'imperfectly, a fulfilment of îse \" where two or three are gathered together ini my ere arn I ini the midst of them.\" speak much of prayer, and the Scriptures justify the t prayer is, to the faithful, more than that asking for -which is the popular conception of it; as if God were r spirit who exista to do our wil The truth is the f this; we exist to do the wîll of God. It is the re- of this that is the humiliation spoken of as the ~ument of right prayer. The true end of prayer la straight paths for our feet to, fulffi the wil of God. fulfihinent is righteousness, which may be defined Il of God in the life of man. W. A. LÂNGToN 553",
         "THE LARGER MORAL VIEW 0F N O PINIONS as to the relations of war and 'Christiani so diverse as to range from the conviction of the mi believes war to be absolutely unchristian, to the ( strong persuasion of the preacher who urges its en prosecution as the supremely Christian duty of the agE Is it possible that there is a point of view which, embracing these widely differing conceptions within its can reveal a fundamental relationship between th present hidden by reason of faulty perspective ? 0 thoughts this seems almost incredible, and yet, as this iQ ail things an age of wîder vision, it may be that the qu such a vantage-ground 18 not altogether hopeless. TI step i8 to find some point at which these apparently oj ideas are in contact. Fortunately there is such a point, 1: the advocate of each view emphatically declares that lieves himself to, be giving his support to that policy w best for humanity am a whole. That is to ,say, bot] scientious objectorand war advocate recognize that the state of affairs is a serions menace to the well-being of 1 ity as a whole, and cails urgently for remedial treatmei So far there is complete agreement; the diverse tenq appear immediately attention is directed to the remed though we sometixnes fa to recognize it, the true pý divergence is not the efficacy of war as a remedy, 1 morality. -Presuznàbly if a true moral sanction can b for the use of arms in this present crisis the chief diffic the really conscientious objector will be removed, aud be enabled to give his whole-hearted support to the en prosecution of the war, while stiil at liberty to depreci necessity for sucli extreme measures as far below thi standard.",
         "LARGER MORAL VIEW 0F WAR By common consent the ultimate court of appeal for such ,oral sanction is the teaching of Jesus Christ. Already many g'oof texts have been quoted in support of both contentions, bough littie seems to have been attempted by way of cor- alatig these extreme opinions in one broad compréhensive ision. It may be that the term of fundainental agreement umanity as a whole, gives some dlue to the view-point we tek. As the war bas gone on the whole world hms been ffected in greater or less degree, and in consequence it bas ecome incereasingly clear that it is the concern not oIIIy of be warring nations, but of humanity at large. Coincident rith the rise of this view there has been a growing recogntion f the idea of the relation of the individual to humanity, eveil Iiough such relationsbip be mediated through state or race. 'here seemns te be no good reason for doubting that this rela- LonshiP does in fact exist, or that it exerts some influence on oth state and individual. If we can view the whole from :iis standpoint, it may be that both state and individual will e seen in truer perspective as parts of the whole, and that the -1ative value of each wil be more clearly revealed.\" This way f viewing the matter is equivalent to thinking of mankind as nie organie whole, the body politie of the world, in which bates assume the relative positions of limbs, whilst individuals in be compared to the particles of flesh whieh go te Compose ie limibs. This aspect of the case very readily suggests a s1criptural letaph or which seems to have a direct bearing upon our prob- =m: \" If thy hand or thy foot off end thee, eut, theni off and ist thema from thee; it is better for thee to enter into life hait r maimed, rather than having two hands or two feet to be i.st into everlasting fire.\" This figure obviouslY refers to the 'elfare of the body as a whole, and few would question the rnndness and sanity of the course suggested; neither would ay doubt arise as to the morality of the proposed operation, ven thougli it be admitted that the use of the knife is not the leal procedure. If it is possible to apply this Bible metaphor )the body politic, presuinably the saine analogy will still",
         "556THlE UNIVEIRSITY MAGAZINE hold true. If humanity really does constitute one body, it is obvious that the whole will be affected by the sufferings of any one part, and we can then readily understand the sympathetic thrill throughout the whole world when the excruciating pangs of Belgium first became known. But stay! one of the limbs of this huge body did not throb in sympathy, and that one the linb which was inflicting the agony upon its neighbour. Cain it be that that limb was itself so thoroughly rin the grip of disease that it regarded the extension of the malady as natural and inevitable despite the resistance of the healthy member ? If that is the case the parallel is very clear; we are dealing with a body threatened as a wbole by the disease operating in one part, and it becomes necessary to use such drastic treatment as may be required under such circuxnstances. Now there is nothing in tbe Bible story which suggests that God will intervene; indeed such a supposition seemns ix, be deliberately excluded. The man is evidently thought capable of rightly diagnosing his own condition, and of exercising the moral courage necessary to meet the situation. Presuniably this holds true in the case of the larger body also, for God seems to, have made no sign: there bas been no evident inter- ference either to hinder Germany or to, help her foes, and that despite the fact that the welfare of ail humanîty is imperilled. In the meantime, however, the deliberate decision of mankind bas been made. Slowly, but perhaps the more aecurately for that very reason, the diagnosis bas been completed, and the verdict of the world at large is to the effect that Germany is thoroughly infected by the dread disease of inhumanity. So far there is no difflculty about agreement, but, as has already been pointed out, the morality of the suggested remedy is the point of divergence. The militarist bas no hesitation ini saying that war is the only cure, and the moral issue is fre- quently evaded on the ground of necessity, despite the butchery involved. TÈhe pacifist on the other baud is horrified at the slaughter of fellow men, and feels that bis position is thoroughly misunderstood, when his opponent tells himi that it is a case of kill or be killed. H1e dlaims that the practice of war is incoin- 556",
         "THE LARGER MORAL VIEW 0F WAR \u003eatible with true Christian profession, and has much to support dis contention which the militarist readily allows. The main rouble seems to be lack of perspective; the conscientious bjector centres his attention on the individual and neglects o relate hlm to the larger background: the war advocate ,eneraIly expresses hiinself in terms of states, and seems to ite other to, disiniss altogether too lightly such direct Biblical oinmands as \"Thou shait not kml.\" A much clearer idea f proportion can be obtained when the matter is viewed. from Lie standpoint of the whole. Obviously it is far more serious Dr nation to rise against nation than for individual to kil idividual, and evidently a stiil worse error to, subordinate the 7elfare of the whole to any one part. In the case of the mndi- iduai this latter principle is thoroughly well recognized, but it Des8 fot seem to, have been applied to, the condition of the j-rger body politic now under consideration. Where an peration on an îndividual is decided upon the question of its' loralitY neyer arises. The existing conditions are considered sufflcient warrant for the employnient of means which, Iiough admittedly below the ideal, are nevertheless the best ossible under the circuinstances. This is allowing in practice, not ini theory, for the application of what is known as an interim ethic, \" that is a standard of morality which is lower ian, and apparently even opposed to, the ideal course: but is ethie is really true to the ideal, and is the nearet possible pproxunation to, it under the existing circuxnstances. If we re justified in applying an \"interim ethie\" in one case, and esus Christ apparently openly advised this, why not in the ther ? Adinitting quite frankly that war is a horrible business, iid a long way removed from ideally Christian procedure, :iere yet remains the fact, that it is nothing other than the bhic of the operating room applied to the body politic. It iwell also, to, reniember that in both cases the 11interini ethie applied because we know of no other adequate remedy. ractical experience has taught us that there are cases of isease where faith and prayer mnust be supplemented by",
         "58 THE UJNIVERSITY MAGAZINE surgical skill. For a man to admit this, and to act accordingly, is considered to cast no reflection upon his Christianity. In the larger sphere we seem driven to take a sùnilar view as the resuit of the practical experience of the last four years. The spectacle of praying Parisians killed by long range German guns, the ruthless slaughter of Christian Armenians by infi del Turks, and the abominable Gerinan atrocities in every subj oct region have very effeçtively dissipated the pious belief to the contrary. We knou\u003e now as neyer before that in this case aI\u0026\u003e, faith and prayer must be supplemented by stronger measures if the ravages of the disease are to be checked. Why should such an admission in the larger sphere be regarded as un- christian any more than in the smaller ? The actual work of the operating room is not exactly pleasant, and viewed as an isolated act it is destructive rather than constructive. There it is neyer viewed out of its proper setting, and in consequence we have no difflculty in regarding an operation on an individual as a moral necessity. In the theatre of war the work of the operation is grim and terrible beyond ahl description, but the larger view recognizes its necessity unless the German poison is to be allowed to work its will. We know of no other effective means of cheeking the disease, and therefore seem obliged to use weapons of war as a moral necessity in the interests of the whole body. The whole argument turns upon the fact that when a man's life is threatened by a deadly disease it is'not only impossible, but positively immoral to treat him as if he were wefl; treat- ment which would be immoral in health may be the only moral course in sickness. This is the strongest argument for the \"interim ethic,\" and it is backed by explicit prescription in the New Testament, There is a rather morbid tendency to concentrate atten- tion on the actual operation, though it is not to, be wondered at that the awful contrast between the ideal and the actwal makes a profound impression; it could scarcely be other-wise because of the ghastly inlhumnanity of war. Only the larger outlook can avail, the strong, clear, focussed vision that 558",
         "559 E LARGER MORAL VIEW 0F WAR ,d.eliberately looks beyond the operation Vo the resuit Vo, be attained. War is horible and revolting, and it is noV strange tJ'*t in the midst of ail the carnage and bloodshed, which are Ù8e inevitable aceompaniments, men are irresistibly led Vo IAcllfl \" man's inhumanity to man makes countless thousands inOurn.\" It is this aspect of the case which seems to strength- en the Position of the man who believes war to be essentially unchristian. But hn the full consideration of the whole question a distinction appears which it is well to emphasize more thoroughly, namely the difference between offensive and defensive warf are. The former cannot be justified on any moral grounds, and is totally opposed to the spirit of the Gospel. The will to make war for selfish reasons is simply the germI of the disease of inhumanity, and the nation thus affected May be rightly compared to the off endîng member of the Scripture. Defensive warf are on the other hand lias its oounterpart in the operation, a terrible and drastic necessity, but somnething which may be justified because of its purpose of defending the whole against the encroachinent of the fatal nialady by which the part is infected. Lt would seem then that the larger view-point does allow of a correlation of the two extreme views with which we were faced at the beginning of our quest, and shows an underlYmng harinony. The pacifist is quite right in sayîng that war as such is quite contrary to, the spirit of Christianity, becaus Christianity bas for its objeet the preservation of the whole body. The point the paciflst misses is that the body is alreadY infected by a disease which threatens the dissolution of the whole, that the condition of health and wholenesEs ha,8 already gone, so that the only alternative to destruction is to enter into life hait or maimed. The milîtarist is equally right in saying that war is the only cure under the circuinstances, but often fails to, justify his contention, not on the grounds of necessity oiily, but because of the actual ixmnorality of allow.* ing the whole body to be overcome by the inilitarÎstic disease of inhumanity in an aggravated form.",
         "50 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE If Our reasoning thus far lias been correct, it only now remains to draw the inevitable conclusion, which is, that an \" interim ethic \"iîs allowable on the grounds of practical corn non sense, and appears to have the sanction of the highest moral authority. R. J. SHI]RES MARCHING What solace lias thy scapeless march, 0 Soul, From the unchosen to the unknown goal? What-though thy star beyond the road's end hides Stijl, stili, until grim faith alone abides- What keeps thee sure, thougli visions fail the earth ? What inakes thee riglit, though wither every worth ? This, this alone-let thy proud answer go: I trust my good because I wîll it so! Let God and ail lis first and best be lies, Less than is best I in myseif despise!1 Stil let Hlm hide, year upon broadening year: The harder H1e for capture, the more near My pride shail match Hum, tili fis power take shape In my pursuing more than is escape! Till, strengthening so, I see through my dark hours His own vast glooms; and matched, not with fis powers, But, prouder, with is patience and is pain, 1 mardi the scapeless road again, again, Till I no longer seek Hlm, nay, nor find! But Hie in triumph sees, who of old was blind. WÂRWICK CHimjw 560",
         "PROFESSOR J. CLARK MURRAY 1wJITll the death of Dr. John Clark Murray about a year ago, there passed away from MeGil University and the community of Montreal, a weil-known figure and greatly esteemed personality, and one of t.he last of the band of devoted men whom Sir William Dawson had gathered around hirn in the Faculty of Arts in the sixties and seventies of last century. None, with the possible exception of Sir William himself, laboured more disinterestedly for the advance- ment of the UJniversity; and it is doubtful that any was more beloved by his students than was Dr. Murray. Fortunately for the students in Arts and for higher education in Canada, philosophy was then a subject in the ordinary course for the degree, and thus hundreds of men and women shared ini the elevating influence of bis lectures. It may, perhaps, be said that no other teacher ini the Faculty of Arts had a greater Part i influencing the mental and moral outlook of its students. His higli inteilectual attainments, his extensive and solid learning, bis fine character, and cordial manner attraMeted the admiration and commanded the respect of both students and coileagues. From him, proceeded a rare ethical influence. Rie had a very lofty conception of the function of a university and the aims of higher education; far removed above the shop- fabric idea of both which appears of late years to have been gainÎng ground in Canada, and which, with a crude practi- caiism, strikes at the basis of a Faculty of Arts. A university waS for hlm a place for the training of free and elevated minds, a place of independent outlook on ail the great problems of thought and conduct; not an academy for the training of people in the duties of citizenship and obedience to the State, the injunetions 'of which he held it inight, under certain circuxnstances, be a duty to disobey.",
         "562 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE Dr. Murray camne in his thirty-seventh year to, McGill froxu Queen's University, which, was his first appoinitment after leaving Scotland, and occupied the Chair of Mental and Moral Philosophy, as it was then designated according to ancient usage, for thirty-one years. In bis lectures he covered the pro 1vinces of IPsychology, Logic, Metaphysies, Ethies, and the llistory of Philosophy. The writer heard him on ail these subjeets except Logic, which in the nineties and for some years previously had been taken over by an able assistant. For many years Dr. Murray carried on the work of the departinent alone. Only a healthy constitution, kept in order by regular habits, pedestrian exercise, and cycling, enabled him to cope with the exacting labour, which entailed eighteen to twenty hours of lectures a week, besides the correc- tion of innuxnerable exercises and essays. During this period, lie was busy as a writer, and as a lecturer and preacher outside the university, for lie had been trained in theology, a circuinstance that was not whoily fortunate for his synthesis in philosophy. As a popular lecturer lie was in much demiand, owing not only to, a literary bent and wide reading, especially i poetry and particu]arly i Scottisli poetry, as show-n in~ his \"Bailads and Songs of Scotland i view of their influence on the Character of the People,\" 1874, but aiso to a lucid and facile mnner of exposition. 0f bis university courses, bis lectures on the fHistory of Philosophy were the least satisfactory, owing to the fact that lie had not time or energy left over from. his other work either to, cope with the mas of rapidlly accumulating fresh rnaterial, or even to, do justice to his own wide reading ini Greek and Medieval Philosophy. Like moet thmnkers of the idealistie school, le overrated Berkeley. lie did n\u003c\u003et recognize the importance of Locke and Hume, partly owing to a distaste of empiricism and partly on account of the influence of those German historians who followed the Hegelian ,construction. 11e was at bis best i his lectures on Elexnentary Psychology and on Ethics, i which spheres moet of his owxi",
         "563 PROFESSOR J. CLARK MURRAY work was done. is \"Handbook of Psychology,\" 1884, wbicli was rewritten as an \"Introduction to IPsychology\" twenty years later, was a inucli used treatise until William James and bis disciples on this continent brouglit about a more experimental and less exclusively analytical treatment of the subjeet. Witli Dr. Murray, as with some still living philoeophers, psychology had not f reed itself from metaphysi- cal influences, some of which liad in bis case their source in the flot very illuminating doctrines of Sir William Hlamiltonl. Thus lie used the soul, that miraculous \" ail in the whole, and the wliole in every part,\" as a means of resolving diffloulties, which could be otherwise better explained; and lie took too sliglit account of cerebral physiology. The, lectures on Ethics as given in the nineties were the most finÎshed of his courses, usuaily dellvered, without any manuscriPt, in clear, vigorous, thoughtrcompeing style, and at tinies even witli flre, as when the speaker examined doctrines from which he dissented, like Deterxninism and lledonism. Yet lie always endeavoured and for the most part succeeded in presenlting the standpoint of opponents adequately and fairly. Indeed, througliout bis courses lie represented the spirit of criticism, whicli wàS then sadly laking in most branches of teachÎng ini the Faculty of Arts. lUis clasrooin was one of the f ew places of free discussion and bracing inteilecti activity in whicli one f elt, in sharp contrast to thle deadeniflg atmospliere of others, that everytbing was not once and forever fixed and settled in the world. One ofbis colleaguesw -0 desiccated most subjects ie, touched, and representled a type of rigid and pedantic scientifie orthodoxy, tried te niake YOU believe that the atomie theory was part of the constitution of the world. Clark Murray led you to, sSe the difference between a hypotliesis and an axiom, and to inquire whether therle were aionis at anl. nie thus perforined what must a.lways be one of the chief functions of a stixnulator to lPhilosopliy, the arousal of individuals from their dogmatic slumbers as a preparatory step to f reeing tliem f rom what Kant wel ternis their \"selbstverschuldeten Unmibmdigkeit.\"",
         "64 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE Dr. Murray followed with keen interest every new scientiflc discovery which had even the remotest bearing on problems of psychology and metaphysics. A good ground- ing in the elements of physical science, due to an excelleént, Scottish training, and further lielped by studies in Gerniany, enabled him to follow without difficulty the main developments of physics and physiology; and at Gottingen and Hleidelberg, where lie enjoyed' the simple'student if e in the days before the commercial development of the Empire, lie came into contact with some of the leaders of modern Biblical criticisin, the results of whose work nowadays appear to be quite tame. Their influence, combined with his philosophical studies, showed him clearly that with regard to Christian origins, long-received views had to be deeply modified. From the great criticist who shook the intellect ual world, lie had learnt the necessity for a free discussion of ahi religious values; and through his psychological work, he was led to perceive the importance of anthropology and comparative mythology in the study of the origins of religions. Although he dîd not agree with a distin- guished Scottish theologian and seholar that \" there is probably flot a single moral precept in the Christian Scriptures which i.s not substantially also in the Chinese classics,\" few of those with whom lie had frequent intercourse seemed to, realize how far he had traversed the road of \"heterodoxy.\"1 This w\"s partly due to a natural sensitiveness of disposition which prevented him saying in a distinct way what miglit off end the weaker brethren, for whom lie showed rather undue con- sideration; and partly to a philosophical mode of expression which unintentionally misled the many who, in order to se the bearings of statements, require to have them expresseci in the baldest terms and garbed in unxnistakable instances. Hie regarded the Bible, as must ail who are receptive to the appli-. cation of historical method, as a fallible product, in which higli ethical doctrine is expressed in a very poPûlar formn, as it always is, and lias to be, in religious manuals. lie was greatly amused by Mr. Gladstone's performance ini his \"Inpregnable Rock of Holy Seripture,\" and wondered how 564",
         "PROFESSOU J. CLARK MURRAY any thinker (?) could take up such a position. It was a constant source of surprise to him. that a man so authori- tative regarding the f acts of natural science as Sir William Dawson wau, could spend bis energies in the attempt to, construct a cosmology in which the Books of Genesis and Daniel figured importantly. The Principal did not regard the prof essor of phulosopliy, 1otwithstandir'g bis theological training, as a wholly safe man. H1e feared the unsettling effect on the students' minds of the flonours Course in that subject, and on one occasion observed that it involved too much reading and made very heavy demarids on a student's capacity. On the prof essor's asking what boo'ks lie thouglit miglit profitably be omitted, Sir Williamn mentioned \" Spinoza's Ethic \" and \" Spencer's First Prin- ciples,\" which lie considered for other reasons also were undesirable. Dr. Murray at once perceived the Principal's aim, combated the suggestion, and retained the Ethic i the Ronours Course during his professorship. Aristotie, SPÎozft, and Kant were authors whom lie obliged ail advanced students to read at first hand. Clark Murray preserved an unusual and admirable detacliment from material things, without being unpractical or visionary., In worldly aif airs lie was guileless; but on occasion lie could shiow an indignation whicli may be desig- nated plosopliical anger. In tlie xnidst of a dulling environ- ment, he kept steadfast to the liighest interests of the things of thie jnind. No selfish or petty idea of the universe, no feverisli attitude towards 11fe beclouded bis vision. With Socrates lie held that there were, iany things whicli one required neither to have nor to know. Aithougli intensely interested in, he was not easily disturbed by tlie events of the day. For a tixne indeed lie was bewildered by the war and the atrocious conduct of it by our enemies. But bis cheerful faith ini mankind again assrted itself , and he inclined to the view that Germany was passîflg througli a phase whidli would disappear from the \"Flatland of Eurpe as ithlad from other countries. Hle refused to read any more war",
         "566 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE literature, which concerned itself with the mad dance of the world of sense, and wisely absorbed hiinself again ini the great cI\u0026ssies of philosophy which move in the liberating sphere of eternal things. Almost to the end he was mentally ,active.' In the sunimer of 1916 he remarked that he had lived longer than Kant, was in better health, and feit far from, singing a nunc dimittis. Serene and cabn, he proceeded through lIde, confident, after a thoughtful survey, that the course of human aif airs ultimately tended to the good. The teachers shail shine as the stars ini the firmamient. W. H. 'Witness, among other indications, hîs freshly written article on Pragmatùum ini this Magazine, 1914.",
         "AN HONEST GERMAN SI.--THE UJNITY 0F. MANKIND W JE have before us a really great book, Prof essor Dr. med. ''G. F. Nicolai's Die Biologie des Krweges (1917); one of the few good tbings produced in Germany since the war began. There are ideas in it that are not valid, and there are two oisons which may be held to spoil its plan. But it is a book that everyone should rcad, and that most people will be the better for readirig-despite the fact that the author is (or was) Professor of Physiology at Berlin. We may recali the eircuinstances in which it took shape. The author is a man of wide learning, he is a distinguished physician and heart specialist, has attended members of the imperial house, bas travelled largely, and is an authority on Neo-Kantianism. This learning is reflected in bis book, whieh covers almost the whole field of the scientific, philosophie, and social-political questions raised by the first two years of the war, and works the entirety into, one connected argument. The book was. called out by the famous manifesto of 93 German intellectuals. Nicolai, i conjunction with Professors Einstein and F6rstpr, drafted a counter-manifesto, but could flot get intrs le then prepared a series of lectures on the subject; these were flot delivered, as he wus called up and transferred to Graudenz. He then decided that he must write a book, wvhatever the consequences. It was coinpleted in the surumer of 1916; internai evidence suggests that it was finished before the Belgian deportation order of 3rd October, 1916. There wvaa great difieiulty and delay i finding a publisher; ffltimiately it was published in Swîtzerland, The îimediate conisequence to Nicolai was five months imprisoiinent. To atternpt to summarize the work woufld be grossly unfair. What we shaHl do is to, try to present the ato' standpoint and aixn, and sunimarize one or two special pocinte.",
         "58 THE UJNIVERSITY MAGAZINE Nicolai. is flot a pacifist. H1e writes as a German patriot, but dlaims to give his own definition of patriotism; the patriot serves his country to, the full of his ability, but, while he loves and supports the good in hier, he hates and fights agairist the bad. Hie writes primarily for Germans, though they are the last who will read him. When other countries sin, he says, that is their business; but if Germany sins, ail Germans are answerable. is objection to war is deep-seated; but it is entirely a scientiftc objection. Though he shows plenty of moral indignation over certain definite acts, hie has apparently no moral horror of war itself; thîs is one of the great omissions we have referred to. The other is that, as regards the origin of this particular war, hie takes up the pacifist standpoint; he declines to discuss causes and responsibilities; his viewjis that every individual in every country shares the blame. Usually we eau this standpoint, intellectual cowardice; it is 80 hard honestly to investigate evidences, so easy to silde off along the lime of least resistance and condemn everyone ixnpartially. But it is not, of course, intellectual cowardice in Nicolai; we believe that, in his view, he honestly does not think it matters where the initial responsibility rests. Quite unconsciously, may be, the German has overcome the man. It is the chief blot on his work. fis main thesis is the brotherhood of man. As the Germans of 1870 sought to unify Germany, so ail Europeans must now seek to unify Europe, as a preliminary, we gather, to unifying mankind. In this hie holds himself to be in the line of descent, not only of the great Germans before 1870, but of many of the nobler mînds of every nation s\"ce the early Christians. Man must be a citizen of the world. He adinits that this view is entirely opposed to the course of ideas in Germany to-day; and indeed everyone knows, how absolutely modern German literature reprobates what it calls \"co\u0026nm.. politanism.\" To the modemn German the \"Cosmopolite\" is Vaterlandlos, unpatriotic; whereas Nicolai's argiument is that you must so, love your country as not to, fail to love the 568",
         "AN 1{ONEST GERMAN56 eter unity, mankind, of which your country is a part, and it only as you fulfl this demand is your patriotism pure. The unity of humanity he founds on two, things. Al ilization is one, and cannot be divided into national civil- tions; that is one basis. The other is physical; ail men are poreally connected by virtue of the continuity of the germ- arn. Eaeh man to-day contains a bit of the substance of men of 1,000 years ago; ail men to-day contain a bit of the \u003estance of each man of 1,000 years ago; in each the whole e lias part, flot merely spiritually, but corporeaily; no man Ldo or suifer anything without aifecting humanity; we are rally \"mexnbers one of another.\" It is prxtbably not true, lie puts it; it could only be true if the intermarriage of al ukind at ail times had been the rule; but we may treat t as inimaterial, for the meal unîty must be found in spirit. wever, Nicolai carrnes bis germn-plasm idea yet further. has the courage to say that the unity of mankind can yr take place on a moral basis, which is freedom (he instances United States and Britain as the countries in which can wen the beginnings of the process), and that morality can ( be founded in altruism; and he represents egoism as ex- ,sing the self-consciousness of the body, but altruism that of germ-plasm; it is the germ-plasm which enables the founda- *of ail morality, love; it is Iiterally, \" the spirit that ýth 111e.\" Consequently (for bis thought is neither Chris nor Theist, but definitely Positivist), he reaches as bis * fot only the unity of humanity but the religion of ianity. For morality cannot exist without religion, that elief in the superbuman; but there is only one superbuman Lty, the continuity of ail human beings; to realize this is ion, is to, love your neighbour. Across the unity of humanity cuts war. What then is and what its place iu the wonld ? II.-WAR War, to Nicolai, is a transition phenomenon. is view at it is not natural, or part of nature; for no animal niakes 569",
         "70 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE war on its own species. It came in with man; but it is not native Vo man in his horde state; it was a consequence of the introduction of possessions, as ail war must be war for some- thing. Hie thus agrees with those German panegyrists of war, like Scheler, who also, hold that war is noV animal. But whereas the panegyrists draw the deduction that war must therefore be spiritual and noble, Nicolai concludes that it is an instinct, once useful, the utility of which is past. Doubtless this is true; the fighting instinct thougli too strong now, was once only just strong enough to, pull homo sapies through against the mammoth and the sabre-tooth, while homo neandertalensis actually succumbed. The change came, in Nicolai's view, whcn man reinforced his naked liand with a pointed stone. That whicli took up the sword can and must lay it down. For since those ancient days evolution lias be-en of brain, and the true struggle has been of brain. The spiritual war became more important than the physical war; civilization is the \"living weapon,\" the sword the \"dead weapon.\" iPhysical war is now merely the refuge of the weak and foolish. \"If the German people,\" lie says, possess the physical and psychical qualifies necessary Vo give tliemn dominion over the world, Vhey will achieve it without war; if tliey do not possess them, no success in war wil make good the want.\" We may note, thougli Nicolai does not, that Germany lias unconsciously subscribed to the trutli of Vhs; she has fought with persuasion (propaganda) no less vehle- mently than with arms, a new thing in warfare. Hie lias no difficulty in showing that war does not build up intelligence, does not create, is not a \"struggle for life- but \"against life,\" is not a tonic medicine for humanity, and does not lead to the \"survival of the fittest\" but of the least fit. 0f the Germanie theory of \"riglit\" war, war for power, lie is contemptuous. Power must be power over somne one or something; that condemns the theory. But we think lie would agree that the \"wiil Vo power\" enslirines a true sun; only lt must be power, not over your neiglibour, but over youxseif 570",
         "AN IIONEST GERMAN ature. LIn practioe, Germany's allies, with German aid, uging what Germans cal low forms of war-Austria tic, Turkey religious. But Germany herseif is actually ter, whatever lier theories \"Doe any one believe,\" lie 'that the great mass of hatred and contempt with whicli Lajority of men at present regard Germany would flot y increase if Germany succeeded in bringing stili more a territory under German mile ?\" Ïe0 cannot follow here the chapters on the ideas bred of nilitarism, wbich is a state of mind trying to shape the sary) organization of the world by misguided means, the history of the evolution of the Landwehr from, a defence force to an instrument of aggression; mass- tion; German Chauvinism, the exposition of which etes that of iProfessor Nippold, whose damning book, i in 1913, Nicolai does not seem. to know. In Nicolai's Jermany lias gone off the rails since 1870, and must be it back. But how li\u0026rd it wiil be for Germans to get the rails again can be seen in Nicolai hixnself. We said ie writes as a Geruxan patriot. Now and again ho purely as a German. lie objecta to war because it is ritifle, and impedes bis ideal, the unity of Europe; but misery he has no feeling. Hie, as it were, simply shrugs \u003eulders over that, and comments that it only increases ace death rate 7%/. That is, of course, an error and teo account of the lost years of hurnan life. To natures ,rman, it is astounding to flnd a mani of gifts believing 1 war were justifiable on other grounds, no one need Sabout the heaps of corpses, and pliilosophising that a icruelty is necessary. If Nicolai can write this, wliat s there that tlie present educated classes in Gerxnany er cliange tlieir beliefs, this side of the grave ? At one quotation he gives, or rather two quotations li etion, set one thinking. lie points out that the 311e wlio wrote, \"The good war sanctifies every cause \" àis bitter irony ?), also hoped for the \" breakiug of the ýand wrote: 'Better Wo periali than to hate and fear;",
         "52 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE better twice over to perish than to make oneseif ha feared.\" 111.THECRIMES 0F GERMAINY The most permanently valuable part of Nicolai's probably his study of the misuse of Kant in Germi important to summarize briefly. But of most. irr interest to-day is his plain speaking about CGerman cri follies, though some of the worst were yet to corne wrote. Hie brings out with great clearness the guif German thought (rather perhaps the expression thought) and German actions; he steadily denies t) that there is one law for Germany and another for h nents; if you agree to rules, you must keep them. I the ground that Germans, by their actions, show t) no longer respect the worth of men, and have thus basis of their own morality; that is, their acts damai selves. H1e quotes Prince Rupprecht of Bavaria's oR biddîng his troops to give quarter to the British, an( \"without any doubt the gravest injury which cari be on the worth of humanity.\" 0f Professor Eucken'-, that the English were Phariseles and that he apologizc Pharisees for the comparison, hie says: \"11le who r~ German professors must think we are at war with Yet Eucken is ilk and water compared with many I pastors. Hie says of the campaign of hatred and lyini unrebuked in the German press that, while the world Germans barbarians, \"It must be admitted that ini two years we have at least become much more bâ like.\u003e' 0f the particular form of vilification which i always referring to the German troops as heroes à opponents as cowards, he takes the view which believe) finally forced on the authorities by the Germa9 themselves; these people \" did not reflect that ini 1 the enemy they belittled their own victories, anc their own defeat, .should it happen, into a disgrace. Lissauer he would deal very faithfully; \" the old Gý he says, \"used to tear out such men's tongues, sayin 572",
         "AN IIONEST GERMAN 7 ikewill cease to hiss. '\"' We ourselves prefer the way British soldiers, who made Lissauer a laughing-stock fled the Ifymn of Hate with ridicule by sinin it ,Ive to the Germans at elvery opportunity. kcolai is equally severe on German Chauvinism. The of war, he declares, the agrarians and iron magnates, 3cendants of Cain, the first murderer, and the Bible A (Genesis iv. 20, 22.) le destroys H. S. Chamber- amnateur ethnology once again, -and points out how )us in practice much of the German race-taik is, seeing ie saine men who preach, the extension of Oermany ie world -are afraid even to, unify the German race; they are fighting for political purposes, to boister up LOS which cails itsell Austria. Men care oiily for the ý,\u003e not for the German nation. \"So let us be honest,\" 4 \"and say, not that such and such a thing is good 1, but that it is good llohenzollernish.\" has rescued from oblivion an article on York by Paul \"York,\" runs the argument, \"was a moral Gerinan, )n Kant's ethies; but moral Germans only perform acts; therefore York's treason was a moral act.\" quotes this glorious sophistical syllogisin as an instance Lbdication of the German intellect; another instance is ~now revealed we believe for the first time, that sories never even read their precious manifesto, but per- the \"moral act\" of signing it unread in response to a )hie request fromn Erzberger, then in that stage of his )n in which lie desired to rain fire froin heaven upon lai relates that a \"highly--cultivated soldier\" asked it would not ho possible to throw bombs fllled with gerins or plague bacil behind the enemy front. I replied that this seemed neither a profitable nor a imane proceeding, ho replied 'WThat havre we to do manity ini this war ? Germany has a right to do what- e pleases.\"' Similazly a Staff-Surgeon at Graude»z n that he had often wondered *hether he could not îsway into Russia and inoeulate the Russians with 573",
         "54 THIE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE living bacteria, stating that against such a pack e-, was permissible. \"Suci men,\" says Nicolai, \"regard their feloa beasts because they have become beasts themselv- lie pointe out that race after race of beasts lias perla growing too big; wîll not the saine fate overtake tli German militarisin? \"Along the endiesa field-gr muns a warning shadow that presages the cominf dâimmerung.\" And lie quotes Dostoievski's say Germany, wlien she lia destroyed everything agair for centuries she lias protested, wiil then die spiriti self, having nothing more to protest against. But wliat of protesting against herself ? Nii done bis best; and we may conclude witli a paSSagE of this. Had hie known ail that we know to-day, have made it stronger; just as hie would liave stre bis lionourable contention that if you uiidertake to t prisoners in a certain way you must so treat thein, be to your bindrance. However, the passage suif stands. Re takes tliree treaties. The Belgian i treaty of 1839 created as against Gerinans \" an insurn waill based on tlieir own word.\" ]3y the Decla Paris (1856) the nations placed a prohibition on i sînking of slips. By the Hlague Convention (li voluntarily deprived theinselves of the use of suffc poisonous gases. \"Wliatever,\" lie continues, \"one i of the value and significance of sudh conventions, -i are once concluded ail discussion of thein musti liencefortli any breacli of thein not only damages ti but inflicts irreparable injury on one's own honour. there lias been nothing so melanclioly in this war as tion of Belgian neutrality, tlie IJ-boat campaign, \u0026r of suffocating gases. For tliese things are fatal, n( hurnan 111e, but to human lionour.\" For once a G spoken ont like an lionest mnan; and, as we have me had his reward: five months' imprisoninent. For is not vithout honour, save in bis own country. 574",
         "'ERNATIONALISM V. NATIONALISM IN MUSIC ZTIEOTGH there must be frank recognition of the fact that music in its highest formis acknowledges no0 aphical limitations, that it is international rather national, since musical language is intelligible to, and ýciated by ail nations alike whatever the differences k separate them,---differences attributable either to topo- àcal or to ethnological reasons or else to, differing con- Ls of daily life and modes of thought,-there must be recognition that these sanie differences are responisible )rresponding difference of detail ini the mode adopted eh nation of expressing itself in music. Lt is an undeni- fact that various nations have varied tastes in music. 7ýnglish, as a whole, are of \"an imperturbable nature; their Ànt as regards emotion inakes it evident that if music is universaily acknowledged, a mirror ini which, the 111e a nation can be seen, that music which expresses them is the non-sensational, the non-eccentrie. The French, ie other band, more gay and vivacious and less self- ined as to, the expression of emotion, find self-e xpression re sprightly and more sensuous music. The German nation )und satisfaction in a more carefuily planned and more licated style of music, and even in the lighiter forms of Dsition demands a certain aniount of seriousness. The il character of the music of a northern nation like ay or Finland, whether folk-music or art-music or a [nation of both, is of a simple rugged character which guishes it from the more polished, more sensuous ýcts of a southern nation such as Italy. The idio- 3,cies and characteristies of other nations and how are refiected in the music of each, might suitably be",
         "576 THfE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE reviewed here, but it is not necessary to press the any further. At the same time, in speaking of any nation as a we have to bear ini mind the almost cosxnopolitan make-ui nation. To take one example, Russia, with upwards of or dred and fifty millions of people, is made up of various i alities through the amalgamation of Slav with variouw Altaie races, embracing Turko-Mongols, Turko-Tartai Caucasians. Speaking of European Russia onty, we ha following divisions at the present time, Great Russians, Russians and White Russians. These again have brought in contact with and have absorbed other d nationalities, the Great ]Russians, Finnish elements;- Russians, Turkish elements; and White Russians, Lithi elemnents. Again, the Great Russians are sub-divide Central Russians and Novgorodians. A Russian of the present day says that between Great and Little there are profound differences of language, colour, co traditions, popular songs and dances, etc., du e to, eth phical peculiarities and historical conditions. How ý to expect a similarity of tastes and a musical self-exp, in comjnon ? Yet ail Russian music seems to have characteristics in common, and these are barbarie tiveness, a melodie and rythmic charm, combined with wç and colour truly oriental. Again, take the British'Isles; here we find the Ce Norseman, the Saxon,. the Norman-French, ail contri in past centuries to, the general. make-up, while the la centuries have witnessed a steady stream of people from every European country flocking to the British Isl( taking up their permanent abode in different parts (n of course, in the towns). Ail Vhis makes it more d to generalize; and when we examine the folk-musie a] popular music of ail kinds, when we also review represer compositions of the more prominent musicians livin working in the British Isles from the l6th century present day, it is somewhat liard to arrive at a satisf,",
         "INTERNATIONALISM IN MUJSIC Liet as to the kind of music which best expresses the an as a whole. The task would be înfinitely more difficuit if we were d to show conclusive proof of the music truly representing British Empire,, the unification and consolidation of ffh during recent years has been the aim of ail its great ,ical leaders in whatever part of the empire they may lornidiled. It must necessarily be so when we consider differences between the various constituent Parts Of empire as regards geographical position, as weil as racial, atic, and linguistic characteristies, inducing varied modes lfe and of thought and therefore of self-expression in y one of the many parts of the empire; however, if each àiese various sections of the empire is earnestly desiring Lification which shail not be merely for the selfish reason rotecting its own interests, it is evident that there must Dmue means of expressing that desire cominon to ail parts ie empire, and here is where music is required to, help. eturn for a moment to the British Isles, we find, as regards ic, no chauvinistie spirit there at any rate; in fact they been, up to a few years ago, too busy weleomn ou1d ences, turning too willing an ear to those whù have been ag the last two centuries endeavouring to convice thema they are an utterly uninusical people, s0 steeped in ,uercialism and utilitarianism as to be incapable of Lional self-expression in music, and that the only satis- )ry conclusion to be arrived at is that they have been too rtrying to gain the whole world and losing their ovn ~.The answer to this lias been the efforts latelY Of y'e musicians, both amateur and prof essional, to show there is a wealth of indigenous folk-usic in every ter of the British Isies. There lias been a growing rest on the part of the great public in hearing this folk- kc, a growing activity among thie rising young composers se it as a basis for composition--so mucli so, mndeed, as 'ring a charge against them in some quarters that they incapable of originality in thematie work. As a very",
         "58 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE capable critic of the present day has remarked, \",Mua are generally driven to nationalism as a revoit against f influence.\" This certainly has been the case in Russia the last century, and especially so since the emanci] of the serfs there in 1860; and the example of Russi un( edly inspired simnilar efforts in England. : t is almost unnecessary to enumerate here the v specimens of folk-song associated with ordinary daM'- or of popular songs which deal with national ever Scotland, Ireland, and Wales. Who is not familiar \"Scots wha ha'e wi' Wallace bled,\" \"The March c Cameron Men,\" \"Blue Belis of Scotland, 1\" \"Bonmie Dui \"The Carnpbells are Coming,\" \" Blue Bonnets are ov, Border,\" etc. ? Again, who does not -hear at once wh\u003c tities are. zentioned such Welsh songs as \"Land Fathers,\" \"Mardi of the Men of Harlech\"; and sucli songs as \"Wearin' of the Green.,\" \"The llarp tha.t ( \"St. IPatrick's Day,\" \"Battle of the Boyne,\"1 \"The M: Boy,\" etc. ? The folk-music and popular songs of Er itself are, comparatively speaking, not s0 generally k or at lest, if they are known, they are not played anc with the same frequency, and have until recent yearn looked upon as of interest merely from an antiquarian of view. Folk-music of more remote periods is always di to trace to its source because it has been necessarily h down through succeeding generations orally, naturally g altered considerably. from the original in the proces in one noteworthy instance, on a parcbment at R( Abbey, which on the reverse side had an ecclesiastical anti was discovered the famous rota or canon, \"Sumer is a c iii,\" dating from about 1250. Lt is a true folk-melo pastoral character, bright and joyous. The mode or employed is the \"Jonian\" transposed, whioh imparta a softer character than if it had been in the other ecciesij modes. It has a \" drone \" bass and is really meant f voices, four singing the melody as a round, and tw \" drone \" bass. 578",
         "INTERNATIONALISM IN MUJSIC 7 Five hundred years ago wus fought the Battie of Agin- court, and the victory was commemorated by special words being fltted to a popular melody of the period, the introductory bmes and the final bars, both with Latin words, being probably added by some scholarly composer of that tiine. Good epecimens of the next century (the l6th) *are \"The Three Ravens,\" Light o' Love,\" and \"The Willow Song-\" lI the early l7th century we have such a baliad as \"'Green-sleeves,\" and \"Peg o' Ransey,\" and the well-known -ountry dance or round called \" Sellînger's ound.\" Another popular tune of the late l6th and early l7th century was 'The Carman's Whistle.\" The period of the Commonwealth in ngland interfered -onsiderably with popular song and dance, and we flnd a atyle differing considerably from that of the Elizabethan a, d early Jacobean times, prevailing after the Restoration; mech a song as \" Here's a IHealth unto is Mai esty \" (1667), ind also \" Under the Greenwood Tree,\" by Arne, being repre- 3entative popular songs of the period. The chimes of many 1,ountry churches in England have been the means of handing lown traditional tunes. Taken as a whole, the folk-music, using the terni in the ,arger sense of the British lies, equals in quality and quantity lhat of any other country, and it is just as much the proud .ieritage of the people of the British Dominions beyond the seas is of the inhabitants of the British Isies themnselves. Above ail -hings let us remember that the existence of this folk-music wroves that in the past England has been a musical nation; àhat whatever the fashion of the moment maight be in the ipper circles of society, the people of England were, like )ther European nations, century after century laying up a ,epertoire of music indigenous to the soit, and expressive of ýhe lives and thoughts of its inhabitants. Because the f olk- nusic of a country should influence the compositions of art- vorkers in music in that country, there is no reason for musi- ,ians necessarily to use the idioni prevailing in that country n any one century. This is the danger at the present time 579",
         "50 THE UJNIVERSITY MAGAZINE in musical circles where the folk-song enthusiasts prescribe a particular idiom of Elizabethan or Jai times to express the national consciousness. Many sa the art-music of these times, written by Tallis, Byrd, Gi Morley and Dowland in the early period, and again by «1 Purcell and Arne in the later period, represents th English school which it is necessary to copy; but di centuries see different tastes in the same nation, and cannot stand stii. Yet, when viewing the producti the varlous musical composers of the different Eu countries, undoubtedly we find the \"national note \" 1 to a certain extent in ail. Consciously or unconsc they have been influenced by the particular taste of the amongst whom each of them has chiefly dwelt, anc mu sic therefore appeals more powerfully than other to the feelings of the nation and is more pûrmanentlý vated in that country. Although the peculiar characteristics of the mi any particular nation are more strongly exhibited in the lar song and dance tunes traditionally preserved by the c, people and lower orders of society, who form the great mý o~f the people and who do not change their tastes so n~ yet when viewing: the productions of the musical cori of the varjous buropean countries, undoubtedly w nationalism in their music if it was composed in the par taste of the nation where each dwells. It then s more powerfully than other music to the feelings of that and is permanently cultivated in that country. ThE during the last two, centuries, taking into consideratii influence due to environment, Arne, Greene, Boyce, Smart, Sterndale-Bennett, Sullivan, Goring Thomas, \u003c Mackenzie, Parry, Stanford, Elgar may be considered sentative of British nationalism in music; Haydn, 1ý Beethoven, Schubert, . Schumnann, Wagner, Mendel Strauss, Reger, and Karg-Elert may be regarded as sentative of German nationalism in music; Rossini,]1 Donizetti, Verdi, Puccini, Mascagni, Montemezzi,, M",
         "INTEIRNATIONALISM IN MUSIC 'errari, and Sinilgaglia, of Italian nationalism in music; Auber, kieldieu, llerold, Couperin, Rameau, Berlioz, Saint Saens,ý rounod, Massenet, Debussy, and R\u0026vel, of French nationalism 1music; and (during the lust century only) Glinka, Tschai- owsky, Ruibnstein, Glazounoif, Rimsky-,KorSakoff, Bala- ireif, Borodin, Moussorksky, and R-achmnarinoff, of iRussia ationalism in music. However, the style of ail thes distin- iiished composers bas also been influenced in great xneasure y their study of the works of previous and even conteMPOrary msters of countries other than their own; for instance, ie English Arne and Greene studied Italian models, as did ie Gerinan Haydn and Mozart, as weil as the Gerxnan Handel vrho wa.s a naturalized Englishmanf). The later 'Italiati )mposers from, Verdi to Wolf -Ferrari were influenced by -erman models; the later Frenchi by Ru\"ssian modelsa End [cas; the early Russian composera mentioned above by the )mpositions of Berlioz, and the later Russians by German orks; the later English composera referred to above ere influenced by German works, and the present-daY nglish composers by French and Russian works. Thus lere is an international note in their music. In Russia, Glinka, through his own works, began Vo show ýs countrymen early in the last century h-ow the vitaliig )wer of national characteristies could be put to good accoutt art-music; and, later on, such men s Balakireif, I3orodin, [oussorlisky and Rünsky-Kor5ftkoff banded themiselvoe igether Vo resist anything which savoured of either Italian .Gernian ideals or mnethods, and to write RussiaU music ýr the Russian people. one of the greatest features of ussian art-music belonging te ail schools, is its abufldSfl\u003c Ssimple and ea8ily-grasPed mnelody. Brillant and striking .chestration and the power of depictiflg eleinental passions id striking situations have also contributed to draw the ±tention of other counitries, especially France and England, ) Russian musical works, and these countriC8 have also learned om Russia rhythms differing from their own. This haïs %dl an imnortant influence on art progress. In (3ermany,",
         "52 THE UJNIVEIRSITY MAGAZINE folk-music has always been feit by hier composers-from greatest to the least--as a vitalizing influence in their wo, and the fise of the Russian school during the last fifty ye with its continuous use of national folk-music as a basis ai pattern, has stiinulated a revival of interest in Engi in its own folk-music. But this insistence on a nati\u003c note in music has not been confined to Engi,. Liszt, Joachimn, and Brahms brought forward Rungai folk-music; Chopin, the distinctive features of Polish natic music; Dvorak, Bohemian folk-music, and, as an ob lesson to, the United States, negro melodies. Grieg, agaii a conspicuous person lu this connection, and eertainly inft into ail the mu sic he wrote the idiom of native Norwei folk-music. Sibelius is another outstanding figure as regî the use of Finnish folk-mnusie idiom. lu sîl bis works. Those who resist the temptation to, be merely natio and deprecate the attempts of others who en deavour to expý -themselves ini music, whiéh by its local idiom prohibit universal appeal, are undoubtedly sincere lu their desir\u003c serve the whole of mankind, to disregard barriers, geograph or political, to develop a mutual understanding and reg between nations speaking différent verbal languages. instance, we cannot but think Hugo Wolf sincere when said the business of the composer is not to write German mu or Russian music or French music, but simply good mu With that idea lu view he wrote songs whicfr have more V a local appeal. One hesitates to quote Nietzsche at the present t because a good many people seem to think that the doctri which hie preached are to some exteut responsible for present war. Nietzsche abhorred nationalism. R-is c structive ideal was not national but the gradual evolui of the type of man onwards and upwards to the supemr On one occasion he told his f eilow countrymen that great men of old were patriots only in their weaker mome, iu old age, or when they rested from themselves. Hie refu to ailow that moral or inteilectual qualities could be ccrnfi- 582",
         "583 INTERNATIONALISM IN. MUSIC frontiers, and scorned a culture which yvas \"imerely il,\" with no voice for the \"soul, of Europe-\" A per- of Nietzsche's doctrines by Bernhardi and other German ists has led to a somewhat wrong estimate of the pher's ideals. wch and Beethoven, the greatest of \u0026Hl art-musiciafls, ý said to be the least conscious of a national note in ffn works. Bach made great use of chorales, a feature ieran religious worship, but, outside these, he used no iom as a basis of bis art-work. Beethoven's Pastorale ony, decidely a picture of simple country life, has of folk-music simplicity, but not consciously of German isie more than of any other nation. Who sxnongst ýs to say that the music of Bachi or Beethoven ought be played to-day because they were Gerinans and :or German people ? Who ainongst us does not feel e message of their music is couched in the music of a ai language which ignores the present conffict and us forget racial diiferences ? Le music of any country suiffers from too great an ice on the national note, just as auy country is the for the absence of that national note, and for neglect Ivating it. No country ought to neglect its nativeý- 'ci music, whether that mnusic belongs to the folk-type~ ,he art-type. At the sanie time we kiiow that a vst of \"trash,\" poeing as patriotic songs and marches, ur -country, and never more so than at the Pre8eflt tile. :85e of songs the words are the merest dogge'!el and are àtched with rubbish which. cannot honestly be termied",
         "QUEBEC: PULP AND. PALPER A T a time when the country is weighed down with war debt, an adverse balance of trade, an unfavo exchange rate and face to face with the necessity of ad, a vigorous readjustment policy, it is of the utmost ixnpo that every possible encouragement be given to indi which are in any way capable of solving our econornie pro] Such a one is the pulp and paper industry. While no will dlaim that it is a panacea for ail our economie undoubtedly possesses many factors making for their sol We are told by'economists that the surest and quiokes of wiping out our adverse balance of trade is by expc The value of pulp and paper exported from Canada ei that of any other of our manufactured goods with the\u003c tion of munitions, and munition-making is now a thing past. Away back some twenty odd years ago a lone Arg launched out on the unknown and uncharted sea of business. It is noV recorded who the individual was, he sent the paper, what difficulties lie overcame in fi markets, in surmounting tariff walls, or in financin project. Although he only exported $1-22 worth of he was the pioneer in a movement which has grown Vo imi proportions. Froma the pitifuily small $122 worth whi exported twenty-seven, years ago our exports of pull paper now exceed $96,OOO,OOO and the end is not yet. The success which liasý been attained by the pull paper industry is not a matter of chance or haphazard , For the success of the industry three essentials are req naxnely, abundant water power, large available forest res( and a plentiful supply of labour. The provincq of Q possesses these to aremarkable degree. Out of the Domiý",
         "QUEBEC: PULP AND PAPER 8 otlwater power, amounting to 18,000,000 Hl.P., Quebec has ,OOO00 or one third, but only a seventh of this power hms «nu tapped by engineers. In addition Vo, that, the rivers nud streams of the province nearly ail fiow to, the South riih carnies the produets of forest and factory towards the reat markets of the United States. In regard Vo, forest realth, over one hall of the total pulp resources of Eastern ,anada, or 300,000,000 cords, are located in this province, rhile in the matter of labour the French lumberjack. is with- ut an equal in the wonld. Altogether its water power, raw laterial, labour, shipping facilities, and nearness Vo a great iarket, combine Vo, make this province one of the world's reat pulp and paper manufacturing centres. The remarkable growth and expansion of the pulp and aper industry in this province is directly traceable Vo the mr-sighted policy put into force sonie years ago by the Gouin 'overnment. Legisiation 'vas passed a decade ago prohibit- ig the export of pulp wood eut from (Jrown Lands, and as a ~sult of this policy Americnpae manufacturers, who \u003enmenly depended on this province for their supply of raw laterial, 'vere forced Vo miove their plants Vo Québec and ianufacture the pulp wood into paper on this side of the order. At the same time the Government adoptcd xnost rogressive measures in regard Vo conserving the water oiver of the province and safe-guarding the fonests by insti- iting thonough fine-protective measures. At the cost of iany miàllions of dollars great conservation dams 'vene built ri the Jjpper O\u003ettawa, in the St. 'Maurice Valley, and in o:ther a.rts of the province, with the result that the papen manufac- irer is now assured of a steady supply of 'vaten throughout me year instead of having floods in the spring and droughits the summer and fail. Stringent laws have been passed for ie protection of the forests, in which work the co-openation the lixnit owners and papen manufacture\"s 'as efllisted. i addition to the. above every possible assistance and encoun- ýement is given to those who desine Vo go in for ne-fores- Ltion and the, scientiflo cutting of thein timben nesouirveq, M",
         "56 TUE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE while the Forest Products Laboratories at McGill cont to do a most useful work of an experimental nature. To-day, as a resuit of wise legfisiation and favow natural resources, Quebec province has over forty pulp paper milis located within her borders, or ahnost hall o those operating throughout the Dominion. While the g of the industry has been most- rapid in the lust few yea is by no means of a 'mushroom. nature. It has develi throughout the years until to-day it is almost our j important manufacturing industry. For the year just el this country exported $96,000,000 worth of pullp and p products, which is a far cry from the paltry 8122 export littie over a quarter of a century ago. In 1917, we expo $7 1,000,000 worth; in 1916, $52,000,000; in 1915,8$36,000, and ini 1910, $13,000,000. In that year our exporte of n, print alone to, the UJnited States\u0026nmounted to but 81f,00 or 15% of their production. Last year our export of n print was $35,000,000, or 76% of the Ainerican produci To-day Canada îe producing 625,000 tons of newsprint annuin, or hall the amount produced by our big neigh] to the south; but in addition to that we are producing 1 quantities of higli grade book papere, writing papers, wrap papers, and other products. The Ujnited Sta.tes ie becoming more and more depený on Canada for lier pulp and paper. Quebec lias the lam available supply of pulp wvood on the continent, the gri-i water power resources, and as the nearest province to, large consuming centres of the Eastern States it must tinue as the great source of supply. The provincial authoi and the heads of the great paper mille in the province are 1 alive to the situation, and are prepared to \"carry on\" stiil greater extent. It is not only to the United States our paper men are looking for markets: tliey find that t i8 a great demand for our paper producte in South Arne South Africa, Australia,, and other parts of the world. order to take care of the export business, the paper mm turers have formed au Export Association which has fo 586",
         "QIJEBEC: PJLIP AND PAYER 587 ject the closest possible co-operation between the manu- eturers, thereby securing a standardized product and also eater efflciency in marketing and selling the output. The pulp and paper industry of the Dominion is one of ir great basic industries and is not dependent upon artîficial lis for' its maintenance. Just as long as the forests of the untrY are available for cutting over, as long as the streams* rnish Power and means of communication, and the industry tains its present'efficient technical heads, it will mamntaifl ; prominence. Within the last f ew years it has got upon a ible basis largely through the employment of technically tined men in its milis, through the adoption of conservaton licies ini regard to, the care and cutting of its forests, as ,11 as by the use of reforestation, the standarclization of its oduCts, and the adoption of progressive measures of Manu- ,turing and marketing, until to-day it is not only our Most .portant exportinq industry, but is destined to, be the most -portant of ail our manufacturing industries. The develop- mt Of the pulp and paper industry in this province is onlY its infancy. J. C. ROs",
         "THE STOOKS UPON THE HILL Like giants tali, upon the darkened hill The stooks stand out against the evening sky, And bld defiance to the bitter wind. W'hich from the rude north-west goes rushing by. The early snow from out the driving clouds H-as left upon each brow a wreath of white Which sparkles, a8 the fleeting eastern clouds lJnveil the rising spiendour of the nîght. In solemn, silent strength they stand alpone And look their last upon the land so, dear: To-morrow they will pass beyond the view, Another night will know they are not here J. H. AnNETT",
         "KIPLING [The substance of this paper was oriqinaily read to, the Enqlish Association, Toronto Branch.I IT is by a stroke of the irony of fate that this paper sees the light now when every occasion for it has long passed, or not yet corne. Before the war, or again long after the war, it miglit have been, it might again be, in season. Five years ago, when we were lapped in pacifism, a inild protest on behaif of Kipling, a suggestion that he knew something of the facts of life, if not s0 much about its theories, that he knew in particular something more about huinan nature and the British Empire, if not 80 much about a ghostly and rather ghastly International Polity, than fanatic Radicals, would have been iu season; but now it is ail to no purpose surely: you are a converted, you al know that soldiers have their uses and their virtues. I have been bemoaning the untinieliness of this Kipling paper, yet there are possibly 8ome consolations, and it is flot whoily untixnely. This is a very academic Society, yet flot whoily acadeniic; and the non-academic portion may have found Conrad and Hlenry James, George Meredith and George Bernard Shaw strong meat for babes. At the reading of these papers some of you did not say a word, 19nor understood none neither,\" perhaps. Well, if so, for this portion at lest here cornes consolation; here at least in Kipling ia a writer who writesi te be understanded of the people. Here is a paper on a comxnonish mian, who lives with men and knows men. Who, though he be the best educated, ini the narrow sense, of most of the writers we have discussed, la yet the most democratic, in the propcr sense of that much abused term, of them ail. Not democratic in politics no doubt, no more democratie than Shakespeare or Socrates; but dernocratic, like Shakespeare and Socrates, in the true sense that lie loves mankind, that he plays to its gallery,",
         "50 THE UNI VERSITY MAGAZINE more or less honourably, less cheaply than Shakespeare on the whole; less lusciously than Dickens, but always to the gallery, in the sense that lie appeals, like Shakespeare and Dickens, to common vulgar emotions and experiences; to the vulgar geniality or genial vulgarity of the ordinary -Englishman; to lis good nature and sentimentality; to, his vulgar patriotism even. There is no inconsistency, by the way, ln saying that Kipling appeals to vulgar patriotism, and yet in protesting that neither he nor the nation to whom he appeals say Much of patriotism: do flot slobber about it or celebrate flag-days or teach patriotism in the schools. There are appeals aud appeals. The appeal lie makes to lis countrymeni, and the ap-peal his countrymen prefer, is the recital of deeds doue and hardships braved; stories of men of action. Kipling has a gen jus for friendship, dhiefly with the vulgar: with the soldier man and the sailor man, two of the vulgarest of our race; but next with the engineer of every species and kind, nautical, electrical, and railway engineer: especially therefore witl the inventive and ingenious Arnerican; and next witl the professional administrator of the Middle classes, the officiais of the Indian Civil Service, the officers and doctors of the Indian Army: inexhaustible in hi's sympathies, and with no prejudices except the prejudice whîch Dickens shared and which most prof essors share- one bond at least, if there be but one between Kipling and ourselves--which Shakespeare, it is safe to, say, shared also, to the small measure of lis experience, the prejudîce agailis politicians and members of parliament, party polities and catch-words, suffrage and suffragists; especiaily Pagett, M.p.) and the men and women who find a panacea for huinan lUs in the equality of voting powers and in the counting of noses,, with no account of brains above them. or of biceps beneath, least of ail of national character beyond, above, below, greater than noses, brais, and biceps. Like his countrymein le takes to bis heart without distinction the five great meii of action: the soldier, the sailor, the missionary, the explorer, the true statesman (not the politician and circus-rider style 590",
         "KIPLING of statesman), and adds a sixth, the produet of his own age and modern conditions, the engineer ini ail his sorts and kinds. And yet, or perhaps 1 ought to say and therefore, lie is some- what heavily handicapped, 1 recognize, with an acadeinie audience, especially in his character of poet. We like oui poets to be poetic, figurs; to be stately, dignified, picturesque. You cannot look at the portrait of Dr. Bridges, prefixed with instinctive symboisu' by lus publishers, to the collection of his poems, without exclaiining at once-a poet or an artist! No other man lias quite that quality of clothing and coiffure. We like our poets to retamn a certain distance and aloofness from us in their private lives; not to be vulgarized by the. publicity with which Mr. Stead and the journalists have damned our age. Tennyson lived in the picturesque seclusion. of Aldworth, \"Far froma the m-adding crowd's ignoble strife,\" seeing before hlm onlY \"Green Sussex melting into, blue with one grey gkimpff Of sea.\" is house also was a settmng which matclied its owner. The frame suited the picture; even an unobservant stranger would at once have recognized that this man was not a commnI mma, but some sort of character: a person of quality. But Kipling is a journalist, and a journalist, on the whole, of the school which is distinct from men of letters. Is he not then lieavily hadcapped? IIIow can this littie newspaper mnan be a poet? li1e lias no distinction of birth, of UJniversity education, of style and language; lie lias not even the fads and fancies and sensational. eccentri- chties of belief whicli made Mr. Stead-evCf thougi lie yul- garized ail journalism-em after ail a separate figure and a sort of philosopher, at least of a Christian Science kind. Kipling lias travelled everywhere, talking, listening, observ- ing. Ris life hms been in the open air of action, rather than in the student's library, and lis b-ooks are the celebration of action, flot of thouglit. The ultimate creed of the Englishmnan is the good of action, and the einptiness of thouglit and speech. Kipling gives expression to that cree Ah!. but that anti- th\"si, sayB someone more pensively inclined, is shailow and",
         "52 THE UJNIVERSITY MAGAZINE will not bear exemination, if only because our action itself is continually only the reflex of some lonely thinker's thoughts and speech: if only because Kipling himself only inspires great actions-and he bas no doubt inspired many grect actions, 1e.g., the career of Colonel Elkington-by means of his words and writings. \"The song that nerves a natiou's arm is in itself a deed,\" says someone, and if se the antithesis disappears. Yes, and quite apart from this, the antithesis between thought and action, between words and deeds, seeins vain to the pensive mind, for a different and opposite reason: nature herseif lias created that antithesis and justified it: nature herseif has created. one man or even one race to think and talk and not to act, to know themselves and their neigh- bours and life, but only as bystanders, as onlookers, as spectators, who accomplish nothing practical, who leave neither Empires nor laws; who are thinkers, ineffectual thinkers often, iroxx\u0026 poiovre P7Eô KpaTiozvres and nothing beyond; and another man or even another race to aet and accomplish; to build Empires and laws and staanp their mark on everything, unconscious ail the while of their own nature and of huinan nature; men of action who kuow nothing. And if this be nature's law so to divide men, how vain is the antithesis and the attempt to exait either thought or action above the other. It would even seem that the thinkers and the taikers are excused from being anything more, nay, are forbidden to be more: that the writers and preachers of the Word are necessarily net the doers: that the doers are necessarily not the preachers: that the apostie disquieted hixnself unnecessarily when bis sensitive instinct warned him that if he preached much more to others he miglit himself become a castaway. Why not a eastaway if a preacher ? What else is a preacher but a breath, a flame that evaporates in hot air, that lias no place, no life, except within the pulpit ? lias not nature created, literary men and literature just to pour out words and thouglits which are sufficient in themselves, which have in themselves their end, their inspiration or otherwise ? by their words they are 592",
         "KIPLING justified and by their words they are condemned; for there is éinothing to them\" but words. What matter then if the outward lives of such men show every inconsistency in action, and range from picturesque eccentricities to common blackguardism ? Rousseau and Coleridge and Verlaine were born to express, in words, high thoughts and high emotions; with those expressions their if e work is accornplished, they are free to dispose of the balance of the time, the idie hours of relaxation and release, after any fashion that they please, and no man should be so Pharisaie, so Philistine, so prudish, as to challenge their sincerity, just because the life lived, the deeds done, ýare as worthless as the theories and words were fine and inspiring. I arn playing the advocatus diaboli, you perceive, against Kipling's rnan of action, whose actions endear him. and himn alone to Kipling. 1 arn pleading for the artistic and literary sinners whorn Kipbing's standard of judginent, judg- ment by life, by action, condemns. It is not for nothing that bis heart warms to Martha and is cold towards Mary. Per- sonally, of course, being a Professor 1 arn on the side of Mary; but I recognize none the less a certain sou ndness in the British leaning to Martha. It is better not to scrutimse toO closely these laws of nature: not to know too much about, them; not to become a sophist of Greece. It is a healthy instinct which bids the Englishman and every healthy man ignore, avoid, shut his eyes to that law of nature which tends to separate thought and action as incompatible. It is a healthy instinct whîch seeks to vault over the guif between thought and action; to vault it, vault it again and continually to vault it, until a man lia established. ini his own life a fair compromise between those rival, opposite, and ahnost incompatible spirits. I amn not saying that Kipling desires that compromise; he is intolerant of thoughts and theories; he is content with wholesome primary instincts and their most wholesome and prixnary expression, that is, their expression, not in thouglit and speech, not in meditation and in eloquence, but just ini plain silent, action.",
         "94 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE Anyhow that antithesis, such as it is, and however it be true or untrue, lies at the root of Kipling's books; of lia poetry alike, and of his prose. In his case there is no occasion to separate the poetry and the prose. Literature is an appeal to the mind of man, tû his emotions, imaginations, reason. If it is also an appeal te his senses; if it has a certain music and rhythmn which makes a sensuous appeal to his ears as well, it is called poetry. But there is no vital difference between Kipling's prose and poetry: they appeal to the same emotions, inaginations, instincts, and reason, with or without the added sensuous appeal to the ears. The poetry is just as simple, just as much addressed to the man in the street, as the prose; nay, more so, obviously. The sailing of the « Bolivar \" is to fastidious ears, I pre- suime, no less than to fastidious minds, poor stuif. Its appeal is not primarily to the ears, but to, a non-f astidious spirit, to the spirit of action, the passion for adventure, the reckless risking of life. A trifle shocking perhaps the \"Bolivar,\" and yet not unworthy of the literature of a nation flot inter- ested to, create literature prixnarily but to create men and seamen and to rule the waves. Ris journalism handicaps him in another way. 1 know estimable and gifted UJniversity Prof essors who dainn the \" Recessional \"-as Charles Lamb damned the Baptist Minister -at a venture; just because it is Kipling's and therefore, they are certain, îust a piece of copy, just a fragment of journalism written to \" feature \" a volume needing advertise- ment wîth the middle classes: just a picturesque impression of a clever and detached mind, watching the English public; eatching on quickly to its religiosity and its profound hypo.- crisy, and giving expression-for the sake of a cheap popularity -to the hypocritical religion of the English. Well, it may be that there is a simpler explanation of the \"Recessional;\" just that the author is hirnself an Englishn and an instinctive, unconscious Englishman, and therefore also--as the dyer's hand is subdued to what it works in-a 594",
         "KIPLING 5 religious hypocrite; neither more nor less sincere or insincere than bis couxitrymen. But perhaps the French and other crities Of English hypocrisy have not quite touched bottom yet in their attemPt to plumb that bottomiess sea Of national charactellstCs. Ylypocrisy as generally understood is acting to deceive, the publie, but hypocrisy as predicated by Frencbjtefl of Englisb- mnen is rather a malîious and French synonym for aspiration: the acting, the efforts, the exertions whicb a manl makes to, impose upon himself, to mae himself better than he has been. If you remove the hypocrisY you destroy the aspiration. The Englishman with bils political instinct is f\"11 of L'atin affectatio, which, is variously translated and with equal correct- nes 1\"aspiration,\" \" Caffectation;\"Y for the 'Roman also was an Englishman, full of hypocritical aspiration,~ of aspiring hypocrisy. To corne down f rom these generalities to issues more preie, if Kipling had done nothing else be would still have added to English poetry a not£ long waited for, late f ouid- the muse of science:- the tentb Muse. This is the age Of Science, and everyone bas said that science would some day find ber poet who would see hier romance, anid not repeat after the forlorn fashion of the noblemani in McAndrew's Hlymn the ancient lamentations about its banalitY and its materialism. But no one bas realized Bo 'well as Kipling this general aspiration, tbis vague premorntioil. McAndrew's Hymin is stili the best tbiiig of its kind; there are even persons not unîntelligent, wbo consider it the best poem, ever written: \" 4The King\") and \"ÎThe Miracles\") are in tbe sanie vein. There is tbe tenlth muse célebrating mechanical science, as she glorifies the passage of -the railwaY train across a landscape: the beauty of London's smoky atmosphere, to the eyes of Japanese artists' the beauty of Sheffield's smoke and Sheffield's chemicals, advertised to the world to-day by conunon post-cards, as picturesque as they are cheap. Rere, îs a vein of poetry scarcely scratcbed at present, but it is Kipling who has opened it. Or take agaÎn the lighter 605",
         "THE UNI VERSITY MAGAZINE side of Kipling's verses: \" Departmental Ditties \" have been cailed \"banjo songs.\" \"So be it,\" says an English critie; \"but we must go back to Béranger to match them. A banjo song inspired is better than serious poetry that is not.\"1 There is the root of the matter. There, is the difference between the real poet laureate of Great Britain and the titular laureate: between Kipling and Doctor Bridges. Every human being Dlot a pedant or a paciflst can read Kipling: can even read him in quantities more than the majority of authors. The taste for Dr. Bridges' poetry is an'acquired taste, very slowly, very painfuily acquired: acquired, if at ail, at Oxford and Cambridge in their honour schools of classies. I shall fot be suspected of disliking these IJniversities and their honour schools of classies; but better a single book of Kipliig's, any book almost, than a wilderness of the English Hellenists, Bridges and William Morris and Co. Yes, even (if \" Atlanta \" be excepted) with Swinburne included. Is this blasphemy for a Professor of Greek ? It is not blas- phemy; by those who died at Marathon it is not. Whom do their ghosts read to-day ? if so be that they can read English, as they stretch their feet before the hearth in the taverns by the waters of Acheron, Kipling or Dr. Bridges? Whom does Admirai Phormio prefer, this English poet of the sea and of ships, of \" dromond \" and \" cataphract, \" Of \" thranite \" and Of \" thalamite,\" this celebrator of Greek galleys, or Dr. Bridges? Whom does Aýschylus prefer, this English poet of soldiering and sailoring or Dr. Bridges ? Whom does Socrates prefer ? round whom ail gathered to hear him. talk, because they knew he was a man who had done so much more than talk: whoe sermons were the only serious talk some soldiers would accept, because he had earned the right to use high words by deeds that matched the words. Whom does Plato prefer? Plato who pines through long pages to, be a man of action and flot of words only, and only gave up the ambition when he had tried his hand at action, had tried to hold down Syracuse, and had faited ?",
         "KIPLING We read and rightly the literature of Greece; but it is of decadent Greece: as literature is naturally a hot-house flower which glows brightest in periods of decadence, when there is nothing more serious than. literature to do or think of; in the intervals, I mean, between the greater periods of action; in the fin-de-siècle intervals, when a worn-out age is passing on its death bed, and a new age of action is not yet born. Our Greek literature, for the greater part, cornes. from decadent Greece; but the great Greece of great actions, the Greeks who did what Great Britain seeks to do to-day, rescue the world from, the tyranny of ambitious barbarians, these men were flot just \"damned literary men\"; and these men would give short shrift, one may conjecture, to the works of the English Hellenists if they could get a copy of Kipling into their horny hands, before their weather-beaten cheeks and faded. eyes. These men were men, if scholars aISo-çLXaoço 6Ee PcLXcicat. Few men-few educated men even--go to poetry for affectations and artificialities-for Patristie literature so to say-but rather for the simple sentiments and naive emotions which are always in danger of perishing by the force of educa- tion, sophistication and experience, and by the mere efflux of time; which are in danger of perishing at any rate beneath the crushîng materialism of a man's prime and middle age. Many modern democrats seem to, me to misjudge things and exactly to reverse their right relations. Poetry is one thing, politics another. If there be anything wherein the voice of the people, of the mas of us, has a right to be heard, it is in poetry; for poetry is the voice of elemental and elemen- tary feeling and of national character. If there be anything where the demos or the mass of us ought to be humble and follow our betters it is, in the science of politics, or at least in many technical departments thereof,-e.g., in foreign polities, or in economiîcs, wherein we have no knowledge iind no right of control. Yes, but \"Kipling is s0 vulgar,\"e says some intellectual. \"That's very vulgar, father,\" said Sir Walter Scott's more feminine daughter, if I recollect, on",
         "58 THE UJNIVERSITY MAGAZINE one occasion to her father. \"Vulgar, my dear,\"1 said the old aristocrat, \"do you know what vulgar means ? It means comxnon; everything best in the world, the best emotions, the best aspirations, the best instiuncts are ail coimnon. Very vulgar things indeed, my dear; go away and tliank God that it is so.\" I presume that is sound sense, and none the worse from the lips of Sir Walter, who, was noV a democrat in the narrow sense. There are qualities, he meant, and quai- ities. There is quality in the sense of some idea or series of ideas, some art which few people reacli and few value. It is far fetched: difficuit to, attain; when attained it is still caviare to the man in the street. Lt is quality without quantity, without substance, that je, romance without reality. But there are other qualities, the best in human nature, which being the best are rarely attained and in scant measure; yet they make their appeai universally to ail clusses and natures: to literate and ihiÎterate. Here also as in the other case, few there be that find them: yes, but none tliat do not love them and would fain find them. There is no contradiction here between quality and quantity. He who appeals to these qualities lias the world to appeal to, for these qualities appeal to the wliole world. And yet that does flot diminish the quality of lis appeal; the quality of his work is best, thougli he lias the iargest quantity of readers, because lie is appealing to tlie best qualities in themn, the best qualities for ail their commonness and vulgarity, for ail their universality. The common people hear such a poet gladly, for tlie higli quality of lis appeal. Kipling is the unlaureated laureate because lie appeals strongly to these elusive yet primary instincts; to vulgar courage, to, commnon lo-ves andi sorrows, to, the cliild's lieart ini ail men and to, the dliildren wlio are in ail men's liearts: to, tlie infinite admiration of the street, for the five or six great men of action, tlie sokiier, the sailor, the mîssionary, the explorer, tlie engineer, ànd the true statesman. Well, to resume, Kipling has this vulgar passion for reality, for action and men of action: none tlie less, all the more 598",
         "KIPLING 9 presumably, because he is himsell only a man of words, a journallst and story teller. A man's phiiosophy--says some- one--is the obverse, the complement of his character. 1 have internai. evidence only on which to, rely, but between the Unes, e.g., of that vigorous dream-since become a reality-called \"The Army of a Dream,\" 1 think I read the confession that the writer himself would not have succeeded as a man of action, would neyer have become a frrst-rate driving force, a great slave driver; would neyer have speeded Up production and energy, as the great soidiers and adminis- trators speed them. up: it is rare for the genius of sympathy and friendship to possess such driving power. So aiso it may be read between the lines of \" Stalky and Co. \" that the writer wouid have naturally emerged from the training school of Indian oflicers and officiais there described an officiai or officer himself, had not his talents been s0 markedly of a different type. In that-description of a rather abnormal and strange school the later career of the writer is not obscurely anticipated. For in Stalky's school there are three classes of boys: the docile \" swats\"' or \" smugs\" or \" grinds \" or 4\"cissies,\" or whatever the present slang be for that small band which has in its tixne included Demosthenes, Lamb, Coleridge, and Troilope, and the other sufferers of genius who were miserable at school. Second, the young ruffians who play games and little else: but third, also, a curious band of outlaws and vagrants who despise about equally \"the flanneled fools and muddied oafs \" of the athietie field, and the pale-f aced students of Latin verses and conic sections. These CUrious and abnormai outlaws defy masters alike and boys: cut football for the sake of smoking, but over their illicit pipes read Browning and 'Ruskin with keen zest, compose satire and topical verses, write and draw caricatures. Obviously here is the buddîng of ail the volumes about India, Soutb Africa, and the Seven Seas: the boy had a gif t for expression and for story-teiling more than for conmmand. lie had the makings of a hero worshipper, rather than of a hero. 599",
         "60 THE UJNIVERSITY MAGAZINE And now that I arn talking of \" Stalky and Co.\" I had better quote a passage about the fiag. Messrs. Gardiner and Massingham and simi1ar fanatics, the arid Radicals and the ingenuous Professors who swallow acid Radicalism as gospel, find a compendium for Kipling in beer, Bible, and fiag. 1 dispute the compendium. I think this is a passage which, in the proper sense of the mucli abused words, is the exception proving my rule that there is no0 such compendium in fact. Read \" Stalky and Co.,\" page 242, and you will \u0026-e that the compendium is no compendium. However that be, Kipling solved the problem of a pro- fession in that way and became first and foremost a sort of glorified reporter of India, of her scenery, lier sorrows, lier superstitions. Hie talked to lier peasants and lier priests and lier anchorites* He was not like the British officer, a solitary figure on the Indian railway platform, waitiug alone for lis train: eut off not more by separate colour than by separate waiting room from the cultivators tlironging the\u0026r platform with their wives, children, and furniture, and bedding; and camping sometimes for a week before tliey find room, upon the train for their migrations and pilgrixnages. Hie made it his business to know sometliing of tliese men of action as well as of thie officers. His first serious book--says its introduction-was the fulfilment of a promise made to a one-eyed lioly man, who lived on an island in tlie middle of a river, and fed thie fishes witli littie bread pellets twice a day, and buried thie corpees wliicl tlie fresliets stranded tliere. Tlie lioly man advisecj hini to begin a story, bring it to a crisis, leave it tliere, and tlien pass round the liat before continuing. Tis is the Indian story-teller's metliod. Kipling recognized thie metio\u003c of tlie serial story, but preferred to publisli ini one book and at one time \" Life's Handicap \" or \" Stories of My Own People. 1 Here is a piece of restrained patlios fromn tliet book; flot musliy pathios like Dickens, but restrained. It is the story of an Englishman who liired a native house and took to, it \"wîtliout benefit of clergy\" a littie Maliomedan girl. 600",
         "KIPLING 0 They were very happ.y and their baby was happy and com- pleted their happiness; but the heats came and the baby died and the child wife died just as the rains began, and her mother begged ai the furniture except the bed, and the Englishman went back beneath the downpour to his officiai home (\" With- out benefit of Clergy,\" \"Life's Handicap,\" p. 157). 1 do not know how rnuch is fact and how rnuch fiction ini these stories. Kipling, like every story teller, freely enhances and embroiders. One of these stories is a trifle horrible-\" The Mark of the Beast.\" Probably even it is not wholly com- pact of imagination: the writer bored his friends, as 1 have noted, with the stock quotation from \" Hainlet, \" \" There are more thîngs,\" etc.; and this philosophy of his, borrowed frorn liamlet and from Purun Bhagat, the Hindoo hermit, who \" did not believe in miracles because ail things were one big miracle, and when a mani knows that he has something to, go upon; he knows that there is nothing great and nothing littie in the world (\" 2nd Jungle Book,\" pp. 51-52), and this sense of mystery, reinforced by his sense of reality, his passion for facto, leaves littie room for works of pure imagination, sheer invention. More likely the sensitive, sceptical, sympathetie spirit of the author, and of the doctor frorn whom he gets the story, inter- prets it as based on sorne obscure phenornena, still hidden frorn western science. The same suggestion cornes from the story cailed \"The Bisara of Pooree.\" The Bisara is a little charm fatal to its owner. Kipling representa hixnself as deliberately and carefully hiding it away, that there xnay be no owner. The creeds of the East lie heavier on hixn than on hus countryxnen. This is not the place to discuss at length Kipling'is Indian politics: he may have been wrong about South Africa: it looks very much like it: very mucli as if Sir Henry Campbell Bannerman was right and the other side wrong. But, after ail, the Dutch are not only white men but our own kin. There was nothing needed to restore harrnony but a good fight, and now that the good fight bas corne and gone and cleared the air, and also-îneidentally-has given Great 601",
         "62 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE Britain at last a real arxny and something like a real union with lier daugliter states, harmony should be possible, even-ý easy. But there is littie or no analogY between South Africa and India. India is flot a nation but a host of nations, none of them white. Further, its problein is complicated by the saie difficulty which Greece presented to, Rome. The cleverest of Indian races, the most capable of rising under present conditions to political power (of succeeding, I mean, in those competitive examinations which we have established for ourselves and which for us are not too absurd and impossible), the most literary and intelligent of Indian races, the Bengalese, are also the inost worthless morally; tûnid, dishonest, cunning, and unscrupulous as a decadent Greek. This is the race that takes to politics, that is, to civil- ized and peaceful quarreling, that talks politics, that demanda a political equality which it does not possess by nature and character when compared with the other races, and stml less when compared with the governing race. Sucli a story as \"The Head of the District\" sets forth the dîfficulties of the radical solution of the Indian question; of the policy offered by the imaginary Pagett, M.P., and the member for Tooting: off ered in actuality by the late Keir IHardie and a score of other British politicians of the samie school. Lt is a tragedy they seem to think, the best thing in life being parliamentary quarreling and verbal jangllng, that a great Asiatic peninsula 8hould be governed by a f ew aliens fromn Europe who recognize no, Indian parliainent. Tragedy it often is-f or the aliens. The peninsula which under British ndle is for the first turne at peace, gets what peace van give to, its best men, its peasants and farmers; while the soldierly races find employment under the British fiag. Peasanta, farmers, soldiers are contented: only the Scribes and Pharisees, lawyers, journalists, politicians and agitators of Bengal suifer. But for the aliens, who spend their lives in a climate where they cannot make their home, where their children cannot live after the fifth year; where the white race does not seem to survive after the third generation; whereby it baces it,\u0026 602",
         "youth and breaks the hearts *of its womenkind by-sending away to Europe its children; whereby it spends its old age away from the scene of its manhood and its best labour; in soine unknown and unknowing English town, Brighton, Clifton, Cheltenham, Bath, or Bournemouth, which no longer counts as \"home,\" whatever it may once have counted; whence the old man's heart flues far away to \" the land of Regrets,\" the land where he has spent his energies and himself but has not made his abiding stay, ah! tragedy enough here for him and to spare! The Asiatic doctrine of the unreality of life, so foreign to the British mind, 110w finds a home from very force of circumstance, by very pressure of experience, it well may be, in the heart of the Anglo-Indian, ex-soldier and ex-magistrate. How can he escape the Indian Doctrine, which his own career ini India illustrates ? \"The shadows corne and go, the shadows corne and go. \" \"Life's Handicap,\" 1 think, was Kipling's first serlous book rather than his first book. The first book was more cynical, naturally. \"Departmnental Dîtties\" was written in the twenties when a man's intellect is in its prime and at its best and sees easily through the vanity of life; whien the young man, like and unlike his Creator, surveys life con- fidently and confidently pronounces judgement-\" And behiold it is ail very bad, \" and the evening and the morning are about his twenty-fifth birthday. But there is, nevertheless, good hurnorous stuif in \"Departmental Ditties.\" There is \"My ival,\" which, is as good as Calverley, high praise though that be, and would have pleased Calverley very rnuch; which means by inter- pretation that it is far better than anything in Sir Alfred Austin or Dr. Bridges, so-cailed laureate8. I suppose it was on the strength of \"Departmnental Ditties,\" and littie else, that Mr. Paul Elmer More, one of the few good crities whom the U.nited States have produced, pronounces sentence that there is little sense, of mystery, of asceticisin, of restraint, of disillusioninent, of beauty in KIPLING 603",
         "64 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE Kipling, Hie suggests that Kipling and Fitzgerald were the two popular poets of England twenty years ago, because the national taste and temper were badly divided betweeu substances without form and form without substance. lHe ineans, 1 think, that since everyone wants each of these in poetry, the publie instinct seized upon these twov poets, because the one set forth the philosophy of form with such Iucidity, such logic, such happiness of phrase, sueh melody and even passion, that he made even a poor and threadbare philosophy interesting and fascinating, while the other having for bis subjeet the real passions and aspirations and high instincts of man, the deepest and most inexplicable, and most \"inexpressive\" things, gave them, beyond other mien, an expression, the form of which seemed comparatively ade- quate and sufficiently passionate. Fitzgerald charmed because hie was s0 superior to Williami Morris, Dr. Bridges, and a host of other \" idie singera of an empty day,\" even Swinburne included, while hiniself belonging to the idile singer sehool; Kipling because hie waa the most vocal, the least stammering, the least tongue-.tied interpreter of things too deep for words. As for the lack of mysticism, o! the sense of beauty, of the sense of disillusionxnent, that is a hard sayîng to anyone who knows \"The Miracle of Purun Bhagat,\" or \"They,\" or \"Wireless,\" or \"The Brushwood Boy,\" or \"The Children of the Zodiac,\" or \"The Real Romance.\" Mr. More makes a grudging exception in favour of two lines of this latter poem, but why i favour of two limes only ? and what else la \" If\" 11 Ia there mot disllusionmemt enough in ail conscience in \" If»\"? Ilere is the very-spirit'o! illusion and disiilusionment, alike- of faith amd hope and yet of knowledge and experience, woven, ecd, into the warp and woof of the poem: here la a poem of action and reflection in equal proportions, a poem o! forni and substance alike, a poem of vigorous f orm, even though the. forni be rougi, and packed fuill of thought and moral exalta- tion, full o! substance; a poem whÎch justifies poetry, for it la the putting of the best thought into a language less 604",
         "KIPLING 0 înadequate than prose to stir and master the heart. If a man can \"treat those two impostors just the same,\" is hie not sufflciently disillusioned, suficicntly ascetie, sUffieýiently detached from life and its vanities? There is mannerismn no doubt, a double mannerism in the last line, but it lias its place and its value; it is the manneri-sm of the writer and his race: the deliberate temperamental jEc\u003e or \u003ettrris, which hates above everything to gushi and slop over and exaggerate: uEtwo-ts is the note of Al intellectual men, but of one race chiefly, and that a race far from intellectuial, the British. It is a moral quality with them, flot thie result of intellect. And so the end of the poemn runs simply \" You'll be a man,\" and then, with another mannerism, of the saine kind but greater, a deliberate \"my son\": nothing higil flown or higli falutin in the peroration; nothing Emersonian or Amien- cari: and for the best of reasons; high words, tail talk, are an unpardonable luxury, an unforgivable sensuality. Anyone eau utter them, except the man who believes ini themn too deeply so to, do. What lie f cels most he will not say; what lie says being from the outer lips lie neeessarily do'es- not, deeply feel: for the passion of high things lias one lawful expression and one only, it must express itself in decds: it was meant te be the steamn of life, to, drive Iife's locomotive along long and weary roads, across crazy bridges over roarig floods of dejection and discontent, and at last into the distant unknown goal. To blow off this steam in words, is as thiougli the locomotive should misuse, abuse, it8 throttle and its safety valve, iutended only for the excess of steamu and not for its main volume. \"You cannot have your emotion and express it also,\" said the reflective Oxford peet. Lu the second place, Kipling is the journalist and the reporter of the comnxon soldier, and finds, much more in the cominon soldier of course than Bible, boutle, and fiag. If lie hid been uothing more than the reporter of Orthenis, Learoyd and Mulvaney, he would. still have earned bis faine. These men ame real creations and real, men: we don't doubt it to-day: we know it only too well. The world 605",
         "66 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE is full of them and of their heroism, and can hardly contain anl the booksÊ that are being written about them. Mons and Ypres have crowned them:- the soldier passes-as ]Kiping says with bis usual vivacity-fromn one extremne to the other in popular estimation. In the days of peace he is a \"brutal and licentious soldiery.\". (See \"Departmental Ditties,\" pp. 59-62.) The churches wiil not look at him. The Metho- dists, whom Learoyd joins, because he is in love with a consuniptive Methodist girl, frown upon him: he is a braud barely plucked from the burning: he is the sort of person who will enlist: and when he does enlist, they cast him out: ail but the dying girl who knows a man when she sees one. (\" On Greenlow 11i1,\" pp. 82-83.) I was*speaking of Kipling as technically better educated than some of the other writers we ail of us discuss. I meant merelly that as a fact he bas mucli more Latin and Greek and more EngIish literature than Mr. Wells, or than the melancholy and more interesting peasant novelist Thomnas Hardy. Kipling evîdently neyer learned the classics well enough to appreciate them much: lie went to, them like other sehool boys to scoif : lie did not remain to pray. A few Greek words like OaXap1ri and ûpaviriiç, 46w and KQ7-tç,Çp\u003cXriCT belonging to bis beloved art of navigation, a song with a crude beginning from ilorace, and a gla.nce at Admirai Phormio, these are the chief relies of bis school classica. (See \"Traffies and Discoveries,\" p. 36, \"When the robust and brass-bound man,\" etc.) But the reuit is that his literary education gives to Kipling's tales a peculiar literary flavour not found in these other writers. It makes bis absurd and humorous characters more absurd even than Dickens' characters ini a way, though ini another way they are mucli lems absurd, because mueli les extravagant in personality. A literary quotation in Kipling on illiterate lips seems grotesque, but it is only a verbal grotesqueness. In Dickens' delicious extravagances the grotesqueness lies in the murdering and inisapplication Of Borne quotation, 606",
         "KIPLING 607 which is hardly literary, since it is fetched from the Bible, or from soine siznilar source of household words. When we get a laughter-loving genius like Dickens who can give us something worth laughing at, the amazing and side-splitting caricatures of Micawber, Pecksniff, Gamp, of course we imnxortalize him-why not? The British imniortalize the man who makes thern laugh loudest: and none the iess, ail the more, if he does not bother thern to think: if he gives thern not subtie pictures of their own foibles, like Miss Austin or Thackeray or Trollope or Kipling hixnself often, but just sheer, preposterous, and delicious caricature: a continuous Punch, the better for being con- tinuous. We ail love such passages as Mrs. Gamp is, always ready to give us. \"But I will say,\" said Mrs. Gamp, \"and I would if I was led a~ Martha to the stakes for it,\" or this othier: \"The Ankworks Package, \" Mrs. Gamp replied, \"And I wish it was in Jonadge's belly, 1 do.\" For such passages we pardon the other caricatures of Dickens, which are rather horrible: the caricatures of pathos: the caricatures which deface-which would spoil, if it could, be spolt-the pathos of a chiid's death bed. There is no such uproarious and exquisite nonsense fer readers of Kipling. There is oniy the miid surprise and amusement provoked by hearing a literary and more or les recondite quotation on illiterate lips. Pycroft thie sailor quotes Browning (\" Mrs. Bathurst,\" p. 334-T. D).). Thie cat in the oid water miii quotes the same poet twice (pp. 344-350), both of them brilliant quotations,-of the very best of Brown- ing: Kipling neyer quotes anything but the best. \"Wireless \" (\"Traffie and Discoveries \"), is mnuch more deliberately and avowedly literary. A consuxnptive druggist is in love with a girl caiied Fanny Brand. He hias neyer heard of Keats, but he writes verses to his Fanny f rom a similar environment. And so, the spirit of Keats, surmnoned by an adjoîning wireiess apparatus, appears to, assist hixn. And a stanza from \" St. Agnes' Eve \" la pai nfuliy wri tten out. And then an attempt la made by the druggist to compose",
         "68 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE two uines which Kipling remarks are two of the five best limes in English iîterature: the two famous lines about \"magie casements, opening on the foam of perilous seas, i fairy lands forlorn.\"1 Kipling quotes also the three other best limes: they are from Coleridge and his \"Kubia Khan,\" and are no doubt, well worth quoting. But this is the extreme case of literary criticisin and allusion which I have found in bis stories. At this point, if at ail, I ought to say a word of his artistry. Some foreigners have written whole books on this one subject, but to so analyze a poet is rather like peeping and botanizing on a mother's grave; besides, personally, 1 wholly disbelieve the Stevensonian theory. Stevenson analyzed the passage froin Keats' ode to a nightingale just referred ta into permutations and combinations of p, y, and f: credai Judaeu; let the latest materÎalistic man of science who belongs to Berlin or Judoea believe it: the charin seems ta lie in picturesque images more than ini nelodjous sounds; and Kipling's force seems to derive from the saine origins. H1e has written nothing more characteristie than \" The Bolivar,\" and no lines in it more characteristic than Once we saw between the squalls, ]yin' head to swell, Mad with work and weariness, wishin' they was we, Somne damned llner's liglits go by like a grand hotel; Cheered her fromn the Bolivar, swampin' in the eu. It is the picture, not the permutations of letters, which fixes the passage i the memory; its verbal artifices are nothing more novel than alliteration-the oldest, éasiest, and most obvious of artifices. I think the same may be said of the most effective stanza of \" Sussex \": Hlere leaps ashore the f ull sou'west, Ail heavy-winged wîth brine; Here lies above the folded crest The Channel's leaden Une; And here the sea-fogs lap and cling, And here, each warning each, The sheep-bells and the ship-bells ring Along the hidden beach. 608",
         "KIPLING 0 The alliteration is ciever, but it is to the eye an\u0026the memory; it is in the pictures and the associations which the limies evoke that the fascination of \" Sussex\" lies, not in the permiutations Of (4s \"and \"b \"and '\"c.\" There are many other minor traces of hîi Englishi reading. \"Barrack Room Ballads\" has echoes of Swiniburne at lis best, ini \" Ataiantaý\" that is to say:- (\"The Masque of Plen t y\"). IlSea Warf are,\" his last book (page 45), lias a parody, probably an unconscious memory, of the littie known contemipor-ary poet, F. W. Bourdillon: the poem. called \"The American\" in the \"Seven Seas\" is obviously suggested by Emersom's IlBrahma \": surely a feat of discrimination, since \" Bralima\"1 is the only poem Emerson ever wrote-as the littie Sunday- school girl aiso recognized-whîdh is worth memorizing. No, flot quite, Kipling lias found and used one et lier tag from Emerson which. is effective (vide the limes prefixed to \"The Children of the Zodiac\"). \"The iast department\" (iii \"Departmental Ditties\") is a -vigorous exercise in the style of Fitzgerald and Omiar Khayam, a Maliometan student in the story \"On the City Wall\" (p. 144) quotes Dickens and \"Nicholas Nileby7.\" IlBaa Baa Black Sheep \" lieads a chapter with four of the- best limes of Clougli-but they are stramgely labelled, \"The City of Dreadful Niglit,\" and are aseribed apparently to Jamnes Thomson, wlio is more correctiy quoted in \"The Liglit, thiat Failed.\" One of the best lies of Matthew Arnoldl's- \"Thle unplumbed sait estranging sea\" appears in another story- always the best, that istlie point, \" choice Latin, pickedl phrase, Tully's every word. No gaudywatre, like GandoIf's isecond mie: Tully, my masters!1 Ulpian serves li is need!1\" But to return from, this long digress on Kipling's litcrary education to the tliree soldiers. It is mot beer, Bible, and flag which inspires the study of oficers and privates called \"Ris Private Honour\" (\" Many Inventions\"), nor \"The Courtship of DinaI Shadd\" (\"Life's Handicap\"). This story contains, I suppose, the best piece of rhetorie ini Kipling- the drunken Irishwoman's ourse when Mulvamiey tàke8 Dînah 609",
         "10 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE instead of her dubîous daughter; it is just native Irish elo- quence, some one may say, and Kipling is merely reporting it -very probably, but at least lie lias a perfect flair for the best rlietoric, none thie less good, ail the better, rather, because it falis from illiterate lips and fades away at last into an unwiling and Balaarn-like blessing. But next to the soldier Kipling loves the sea and the saüor; best of ail the modem scientific sailor, tlie engineer. But flot him only-tie sailor for liimself-tlie 'common, vulgar, liard-drinking saîlor. There is \" Captains Courageous, \" -tiere is tlie extraordinarily vivid study of the Eastern seas called \" The Disturber of Traffie \" (M. I.). In a similar vein are, \"The Rhyme of tlie Tliree Sealers\" (S.S.); \"The Last Chantey\" (S.S.); \"The Bell Buoy\" (F.N.); \"The Rhyme of tlie Three Captains,\" \"Thie Mary Gloster.\"ý About this last ballad I liave noted a littie article by Mr. Lewis Freeman, tlie American, in \"Land and Water. \" It is addressed to British Mercliant Captains \" (L.W., August 17, 1916, p. 16). (See \" The Mary Gloster, \" pp. 135, 136, 137, 138.) After the common sailor cornes tlie skWled sailor; then meclianical engineers, and engineering in general, and science ini general. I have saîd enougli about tliis already. Lt is for rnany people Kipling's titie to farne, tliough 1 arn only ranking it as the fourtli of lis titles. Tliere are stories and verses too nurnerous to record properly under this head: \"'The Slip Tliat Found Herseif, \" (\" Day's Work,\") etc., and a liost of others. The man who wrote these thîngs would have been a competent meclianie if fate liad flot made hixn a journalist. No mere craft of journalisrn could have mnspired tlie verve with whidli this journalist celebrates the last theme of prose and poetry-the triwnph of science. I corne to the next tap; the children's tap. The cry is back to Christianity, but ail the world lia long ago returned, in the matter of child worship, to tlie wisdorn of Cliristianity's founder. Kipling is not the first at that shrine--but he wor- slips well; far more agreeabiy than Dickens. I suppose a third of lis work is devoted to dliildren and dear to them; 610",
         "KIPLING \" Puck of Pook's Hilli\" and \" Rewards and Fainîes \" are specially for children, rnost readable though they be to, everyone with a littie sanetified common sense and a love of history. Besides these two books there are isolated stories else- where. \"They,\" e.g., the story of the dead children who gather round the beautiful Sussex house (under Chancton- bury Ring), of the inaiden lady who is blind and has no other consolation but the sound of their voices and the rustie of their clothes, and who keeps open bouse and open nursery and play-room for them. They have been excused \"frorn the Father's Face\" to, visit her because she loved much. \"Shail I that have suffered the children to corne to, me hold them against their will,\" says the introductory verse. Not much beer and flag about that verse, by the way, though somnething of the Bible, and none the worse on that account. These books and stonies appear to, me to, be sound and wholesomne and first-rate reading for childhood; though I amn aware that they appear light and fn.othy and sentimental to, the more severe taste of Americatis. Once upon a time I was sitting on a sunimer afternoon beneath Cheyenne 'Mt., in Colorado, and above the sun-flecked prairies, wrîting my luminous, 1 beg pardon- my voluminous es,-say on Herodotus, while my wife discoursed George -Macdonald's \"At the B3aek of the North Wind\" to, the children. A visitor wa-sarmiouned, and a member of our common profession with lier youthful Amrnencan daughter of ten years of age. \"I arn sutrpnised,\" she said severely, \"that you allow these sentimental thiligs to be read to, your children--Charýlotte heesit uip Charlotte, love-iÎs reading 'Arts and Crifts of thec Middle Ages.\" Poor Charlotte! And then we are surp)riscd( that American wornen grow up callous! that even ore of the best of thern secs nothing more in the most chivaîrous anid rornantie and disinterested war ever waged than just a dog-fighit and a rnix-up of drunken rowdies; or at the best, arts and crafts of the Middle Ages. The intellectuals have no intelligence-the spring and source of ail intelligence is denied them, ýsyxnpathy; knowledge at one main entrance quite eut off.",
         "62 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE The next tap is part of this-a doubleý-j ointed tap with two faucets, the cool water of history and the warxn water of animial stories; the most popular, I suppose, of ail Kipling's taps, and rnning freely through ail his books. Through the two Jungle B3ooks flrst and foremost, but through ail. Everyone knows the Mowgli stories, based, like everything in Kipling, 1 presume, on fact. The Roman~s are not likely to have invented Mowgli, they found him- that is ail. Then there is the story of \" Kaa's \" hunting-the story of the fascination exercised by the python upon monkeys; upon the Bandarlog. Kipling like the rest of us does flot like inonkeys-they are painfully suggestive of man's history, whether it be his rise or his LaUl. is verses, had they been written yesterday, might have been taken as a satire at the expense of the Allies and for the glorification of Germauy. The Bandarlog have ail the foibles of the Allies before the war -they dream, and chatter, and have no law, no order, no settled purpise, no foreign policy-only \" brightest transports, choicest prayers which bloom their hour and fade \"-nothing but idealsm--empty, luxurious, self-indulgent imaginations whieh, are not the seed of action, but begin and end in theinselves; and with these also, many personal. remarks and personal squabbles. Iiead the \"Road Song of the Bandarlog in the Tree Tops\" (\" lst Jungle Book\" or\" Songs from Books\" pp. 92-93). Then there is IlRikkitîkki, the Mongoose\" (1 st Jungle Book\"). There is \"The Undertakers\" (\" 2nd Jungle Book\"); IlThe Red Dog \" (\" 2nd Jungle Book \"); IlThe Bridge Builders,' already quoted in another connection (D.W.); \"Oonts\"1 (the Camels), (D.D.); the cat and rat in IlBelow the Mill Dam\" (T. and D.); \"The Walking Delegate \" (the horse), (D.W.); and \"The Maltese Cat\" (the polo pony), (D.W.) and \"My Lord the lElephant\" (M.I.). \"Moti Guy, the Mutineer\" (L.H.), also, an elephant story. There is also and better perhaps than most of the other animal stories \"In the Rukh\" (M.I.), a vivid picture of the 612",
         "KIPLING Indian forest and its occupants and its Grermnan chief f or(eter. Kipling bas some appreciation, nece\u0026ssarlly, of German ,efficiency, and his usual sympathy in painting raptîidly the high lights of character and conversation. Therc is littie French, by the way, in Kipling's books, only in \"Thie Lig-ht that Failed,\" and yet with bis instantancouscophnin and insight be bas, since the war began, caught the sirit of France, and bis verses to France (ini \"France at War\") might have been written no better had be spent hiaif a life time reading French history. Read \"Broke to, Every Known Mischance, \" p. 1, of \"France at War. \" Now 1 turn on the seventh tap--England; especiaily the Southcrn counties and of the Southern counti1es the pleasant county of Sussex-a point of contact between Tenny son and Kipling-the last real laureate and the real present laureate; Sussex runs ini the verses of eachi; Kiîpling celebrates it in \"Puck of Pook's 1H1,\" and ini\"ead and Fainîes,\"» and ini \"The Five Nations,\" bult England gcnerally is the burden of \"The Song in Springtîime\" (l).1}) and of \"The Broken Men\" (The Five Nations\"). 0f a different key but belonging to the same organ are the well]-knowvn, often quoted verses in \"The Seven Seas\" (\"A Song of theEnls) and \"The Englisb Flag\" (ini B.B.). I nust, fot quote those housebold words Vo this academnic audience. I will1 only remark in passing that here is a vivid staturment of thle bald fact at which the German rages and scofs-thlat ota Epie like the Kingdom of Heaven, carne not Nvith observation, that it came not as bis witb far sighit and fores,,it, thirough the schemning and lying of his (Jovernment for 40 years, nay for 75 years: through its paternal remittances Vo (3erman traders: through bonuses and bouinties: buit came just. of itself, with no Government's thouight or aid, broadlyspkig by the restless energy of tbe race, the spinit of adveniture: these are just good songs of patriot ism. And titis tap also may be described as another double tap, for bere cornes ini wbat sorne simple souls have fondly iznagined Vo be ail that there is ini Kipling, and wherefore anid,",
         "64 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE acid, acrid souls have intellectually berated him-the Imperial thouglt--one of his minor thoughts, unless I arn mistaken, and only magnified into lis chief thought by radical bitter- ness. \"lWhat should they know of England who only England know ?\" was Kipling's sufficient answer; but no man with a heart and soul thinks first and foremost of politics, or writoe chiefly of such vapid and external trappings. Imperialisrn is the opposite of a narrow nationalism and a parochial know-nothing-ism - that is all--so far as I can discover after 35 years-that Jmperialism, either here or in Great Britain, ineans or has ever meant for the quiet people who have accepted that word. In the South African tales is included. IlThe Captive,\" and in \"The Captive\" is a different note; a new note: Kip.. Iing's American note. I have mentioned Dickens once or twice; it is impossible to speak of Kipling's American studies without thinking of Dickens; the parallel is in some respects so close. Here are two Englishmen, the idols of their own people, who have taken occasion to visit America and to write of Ainerica-not always or at first with cordial appre- ciation or with unstinted acceptance. Dickens wrote bitter things about American manners, American advertising, and spread-eagle oratory; Axnerican dollar-hunting; but the vitality and humnan nature or democratic spirit of bis works so endeared him to America, as a superior, as an infinitely greater Walt Whitman, that it overlooked his seoifs and took hlm to its broad heart and keeps hün there. Similarly mith the vitality and humnan nature of Kipling: no living English author exists-says Mr. Elxner More, the American critie- for a plain Arnerican car conductor except Kipling. I s'pose you've heard that Kipling bas been very ill; he ought to be the next poet laureate; he don't follow no beaten track; he cuts a road for hixnself every time right through, and a mighty good road it is,\" said the conductor to a visiting Englishman in New York; and so America forgave bis scoffs. The resourcefulness of the American; bis science, and his 614",
         "KIPING61 humour, appeal irresitibly to Kipling; and such stories as \"The Captive\" (the American who invented a machine gun and sold it to the Boers and fought with it against the British in South Africa) are as wholly appreciative of the American captive, and bis point of view, as of the British point Of view. \" The Captive \" is very American and very diverting; flot least 80 in his criticisms of his countrywoinen. I have found nine lampe for Kipling; let me find a few more to outshine definitely the seven churches and the lampe of architecture. There is the tenth lainp of philosophy. I really mean philosophy; good pragmatist philosophy, the only philosophy of value-ethics. Kipling îs a moralist, like ail bis countrymen. Hie is a moralist, even if bis is not cxactly the complete and perfect morality of the New Testament; there is morality for mnen if not for women, for lay men if not for erclesiastics, running through ail lis books sîde by side with the running beer andwaving fiag: the stemn and masculine moralitywhicli consists in courage, honesty, truth-speaking, and bard work. \" Neyer tell a lie and neyer borrow money \" was Richard Burton's compendium for life, to each of bis sons, wlien he called him into bis study, at the age of fifteen or thereabouts, before launchîng bim on the world. Kipling lias the primary and essential moralities of the earlier dispensation. If bis books lack something of the secondary and more exquisite refine- mente of Christian morality, stili even these were intencd- we have reason to believe--to supplement, complete, and fulfil, not to destroy and supersede the carlier groulndwork: and even in the secondary moralities lie doeýs not offend like some of bis contemporaries, whom we have been discussing. 1 have quoted \"If\" already, and \" The Bolivar\"- already. I will illustrate Kipling's ethice instead, negatively, by quoting Tomlinson and \"The Conversion of Aurelâus 'McGoffin- (\"Plain Tales from the Iluls,\" pp. 151, etc.). This ie the sort of stuif whichi makes Kipling goodI reading for academie souils, for souls obliviouis of an older and wider creed, who have taken in its place ToIstoy or Ibsen or somne 615",
         "66 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE other vain babbler. is poems were written for our learn- ing, for us academic persons who have no action, who have words only; whose lives are chronicled by words and datedi by theories; in this year the Professor developed that epoch- making theory, etc. (now forgotten), in that year he fired off those epigrams (Paris stili keeps those hot chestnuts on sale), in the third he discovered a new philosophy which lasted for two sessions and ahnost persuaded some young ,students not to be Christians. We are the people for whom the curious text was written \" by your words ye shail be justified and by your words ye shail be condemned\"1: mnost merciful and also most just of texts: since we bave only words whereby we can be judged, whether for acquittai or condem- nation. It is salutary, therefore, for us above other men, to, read the author who makes light of books and theorjes ,and reflection, of everything but action. The crew of the \"Bolivar\" were men of action. Tom- linson was perhaps a Prof essor of Greek. Another Tom- linson by the way-another Prof essor of Greek-has been quoting lately, apropos of the war, a remark of Lord Melbourne's, \"ail the daxnned fools were on one side and ail the clever feilows on the other, and by George, Sir, the damned fools were riglit!\" Kipling has generaily been among the damned fools who, were right; he lias much sympathy with dainned, fools because he knows they are apt to be right in this insoluble world. H1e has very inperfect syxnpathy with the clever fellows and the Professors of Greek-they are unintelligent intellectuals and intellectual neutrals; under- stand everything except huinan nature. The Germans, as the chief \"inteilectuals,\" have the least intelligence, but Mis Jane Addams makes a good second and Mr. Bernard -Shaw a bad third. You can divine from this reference to, Mr. Shaw al the limitations of Kipling. I can recolleet no0 examnp1e of irony in Kipling though irony be one of the choicest fiowers of literature-again, there is none of that arch-egotism which is also a super-advertisement for its author-there 616",
         "KIPLING67 are no0 parlour tricks and posturings and intellectual stunits, pour épater le bourgeais. 1 can find with a littie seeking an eleventh lampý- religion. Kipling is like Whittier in1 thiis, thiat lie bias written a good hymn or two and kniows, his Isaiah to some purpose (\"The Captive\"). Unlike Whittier in this, thiat bi-s good hymns are flot his only good work, his only contributioni to hiterature. Weil, 1 said at tbe beginning that this lecture was unnecessary and belated, and so it is. But after ail, the war with ail its borrors and its beroism will pass; and A tbings will settie down again and slumber, and the ol will be again somewhat as it was before, ail thing, m-iil be peace- fui and people wiil imagine they have always been so : and Dr. Bridges will chirrup his melodies atgaii, and we shail hiave new idie singers of ne-w emptyl da-Ys: and thien Kipling will ho again a good recipe: a reminder that the great, days of Canada-thouigl over--wercý once bere: for there is thie doctrine ancient; simple, true, which Socrates diud expounding. Socrates hiated tati talk and poelry and almiost, ail poets except Homer, especially -Meletus, an Athenian Richard le Gàiienne, perhaps: and hie loved grotesque and homrely illustrations: so as hie sat in prison on his truvkie( bcd, rubbing lis legs and restoring the circuliation whichi the chains bad arres.,ted(; hae chose Lis legs for his prbe\"My friends, wbat a strange ting is pain and pleasuiro--one cnnot well get the once withouit finding the other al.so; those my legs were suffering from the chinsi and now thevy give( mle pleasure, etc., etc.\" But so also in mucb hirger things thian those Socratic shanks; war and religilon, hiorrors anid hieroismn, vice and virtue, go and corne togethe(r: and these that liave been the years, of horror and despair have been also the great years of Canada: lier hieroic youth: hier youth spent Ii fightîng against the very different y-ouith, thle idasyot of G ermany. It is certain now that this war is flot to last anly 'longer. W'ar is iiecessarily a transition, but that does 617",
         "18 THE UNIVERSITY MAGAZINE flot prevent it from marking, like other transitionsthe cuhninating point of huxnan virtue, like Pendces'rmie iii Athens which was the lust outburst of great living for Athens: the precursor of a period of decadence: of moral decay and intel- lectual briliancy. The horrors of war seern to go hand in hand with the highest standards of conduct wbich huinan nature in the mass can reach: it gives us martyrs who arm not agitators, and saints who are neither self -wiiled nor self-seeking: young: men who are quite unconscious that they have any afllnity with saint or martyr and yet are Canada's martyrs and saints. And in conclusion, here is a morality, just as a conclusion because after ail Kipling is a moralist first and foremost, and didactie beyond everything else. You wiil find it in \"They \" (T. and D.), pp. 300-301. If for an old woman's moralizing Kipling lost bis way, we may for Kipling lose, perhaps, for one evening our acadeinie ways: and bear with this vulgar journalist who bas redeemed bis profession and his class: surely none too, soon: sorely they needed redemption: journalism, has weil-nigh destroyed literature. But in Kipling it bas done sometbing at least to replace what it has destroyed. H1e has magniied the sons of, Martha with such passion and aptness of expression that he has pleased the sons of Mary also and deserved well of literature. MAURICE HUTTON 618",
         "BOOK REVIEWS AND LITERARY NOTES DOCUMENTS 0F THE CANADIAN CONSTITUTION, 1759-1915. Selectedandedied by W. P. M. Kennedy M.. Pprmnoflûd1ory, University of Toronto); Author of \"Lfe, (f Prc, Sa si Tudor Iidsorij,\" etc., etc. Tororîto, OxJÙ(rdl ( iesi Pe 98 This volume of more than 7400 clo.scly printed pa!ges containis not me1relIy constitutional documents iu the stricteart sense, of tlle word -Act', cf Par- liament, officiai ccmmnunications, ('c1111t aloe nporary spuý ches, letteri, and other material, whichl may vitalize the Sý:tt paîxrs and giVe Borne glimpses of the spirit and conditions of their time. Lt is dsgc primarfly for students, to put before thuim in comlpendiouis formn a miass of original mnaterial as a h)asis for first-haind ~pn (, u i nsiuto history, as well as to iuterest themi iu thle hto of thi Iwl laild. such gnaterials have already been made ava.ilble ai u puicai-ons, tho)se edited( by M Sr. Sor-tt and Douhty ad pviyii Mr. Williýam flouston's collection; buit thie lattur volumei( is smiall, and thc înatvrials afforded by the others cannot Lie, as this vlmon the studnt k d k- easy of referenice and, inideed, inviting im to rcad. i-i 1,0dnedb added( to dmntrat th adlvaniiPtns of such) a bokfor irtiiniig sti(uens in genuine historical work, aLs well as for iînt restinig them lu tnhe\" celnati- tutional development of thir own country. Buit teeis another aspi-ct of lit least equal impor1tance and les., oblu-t irs o tiua similar juteret iiu the ordliry iulilgtet Caadan - Inc p migtsuoe that nothing c'ould beù less atrci tan a compilation oýf forrmai Acta of ParUinent and other dry-as-dulst ofcadcuet.As a fiict, there is a surprising humnan interest-for andivat !e~ s,-lu t1is ho The geniera,,l reader mnight rlot uatrally hesitate to pl1unget mbf( the systemnatic reading of such a maiss of neeessa,ýrilY moi(re or k discoinuons01.5 documents; but, as hie turus the pagesý , o:1 wil id him 1funxpectedily attracted to dip here and the(reý labo Professýor Kneysilsrt extracts, and thus Le led to take iin inierest in Ille dri.er ofiiIpal ers. We mighit instance Joseph Hocwe's letters to Lord John Rusli r the speeches selec(ted from the dubate on \u003c3ncdrtoa uetn and illumiuating from many points of vlew. A detailled nilyticaIl ale of contents serves to give the chu Io such mbraaswdl as to eniale the reader to follow any particular topic in which h- mnay hve al special intereast. It is now admnitted that o-ur constitutionl history is of mnore than mierely local significance, aud at a time wheu- there lias ben wakenied a new",
         "620 BOOK REVIEWS sense of the importance of polities, aud wheu there is a cail on every Canadian to consider more seriously the problems of our own country, nothing could be more timely than PrGfessor Kennedy's volume. W. J.A. ANTHROPOLOGY UP-TO-DATE. Byl George Winter Mitchell. The Stratford Companyj, Boston, Mass. This is really quite a remarkable littie book. The writer, though a Professor, like that other full-blooded humoriat, Mr. Stephen Leacock, has a very pretty wit. And the anthropologists are eertainly noue the worse for having, as Burns says, sucli a 'l duiel' amang them taki n' notes.\" There is no humane science, noue except the mathematics and its con- geners, that deal with the merely quantitative and physical aspects of things (to ail of which may be applied the characteristic German catch- word: Die verstehen keinen Spass--nofooling for them, thank you 1), there ia no science dealing with man aud bis distinctive conems, in which seme sense of humour is not an entirely indispensable part in the equipment of the would-be investigator. What a weary deal of the Synthetic Philosophy we should have been spared, for instance, but for the deslating solemnity of its distinguished author 1 The man was too tightly swathed in his starchedand, pipe-clayed garment of unwinking earnestness te live almost. It is a miracle he did not die young. If his advice had been taken in the creatien of the world, as Alfonso of Castle complaiued that his had not, the'world would have ail been constructed in parailelograins. Though noue of themn soars to the superhuman heights of Mr. Herbert Spencer, it is apt to be s0 with the other anthropelogists. They are, in spite o! the fascinatingly quaint nature of the material they work in, an aiuaziugly solemu crew. This is a great part of the reasen why they so frequently do not seemn to be, able to draw distinctions. ' I that lark's song, as it were, which after ail does get struck out o! poor humanity at a certan stage o! its slow msent, they are proue te hear uothing but the old familiar buzz o! blue-botties their ears have grown se much used te. They have sniffed with such persevering diligence at the dung st the root of the rose- bush, that they eau deteet ne novelty, calliug loudly for a somewhat diffez- eut order o! explanatiens, iu the perfuine and colour of the rose. Even the ingenious author of the \" Golden Bough,\" oue o! the ablest and mont diligent o! them, would perhaps, had be been a trîfie more richly eudowed with that genial fiexibility of which a certain tincture of humour in the mest reassuring guarantee, have spared us \u0026ome of the diatribes ini the first edition of his monumental work. He would then have paid mor* attention to the -great neglected Aristetelian principle that things are explicable only in the light o! what they grow to at their point of highest 620",
         "BOOK REVIEWS62 efflorescenec, that you can't explain addLe1d eggs even without a side-long glance at the full-grown hen-and even at the slendeu(Ior of lier MNemnon- like rooster, \" the crested bird that chips his wings; at dlawn.CTer i.- a sort of \" scientist \" who finds the twilighit or even thé, igî-t more cou'- fortably reducible to his categories thani it dawn. But Professor Mitchiell is not m( rely a wit and. thereforo. a re.fr(eShingly ruddy Sauf among the woefùil crowd of our latest prophiets. Ile is a very devoted and skilful teacher, with that gift of brvvity and of hitti]1g thle naîl on the head which is among the choiecest and rares-t gifts S-o fthe born teacher. And lie is, besidles, a ser ious student of anthLropolcgy. 11is mlodeaýt work is quite the beat brie! introduiction to that sometiies rathevr dismal science I have seen. Anyoce who onietusywishies te behi interestud lu it--and sorne acquaintance witb it is entiroly inipnalfor e-xample. to ail who would not rnerely accept what they were told by grandmnamman about their religion, but would foru' for toileSsoule disorinulinating estimate of the provenience and relative worth of the elemients entterLinig iute that-will find no more gtimul,,ting impuilse or more judielous' oriun- tation than are contained in this most readable lit.tie book, which la not to be weighed upon a steelyard, but lu goldami-itha.' sciles. J. M. THEf ARCHAEOLOGY 0F THEf HOLY LAND. Dy P. S. P. Han\u0026docl, M.A., illutra*ed.(, lO. . T.\u003e( Fihr Unwi*n, 1916. Ainong the miner b)lessings whiph the suceressfull conclusion of thle wir is likely te briug, we counit the prospct of the oping upi o! Syria and Palestine and other districts of esrnAsia to the explorer. Muchl wvork bas already been done, buit the new conditionsq eau ardl fai1 te gv more * scope to the excavator. The present volume I., un adtiirable exp\u003eostin of the progress muade uip to a ver\u003e' recent date, and invhudes the resit of Selhun's dcoeesat Jericlho. Mr. Hfandvock wvaq formerily au assistant in the departmnent of Egyptian and Asisyrian anitiqtiiesg- at, the Britishi Museum; lus book, therefore, ia the work et a revoguized authority. Ife rexluds uls that palaeolithic iemiains are not anknown in Palestine. The neolithic monuiments are still more frq thte site of Gezer lias yleldedj a good deal of mae i, unl other cities-for exarnple, vellc\u003ew an go back to a neolithie period. Thus we get. glimupses of a tinte before the (Janaariteti, teo say nothing of the Hlebr\u003ewq, occupied the laiud. The later periodam, of course, reevqual attention. Every branvi of airchaetv\u003eogy, ineluding architecture, impleruients, p)ot.tery, burial cutstoixus, and religions practices, la representedi. It, la almeast neveesa te 811y that Sideliglits are thrown on the Bible narrative. Mr. Ulandlcock's work la sujre to ftid ita- way to a wide circle of readers. S. B. S. 621",
         "622 BOOK REVIEWS GENSERIC KING OF THE VA.NDALS AND) FIRST KAISER. By Poultney Bigelow, M.A., F.R.G%.S. Price *1.50 net. rtam's Sons, 1918. Amxong t~he xany changes which the sat few years have note a revival of interest in autiqity. The present book is evidence that the aucient world la no longer a subjeet for thE academic world only; the journalist and the general reader",
         "BOOK IREVIEWS 623 mus. They went to Africa becatise they were ýrnor of the Province of Mfrica. We canuot say ivited into Belgium or the Austrians into Serbia. Sinstructive. The Roman general Pharas wrote he Vaudal kinoes: \" Whv will vou ruin vouir-,tnf-",
         "624 BOOK IREVIEWS We quite concur with this view, and we may add a suggestion that the Iîterature of the Early Church miglit wefl receive more attention than it lias received hîtherto. The present series of Early Churcli classies is evi- dence that scholars are already bestirring themselves in this direction. A number of volumes have already been issued, of convenient, size and at reasonable prices. Two of these bookE lie before us. The Lives of the Saints have long been a barren and neglected field, but recentiy seholars ha.ve begun to realîze that there is a great deal of valuable matter contained in the bulky volumes in which their bistory is recorded. The surprising developinent of mythological studies has been one influence at work. The revived interest in Pagan religion and mytbology lias led to, discoveries whicb tlirow a new, almost startling, light on many pages of the Lives of the Saints. In St. Pelagia, for example, we recognize the Greek Aphrodite; and the life of St. Agatha bas obvious points of contact botli with the worship of the Bona Dea and the story of Penelope. Another group of bIves can be made, when critically treated, to yield valuable matter to the student of ancient history. The present narrative, liowever, belongs to neither of these classes. The life of St. Macrinais like the life of oui own Thomas à Becket, a genuine biography. The biographer was ber brother, the celebrated. theologîan Gregory of Nyssa. The record of lier quiet and benevolent activities in the coxnparatively peaceful period of the fourtli century cannot fail to interest us in these days when social service lias become a watchword. The second bock, the treatise of Irenaeus, is of a different type. Mr. Hitchicock bas made selections from this celebrated work and supplied explanatory notes. There are still probably someW~eple to whomn it will be news that tlieology has recently entered upon a fresb lease of life. Many publications in England and America furniali evidence of this; the authors molstlY follow meely in the footsteps of the Germnan theologians Pifeiderer and Harxxack, Who are Mentioned by naine en page 113 of the first volume of this work. Tbere bas thus arisen a sort of cuit of Irenaeus, who, is caled by Dr. Carpenter, in tbe lectures whicli we endeavoured to review latelY, the profoundest theologîan of bis age. WVe cannot join i this chorus of admiration. We cannot forget that lie tells us (1, 39) that the Emperor Clgudius honoured Simnon Magus witli a statue at Rome; a miistake due to a confusion witli the Sabine deity, Semo Sancus. Again, when Irenaeus says that the tbree spies ehtertained by Raliab prefigured the Trinity, we sliould feel rather dubious about accepting this view, even if there liad really been three spies; as a minater of fact, there were only two. Nor is lie more reliable in bis scholarship; the Ilebrew \u003czbi-ad (Te. ix, 6), whicli our revised version incorrect-ly translates \" everlasting father,\" lie renders by \" comely of person\"; hoiw lie arrives at this we cannot even conjecture. Nor do we know what autliority lie bas for 624",
         "BOOK REVIEWS 625 sayiiig that Satan means apostate. These are cases where we have an opportunity of checking bis statements; but in his account of the varions heresies we are without this resource. Consequently we are lef t with an uneasy feeling that in this fleld too his information may not alasbe rehiable. This uneasiness is increased when we find hiim naively tel]lig us (Vol. 11, page 5) that bis predecessors were not able to confute the followers of Valentinus beenuse they did not understand their sys.tem. N\\everthieles.,s, although we do not share Mr. Hitcheoek's admiration for bis author, w are f ully aware that Irenaeus is not a writer whom we can put on one side. lie is the flrst of the Fathers to represent the theological tradition whieh bas continued, with occasional modifications, to the present day. Every serions student, therefore, of the thouglit of our own time cannot afford to leave Irenaeus out of secouet. Mr. Hitchcock adds explanatory notes, which are useful, altbough they seem to, us to be often too conitroversial in tone. S. B -S. 1"
      ],
